


Long hair - Wikipedia






















 







Long hair

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Hair length)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about human head hair. For other uses, see Longhair (disambiguation).




A man with shoulder length hair, 1599






A woman with waist length hair


Long hair is a hairstyle where the head hair is allowed to grow to considerable length. Exactly what constitutes long hair can change from culture to culture, or even within cultures. For example, a woman with chin-length hair in some cultures may be said to have short hair, while a man with the same length of hair in some of the same cultures would be said to have long hair.
Males having short, cut hair are in many cultures viewed as being under society's control, such as while in the military or prison or as punishment for a crime. Although recently in The United States it has become more socially acceptable and more common for men to have hair reaching all the way down to their upper back. Long, thick hair has been a sign of wealth, power or prominence throughout time and history.[citation needed]
Long lustrous female hair is generally rated attractive by both men and women across cultures.[1][2] The prevalence of trichophilia (hair partialism or fetishism) is 7% in the population, and very long hair is a common subject of devotion in this group.[3][4]



Contents


1 Biological significance
2 Psychological significance
3 Cultural meaning
4 Transferred meaning
5 Hair lengths

5.1 Maximum hair length


6 Cultural history

6.1 In Jewish and Christian scriptures
6.2 Western culture

6.2.1 Ancient Greece and Rome
6.2.2 Middle Ages
6.2.3 Recent trends among women
6.2.4 Recent trends among men
6.2.5 African Americans
6.2.6 Contemporary North America


6.3 Middle East

6.3.1 Judaism
6.3.2 Islam


6.4 Native Americans
6.5 Africa
6.6 Asia

6.6.1 China
6.6.2 Southeast Asia
6.6.3 Japan
6.6.4 Sikhism




7 See also
8 Images
9 References
10 Bibliography



Biological significance[edit]




A woman with mid-back level hair


Humans, horses, and orangutans are among the few species that may grow their head hair very long. Humans are believed to have lost their fur 2.5–3 million years ago as hominids when transitioning from a forest habitat to the open savanna, as an effect of natural selection, since this development made it possible to run fast and hunt animals close to the equator without getting overheated. An exception was however head hair, which was kept to provide thermal insulation of the scalp from the sun, to protect against ultra-violet radiation exposure, and also to provide cooling (when sweat evaporates from soaked hair).[citation needed] The ability to grow straight hair, has been observed among Homo sapiens sub-groups in less sunny regions further away from the equator. Relative to kinky Afro-textured hair, straight hair allows more UV light to pass to the scalp (which is essential for the production of vitamin D, that is important for bone development).
Scientists also view the ability to grow very long hair as a result of sexual selection, since long and healthy hair is a sign of fertility and youth.[5][need quotation to verify] An evolutionary biology explanation for this attraction is that hair length and quality can act as a cue to youth and health, signifying a woman's reproductive potential.[6] As hair grows slowly, long hair may reveal 2–3 years of a person's health status, nutrition, age and reproductive fitness. Malnutrition and deficiencies in minerals and vitamins due to starvation causes loss of hair or changes in hair color (e.g. dark hair turning reddish).[7]
Psychological significance[edit]
Anthropologists speculate that the functional significance of long head hair may be adornment, a by-product of secondary natural selection once other androgenic/somatic hair (body hair) had largely been lost. Another possibility is that long head hair is a result of Fisherian runaway sexual selection, where long lustrous hair is a visible marker for a healthy individual. For some groups or individuals, however, short hair is the selected trait.[5]
By seven to nine months, infants can tell the sexes apart based on hair length, voice pitch and faces.[8]
Cultural meaning[edit]
Ways of life often viewed as more rigid, such as soldiers and religious cultures, frequently have explicit rules regarding hair length. For example, Buddhist monks shave their heads as part of their order of worship.[9] Similarly, religious men with long hair include the Nazarites of the Hebrew Bible (Samson being a famous example)[10] and the Sikhs.[11] Subservient cultures may view male long hair negatively, and are sometimes detected by their rulers through hair length, as was the case with the Gaelic Irish under English rule and the Moors under Spanish rule in Medieval Spain.[clarification needed]
East Asian cultures have traditionally seen long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up in styles such as the ponytail, plait, or any bun.[12]
Transferred meaning[edit]
The traditional connotation of "long hair" in English meant, roughly, someone artistically knowledgeable or wise, an aesthete.[13] As a descriptive term, it has been applied to Merovingians and classical music enthusiasts, as well as hippies and aesthetes.[13]
Hair lengths[edit]







A Polish woman with armpit length hair








An american woman with mid back length hair








An Italian woman with waist length hair








A Sri Lankan woman with classic length hair








Tibetan woman with thigh-length hair








Manhattan woman with knee-length braided hair





Hair length is most often measured (in centimeters or inches) from the line of the scalp on the forehead up over the highest point of the skull to its termination, and sometimes from the crown, the latter resulting in 10 centimeter lower values in average.[14] In cosmetology, hair lengths are usually categorized according to the part of the body where the bulk of the longest hair terminates: chin level, shoulder length, lower shoulderblade/mid-back level, waist length, hip-length, classic length (extends to almost buttock-length, i.e. upper thigh-length, where the legs meet the buttocks), thigh-length, knee-length and ankle/floor length hair.[14][15]
Hair usually takes about two years to reach shoulder length,[16] and about seven years to reach waist-length/hip-length, including occasional trims (approximately 80–90 cm (32–36 inches) from forehead for most people) [15][16]
Maximum hair length[edit]




Portrait of Julie Manet by Renoir, 1894


The maximum hair length that is possible to reach is about 15 cm (6 in) for infants (below the age of 1), about 60 cm (24 in) for children, and generally 100 cm (40 in) for adults. Documentation for decrease of the maximum length with age cannot be found in the literature. Some individuals can reach excessive lengths. Lengths greater than 150 cm (59 in) are frequently observed in long hair contests.[17] Xie Qiuping had the longest documented hair in the world, measuring 5.627 m (18 ft 5.54 in) in May 2004.[18]
The maximum terminal hair length depends on the length of the anagen (period of hair growth) for the individual. Waist-length hair or longer is only possible to reach for people with long anagen. The anagen lasts between 2 and 7 years, for some individuals even longer, and follows by shorter catagen (transition) and telogen (resting) periods. At any given time, about 85% of hair strands are in anagen.[19] The fibroblast growth factor 5 (FGF5) gene affects the hair cycle in mammals including humans; blocking FGF5 in the human scalp (by applying a herbal extract that blocked FGF5) extends the hair cycle, resulting in less hair fall and increased hair growth.[20]
Cultural history[edit]
In Jewish and Christian scriptures[edit]



"She, as a veil down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned golden tresses wore
Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved,
As the vine curls her tendrils..."



– John Milton's description of Eve in Paradise Lost


In the Old Testament, the Nazirites would go for long periods of time without cutting their hair to show devotion to God.[21] Samson is one example; his strength depended upon his refraining from cutting his hair, described as worn in "seven locks".[10]
In the New Testament, Saint Paul (formerly Saul of Tarsus) wrote, "Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. But if any seem contentious, we have no such custom, neither do the churches of God."[22]
An interpretation from observing nature: The male animals such as the Lion have the longer hair than the female; thus it is not a shame for a man to have long hair.
Western culture[edit]
Ancient Greece and Rome[edit]
In ancient Greece, long male hair was a symbol of wealth and power, while a shaven head was appropriate for a slave. The ancient Greeks had several gods and heroes who wore their hair long, including Zeus, Achilles, Apollo, and Poseidon. Greek soldiers are said to have worn their hair long in battle. Such warriors considered it a sign of aristocracy and are said to have combed it openly in order to show off. Also, in order to keep enemies from getting a hold of it in battle, they were known to cut the front short, but leave it long in the back, where it was more out of reach. A widely held alternative interpretation of the conventional belief is that they kept it long, and simply tied it back in a style known as a ponytail in order to keep it out of their enemies' reach. The ponytail method allowed warriors, who often traveled to battle with a minimal amount of equipment in order to avoid excessively heavy loads over long marches, to keep their hair manageable with a small piece of string to hold their pony tail in place and a knife to cut the back to length with one simple slice. Around the sixth century, however, the Greek men shifted to shorter hairstyles, with the exception of the Spartans. Women in the culture remained with the longer style, which for them showed freedom, health, and wealth, as well as good behavior.[23] In men, it was considered a sign of false pride by this time.[24]
Pliny the Elder in his Natural History and Varro related that the Romans did not begin to cut their hair short until barbers were introduced to Italy from Sicily by P. Ticinius Mena in 299 BC.[25] Women in Roman times valued long hair, usually with a center part. Apart from in the earliest times, men's hair was usually shorter than women's, although other cultures of the time, such as Greeks in the east, considered long hair to be typical of philosophers, who were thought to be too engrossed in learning to bother with hair.[26] Strictly in the province of Rome, however, the shorter hairstyle was especially popular.[24] When Julius Caesar conquered the Gauls, who favored long hair, he ordered it to be cut short.[27]
Middle Ages[edit]
In the European middle ages, shorter hair often signified servitude and peasantry, while long hair was often attributed to freemen, as was the case with the Germanic Goths and Merovingians.
The Gaelic Irish (both men and women)[28] took great pride in their long hair—for example, a person could be heavily fined for cutting a man's hair short against his will.[29] When the Anglo-Normans and the English colonized Ireland, hair length came to signify one's allegiance. Irishmen who cut their hair short were deemed to be forsaking their Irish heritage. Likewise, English colonists who wore their hair long in the back were deemed to be forsaking their role as English subjects and giving in to the Irish life. Thus, hair length was one of the most common ways of judging a true Englishman in this period. Muslims in Christian areas were ordered to keep their hair short and parted, as their longer style was considered rebellious and barbaric.[30]




Empress Elisabeth of Austria wearing thigh-length hair in 1865. (Painting by Franz Xaver Winterhalter)


The long hair tradition was widespread among English and French men in the 11th and 12th centuries, though it was considered, mostly because of endorsement of the Roman Catholic Church, acceptable for men also to have shorter hair. The tradition was largely brought about by monarchs who rejected the shorter hairstyle, causing the people to follow. Wulfstan, a religious leader, worried that those with longer hair would fight like women, and be unable to protect England from foreign invasion. This idea can be found in later military leaders as well, such as those of the American Confederacy.[31] Knights and rulers would also sometimes cut or pull out their hair in order to show penitence and mourning, and a squire's hair was generally shorter than a knight's. Married women who let their hair flow out in public were frowned upon, as this was normally reserved for the unwed, although they were allowed to let it out in mourning, to show their distressed state. Through these centuries it was expected of Eastern Christians to wear long hair as well as long beards, which was especially expected from clergy and monks.
In England, during the English Civil Wars of 1642 to 1651, male hair length was emblematic of the disputes between Cavaliers and Roundheads (Puritans). Cavaliers wore longer hair, and were less religious-minded, thought of by the Roundheads as lecherous. The more devout Roundheads typically had somewhat shorter hair[9]
Around this time, long hair in England also came to be associated with adventurers who traveled to America and were familiar with the native culture there, short hair with less adventurous types.
Recent trends among women[edit]







The Seven Sutherland Sisters were singing and showing off their famous floor-length hair in a sideshow of Barnum & Bailey's from about 1882 to 1907.








Opera singer Mary Garden in 1908 with knee-length hair








Indonesian woman with waist-length hair









Dutch woman with thigh-length hair








Ngbandi girls with hip-length hair





Growing and wearing long hair was common among women in the Western world until World War One.[15] Long female hair never ceased in western culture, though it was rare during the 1920s and 1930s, and was frequent especially around 1970 and 1985.[citation needed]
In most current cultures, it is more typical for women to wear long hair than for men to do so. An American study shows significant correlation between hair length and age, which indicates that younger women tend to have longer hair than older women. A significant correlation was also found between women's hair length and hair quality. Moreover, hair quality was correlated with the women's perceived physical health. Consistent with principles of evolutionary psychology, these results indicate that hair length and quality can act as a cue to a woman's youth and health, signifying reproductive potential. The correlation between the woman's hair length and marital status, or number of children, was however not more than to be expected from the correlation between hair length and age.[6]
Recent trends among men[edit]




Long male hair in western youth culture became popular in the 1960s and 70s with The Beatles.






Bob Marley made rastafari culture and dreadlocks popular also outside Jamaica.


Before World War One men generally had longer hair and beards. However, short hair on men was introduced in World War One for soldiers. Slaves and defeated armies were often required to shave their heads. The trench warfare in 1914 to 1918 exposed men to flea and lice infestations, which prompted the order to cut short hair, establishing a military tradition,[15] and it expanded among civils by imitation.
Beat poets during the 1950s wore longer hairstyles. By 1960, a small "beatnik" community in Newquay, Cornwall, England (including a young Wizz Jones) had attracted the attention of their neighbors for growing their hair to a length past the shoulders, resulting in a television interview with Alan Whicker on BBC television's Tonight series.[32] The 1960s also introduced The Beatles, who started a more widespread longer hair trend. The social revolution of the 1960s led to a renaissance of unchecked hair growth,[15] and long hair, especially on men, was worn as a political or countercultural symbol or protest and as a symbol of masculinity. This cultural symbol extended to several Western countries in the Americas, Western Europe, South Africa, and Australia.[33] Specific long hairstyles such as dreadlocks have been part of counterculture movements seeking to define other alternative cultures and lifestyles since this time.[12] Longer hair in general remained popular due to the youth rebellion throughout the liberal decade of the 1960s.[33] The long hair trend grew with the spread of the hippie movement in the 1960s[33] and, in the 1970s, longer hair styles would become the norm among men and women.
In the 1970s, the popularity of Jamaica's reggae music and musician Bob Marley prompted interest in dreadlocks internationally. The anti-establishment philosophy of Rastafari, echoed in much of the reggae of the time, resonated with leaning youth of all ethnicities – especially and primarily among African Americans and other Blacks, but among counterculture whites as well.[34] Eastern Christians are encouraged[by whom?] to wear long hair with long beard. In the 1980s the view of long hair as a solitary signifier of political or counter-cultural identity was countered and parodied in films such as Rambo and many other militaristic heroes of media which challenged then-contemporary views of tradition.[35] In the 2000's longer hairstyles among men became popular among neopagans and rock enthusiasts;[36] for example, musicians in Metal bands and their fans often wear long hair. Long hair may be grown for the purpose of being donated to an organization, such as Locks of Love, for hairpieces to help those who could not have hair otherwise, such as those who are diagnosed with alopecia aerate. Today long hair has gained even more popularity. Even among mainstream men it is socially acceptable to have hair reaching around the upper back. This could in part be due to the "man bun" trend where men pull their shoulder length or longer hair back into a topknot Bun (hairstyle).
African Americans[edit]
When African slaves were freed in America, they struggled to reach the social status of whites. Many former slaves tried to conform their hairstyles as part of this struggle. Women, especially, felt pressure to make their hair long and oily, rather than keeping the shorter, tightly coiled style they had known.[37] However, during the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s, African-Americans such as Malcolm X advocated hairstyles such as afros and dreadlocks, in order to embrace their race, and to return to West African roots.[38]
Social pressures at the time were heavily influencing these Americans (women) to have long, straight hair, like white people did.[39] This resulted in the Black is beautiful movement, wherein African Americans wore long hair, that was however, untreated and unmodified. More recently, hair-extensions have become widespread. Scholars have pointed out the continued pressure on black women to have long, smooth hair. Amelia Jones points out that dolls for children, such as Barbies, add to this pressure, citing as an example a new, black Barbie with long hair. Blacks, she believes, should be able to be themselves without feeling pressured to "tame" their hair.[40]
Contemporary North America[edit]
1972, it was estimated that 24% of American women wore shoulder length hair or longer (44% of women in ages 14 to 44), meaning slightly more than 12% of men and women altogether. Similar frequency was found in 2001, when it was estimated that about 13% of the US adult population, male as well as females, has hair shoulder-length or longer, about 2.4% have hair reaching to the bottom of the shoulder blades or longer, about 0.3% have hair waist length or longer, and only about 0.017% have hair buttocks-length or longer.[41] By extrapolating the above data and the number of hair length records, the number of people with shoulder-length hair or longer in the USA is estimated to be 27 million, those with waist-length hair roughly 900,000, those with buttocks-length hair to be 40,000, with knee length hair to 2,000 and with ankle length hair to 70.[14]
Middle East[edit]
Judaism[edit]
Strict orthodox Judaism forbids men from cutting their sidelocks, but other hair may be kept as desired. Hair is not cut during a time of mourning. The Torah in Deuteronomy 14:1 prohibits removing hair in mourning for the dead.
Islam[edit]




Transjordanian Bedouin with shoulder length hair, during World War II


In the Muslim world, it seems the trend of hair styles is now favouring short over long in men. In the past, Bedouin Muslims often wore their hair in long braids, but influences from the Western world have caused a change in attitudes. Bedouins are now less likely to have long hair.[42] Islamic countries in North Africa such as Egypt view long hair in men as modernist and in one case the Egyptian police viewed it as Satanic and a sign of an infidel.[43] Spanish rulers during the Medieval Period suspected long-haired males to be Moors or Moriscos, therefore long hair was forbidden since it was believed to be a Moorish custom. However, modern North African men have adopted Western short hair.
Muslims regard the Prophet Muhammad as the best example to live by, and try to emulate him whenever possible. The Islamic Prophet Muhammad reportedly in Sahih Muslim had hair that "hung over his shoulders and earlobes".[44] Sahih Bukhari, regarded the most authentic of hadith, also supports this using a prime example of the prophet Isa (Jesus).[45] The Prophet Muhammad has also described Jesus as "having long hair reaching his ear lobes."[46] Malik's Muwatta 51.2.6 reported, Yahya related to me from Malik from Yahya ibn Said that Abu Qatada al-Ansari said to the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, "I have a lot of hair which comes down to my shoulders, shall I comb it? The Messenger of Allah. may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said, "Yes, and honour it." Sometimes Abu Qatada oiled it twice in one day because the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said to him. "Honour it."
With regards to women, neither Qur'an nor Sunnah explicitly state that women cannot cut their hair. Hadith does mention that women should not imitate men, and vice versa, and hence many scholars on this assumption, decree that women should let their hair grow longer than the hair of the Prophet, reaching beyond their shoulders, as hadith mentions that the Prophet had his hair between his shoulder and his earlobes. (He described Jesus's hair, which hung to his earlobes, as long.[47])
However, according to some hadiths regarding the rules of awrah, women are required to grow hair long, long enough that it would cover the breasts or as much awrah parts of the body when they're being buried, because she lacks clothes and long hair would be used as a covering instead.
Some Muslims are also opposed to men having long hair as it is also important in Islam to have clear differences (in appearance) between sexes. And generally these cultures encourage women to have long hair and men to have short hair.[48] The Taliban in Afghanistan viewed long hair for men as a western influence, and punished it by arrest and forced haircuts,[49] although this would be a direct contradiction of the sunnah of the Prophet. Similar measures have been taken by Islamists in Iraq.[50] In spite of this, several Taliban affiliated members of the Mehsud clan are recognisable by their long hair.[51][52] The Saudi Islamist fighter Amir Khattab was also notable for his long hair. Dervishes of some Sufi orders, such as the Kasnazani, often have long hair and whirl it around during rituals.[53]
Native Americans[edit]




Yakima boy with mid-back level hair. (Photo by Edward S. Curtis, 1868–1952.)


Many Native American men wore long hair before the arrival of western influences on their culture. (In Cherokee legends, for example, males said to be handsome were often described as having "long hair almost to the ground" or similar formulas.[54]). Both men and women of these cultures have frequently struggled to maintain their tradition but have faced heavy opposition. Many consider it a sign of giving in to western influences to have their hair cut.[55][56] Early American settlers saw long-haired, native men as rebelling against their civilized society. Mountain men and trappers who adopted the customs were also considered amoral, and often identified by their long hair.[57] Since the cultural movements of the Sixties and Seventies, however, Native Americans have felt less pressure to have short hair, as different movements have defended their cultural rights.[58] For example, several states have loosened prison regulations, allowing Native Americans to wear long hair during incarceration, along with other cultural allowances.[59] There has been resistance to these changes, however, as long hair is sometimes used to hide drugs, as well as to identify with a gang.[60]
Africa[edit]




Somali woman with shoulder-length hair.


Throughout much of Africa, afro-textured hair is the most frequent hair form, except among the Afro-Asiatic (Hamito-Semitic) speaking populations in North Africa and the Horn of Africa. In the latter regions, naturally long hair is instead more common.[61]
In West African cultures, women with long hair were highly valued. Long, thick hair was seen as a sign of health, strength, and capability to bear many children. In keeping with this general theme, women who were too young for marriage would shave a portion of their heads to signal so. This tradition, however, did not extend to every West African culture, as several valued shorter hair.[62]
Asia[edit]
Historically, East Asian cultures viewed long hair as a sign of youth and aesthetic beauty. Long hair is associated with private life and sexuality. East Asian cultures see long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up.[12] Lay Buddhists have long hair, while Buddhist monks have shaved heads.[9]







Japanese woman combing her long hair. (Colour woodblock print from 1920 by Hashiguchi Goyō.)








Illustration of The Tale of Genji, painted by Tosa Mitsuoki (1617–1691).








Chinese orthodox Christian man from 1874








Nosu girls in China 1922.








A hindoo "fakir" or Sadhu with long hair. Lithograph 1844 by Emily Eden after Lowes Cato Dickinson.





China[edit]
In ancient China and Korea, hair was regarded as a precious legacy from parents. Most people would never cut their hair after they became adults, and cutting off one's hair was a penalty for minor crimes. Both men and women would coil up their hair and many hair-coiling styles were developed.
Beginning in 1619, the ethnic Manchu Qing dynasty forced all men in China to adopt the queue: a long braid down the back with the hair near the forehead completely shaved. Hair length and style became a life-or-death matter in 1645 as the Manchu told them either their hair or their head would be cut. By 1651, the population of China had been reduced from 51 million to just 20 million, as a whole generation resisted the order for the sake of Confucian ideals against shaving or harming their hair.
Nearly every Han rebel group began by shearing this pigtail (most especially in the case of the Taiping, who were known in Chinese as the "Longhairs"), but the queue on penalty of death lasted until 1911, when the Chinese people cut their queues in unison at a time of rebellion. Americans at first judged Chinese immigrant laborers to be poor workers because their long hair brought an association with women.[63]
Islamic and Christian missionaries among the Chinese were strong advocates of shorter male hair for their converts.[64] Around the Destruction of Four Olds period in 1964, almost anything seen as part of Traditional Chinese culture would lead to problems with the Communist Red Guards. Items that attracted dangerous attention if caught in the public included jewelry and long male hair.[65] These things were regarded as symbols of bourgeois lifestyle, that represented wealth. People had to avoid them or suffer serious consequences such as tortures and beatings by the guards.[65] More recently, long hair was ridiculed in China from October 1983 to December 1983, as part of the short and unsuccessful Anti-Spiritual Pollution Campaign.[66]
Also, in Chinese ancient and modern poetry, long hair is a common symbol used by poets, for example Li Bai and Li Shangyin, to express their depression and sadness.
Southeast Asia[edit]
In Southeast Asia and Indonesia, male long hair was valued in until the seventeenth century, when the area adopted outside influences including Islam and Christianity. Invading cultures enforced shorter hairstyles on men as a sign of servitude, as well. They were also confused at the short hairstyles among women in certain areas, such as Thailand, and struggled to explain why women in the area had such short hair. They came up with several mythical stories, one of which involved a king who found a long hair in his rice and, in a rage, demanded that all women keep their hair short.[64]
In rural areas in certain Asian countries, for example India, girls still usually let their hair grow long, and knee-length hair is not unusual.[67]
Japan[edit]
In the medieval Japan, heian gentleman were not very interested in a woman's physical beauty and rarely had an opportunity to see it. The only physical attribute of interest was a woman's hair, which had to be thick and longer than she was tall. The fascination with long hair was one reason why a woman's becoming a nun was regarded with such seriousness — it could never again grow to its full length. This explains why Genji refuses to let Murasaki (his de facto wife in the classical Japanese novel The Tale of Genji) take the tonsure when she is ill.[68]
Sikhism[edit]
For Sikhs, Kesh is the practice of allowing one's hair to grow naturally as a symbol of devotion to God and lack of worldliness.[11]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (August 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The Sikhs were commanded by Guru Gobind Singh at the Baisakhi Amrit Sanchar in 1699 to wear long uncut hair called Kesh at all times to signify the strength and vitality of the Sikh people. This was one of the 'five requisites of faith', collectively called Kakars that form the external visible identifiers to clearly affirm a Sikh's commitment and dedication to the order (Hukam) of the tenth master and made one a member of the Khalsa. The Khalsa is the "Saint-Soldier" of Guru Gobind Singh who stated the following: "He does not recognize anyone else except One Lord, not even the bestowal of charities, performance of merciful acts, austerities and restraint on pilgrim-stations; the perfect light of the Lord illuminates his heart, then consider him as the immaculate Khalsa." (Guru Gobind Singh in the Dasam Granth page 1350)
The Kesh or unshorn long hair is an indispensable part of the human body as created by waheguru that is the mainstay of the 'Jivan Jaach' and the Rehni that was prescribed by Guru Gobind Singh Sahib by which a Sikh is clearly and quickly identified, Kesh. The kanga, another requisite of faith is usually tucked behind the "Rishi Knot" and tied under the turban. The uncut long head hair and the beard in the case of men forms the main kakar for the Sikhs.
KESADHARI, a term defining a Sikh as one who carries on his head the full growth of his kes (hair) which he never trims or cuts for any reason. Anyone, Sikh or non-Sikh, may keep the hair unshorn, but for the Sikh kes, unshorn hair, is a requisite of faith and an inviolable vow. The Sikh Rahit Maryada published by the Shiromani Gurdwara Prabandhak Committee, statutory body for the control and management of Sikh shrines and by extension for laying down rules about Sikh beliefs and practices, issued in 1945, after long and minute deliberations among Sikh scholars and theologians, defines a Sikh thus: Every Sikh who has been admitted to the rites of amrit, i.e. who has been initiated as a Sikh, must allow his hair to grow to its full length. This also applies to those born of Sikh families but [who] have not yet received the rites of amrit of the tenth master, Guru Gobind Singh. ".
See also[edit]

Grooming
Haircut
Hair extensions
Hair stick
Lady Godiva
Long hair fetishism, a form of Trichophilia
Rapunzel

Images[edit]

Female long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Female long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)

References[edit]


^ Buss, David M. (2005). The handbook of evolutionary psychology. John Wiley and Sons. p. 309. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3. 
^ Bereczkei, T. (2007). "Hair length, facial attractiveness, personality attribution; A multiple fitness model of hairdressing". Review of Psychology. 13 (1): 35–42. 
^ Scorolli, C; Ghirlanda, S; Enquist, M; Zattoni, S; Jannini, E A (2007). "Relative prevalence of different fetishes". International Journal of Impotence Research. 19 (4): 432–7. PMID 17304204. doi:10.1038/sj.ijir.3901547. 
^ "Heels top the global fetish leader board". England. 
^ a b Watson, James (2005). Darwin: the Indelible Stamp; the Evolution of an Idea. Philadelphia: Running Press. p. 1042. ISBN 0-7624-2136-3. 
^ a b Hinsz, Verlin B.; Matz, David C.; Patience, Rebecca A. (2001). "Does women's hair signal reproductive potential?". Journal of Experimental Social Psychology. 37 (2): 166. doi:10.1006/jesp.2000.1450. 
^ Sugiyama, Lawrence S. (2005) "Physical Attractiveness in Adaptationist Perspective", Chapter 10 in Buss, David M. (ed.) The Handbook of Evolutionary Psychology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3
^ Williams, Simon Johnson; Birke, Lynda I. A.; Bendelow, Gillian (2003). Debating biology: sociological reflections on health, medicine, and society. Routledge. p. 130. ISBN 0-415-27903-8. 
^ a b c Leach, E. R. (July 1958). "Magical Hair". Journal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. 88 (2): 147–164. JSTOR 2844249. doi:10.2307/2844249. 
^ a b Judges 13–16
^ a b Fowler, Jeaneane (1997). World Religions: an Introduction for Students. Brighton: Sussex Academic Press. p. 352. ISBN 1-898723-48-6. 
^ a b c Maynard, Margaret (2004), Dress and Globalisation, Manchester: Manchester University Press, p. 104, ISBN 0-7190-6389-2 
^ a b Oxford English Dictionary
^ a b c Clarence Robbins and Marjorie Gene Robbins, "Scalp hair length. II. Estimating the percentages of adults in the USA and larger populations by hari length." Journal of cosmetic science 54.4 (2003): 367–378.
^ a b c d e Gonzalez, Anthony (2007). Cosmetology. Global Media. p. 54. ISBN 81-89940-45-7. 
^ a b Hemat, R. A. S. (2007). Andropathy. Urotext. p. 375. ISBN 1-903737-08-7. 
^ Robbins, Clarence R. (2002). Chemical and physical behavior of human hair. Springer. ISBN 0-387-95094-X. 
^ Guinness World Records: Longest hair. guinnessworldrecords.com
^ Tortora & Derrickson (2012). Principles of Anatomy & Physiology (13 ed.). John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p. 163. 
^ Maeda, T.; Yamamoto, T.; Isikawa, Y.; Itoh, N.; Arase, S. (2007). "Sanguisorba Officinalis Root Extract Has FGF-5 Inhibitory Activity and Reduces Hair Loss by Causing Prolongation of the Anagen Period". Nishi Nihon Hifuka. 69: 81. doi:10.2336/nishinihonhifu.69.81. 
^ Numbers 6:5, Numbers 6:18–19
^ KJV 1 Corinthians 11:14–16
^ Irwin, M. Eleanor (Oct 1990). "Odysseus' "Hyacinthine Hair" in 'Odyssey' 6.231". Phoenix. 44 (3): 205–218. JSTOR 1088933. doi:10.2307/1088933. 
^ a b Nicolson, Frank W. (1891). "Greek and Roman Barbers". Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 2: 41–56. JSTOR 310326. 
^ Pliny the Elder at Perseus
^ Bartman, Elizabeth (Jan 2001). "Hair and the Artifice of Roman Female Adornment". American Journal of Archaeology. 105 (1): 1–25. JSTOR 507324. 
^ Felt, Joseph (1967). Customs of New England. New York: Burt Franklin. p. 187. ISBN 0-8337-1105-9. 
^ Connolly, Sean J (2007). "Prologue". Contested island: Ireland 1460–1630. Oxford University Press. p. 7. 
^ The Brehon Laws: A Legal Handbook: Chapter VII, Laurence Ginnell (1894)
^ Bartlett, Robert (1994). "Symbolic Meanings of Hair in the Middle Ages". Transactions of the Royal Historical Society. Sixth series. 4: 43–60. JSTOR 3679214. doi:10.2307/3679214. 
^ McManus, Howard Rollins (1989). The Battle of Cloids Mountain of Virginia, 1864. University of Michigan. p. 35. 
^ Whicker, Alan. Tonight: "Beatniks in Newquay". BBC, 1960.
^ a b c Bronski, Michael (2000), The Pleasure Principle: Sex, Backlash, and the Struggle for Gay Freedom, Stonewall Inn Editions, pp. 95–96, ISBN 0-312-25287-0 
^ Gossai, Hemchand; Murrell, Nathaniel (2000), Religion, Culture, and Tradition in the Caribbean, New York: St. Martin's Press, pp. 181–190, ISBN 0-312-23242-X 
^ Lu, Hsiao-Peng (1997), Transnational Chinese Cinemas, Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press, p. 229, ISBN 0-8248-1845-8 
^ Weinstein, Deena (2000), Heavy Metal, New York: Da Capo Press, p. 129, ISBN 0-306-80970-2 
^ Byrd, pp. 25–49
^ Synnott, Anthony (September 1987). "Shame and Glory: A Sociology of Hair". The British Journal of Sociology. 38 (3): 381–413. JSTOR 590695. doi:10.2307/590695. 
^ Taylor, Paul C. (1999). "Malcolm's Conk and Danto's Colors; Or, Four Logical Petitions concerning Race, Beauty, and Aesthetics". The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism. 57 (1): 16–20. JSTOR 432060. doi:10.2307/432060. 
^ Jones, Amelia (2003). The Feminism and Visual Culture Reader. New York: Routledge. p. 343. ISBN 0415267056
^ Robbins, C; Robbins, M. G. (2003). "Scalp hair length. I. Hair length in Florida theme parks: An approximation of hair length in the United States of America". Journal of cosmetic science. 54 (1): 53–62. PMID 12644859. 
^ Massad, Joseph (2001), Colonial Effects, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 137–140, 208–210, ISBN 0-231-12322-1 
^ Heper, Metin (1998), Ismet Inonu: the Making of a Turkish Statesman, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 153, ISBN 90-04-09919-0 
^ Sahih Muslim Book 30 Number 5773: "Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 7 Book 72 Number 788: "Narrated Al-Bara': I did not see anybody in a red cloak looking more handsome than the Prophet Narrated Malik: The hair of the Prophet used to hang near his shoulders. Narrated Shu'ba: The hair of the Prophet used to hang down to the earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128 : Narrated 'Abdullah bin 'Umar: Allah's Apostle said, "I saw myself (in a dream) near the Ka'ba last night, and I saw a man with whitish red complexion, the best you may see amongst men of that complexion having long hair reaching his earlobes which was the best hair of its sort, and he had combed his hair and water was dropping from it, and he was performing the Tawaf around the Ka'ba while he was leaning on two men or on the shoulders of two men. I asked, 'Who is this man?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, son of Mary.' Then I saw another man with very curly hair, blind in the right eye which looked like a protruding out grape. I asked, 'Who is this?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, Ad-Dajjal.'"
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128
^ Joseph, Suad; Najmabadi, Afsaneh (2005), Encyclopedia of Women & Islamic Cultures: Family, Body, Sexuality and Health, Volume 3, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 35, ISBN 90-04-12819-0 
^ Rashid, Ahmed (2002), Taliban: Islam, oil and the new great game in central Asia, I B Tauris & Co Ltd, p. 219, ISBN 1-86064-830-4 
^ Raghavan, Sudarsan (2006-10-06), "Another freedom cut short: Iraq's barbers under threat", The Washington Post, archived from the original on 2006-10-06 
^ "South Asia | Profile: Abdullah Mehsud". BBC News. 2007-07-24. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ "Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud threatens US months after 'death'". The Daily Telegraph. 2010-05-03. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ Wong, Edward (2005-08-22). "Iraq's Sufis attacked as strife widens". The New York Times. 
^ Kirk, Lowell (1999). "Cherokee Myths and Legends". Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Ferris, Jeri (1991), Native American Doctor, Minneapolis: Carolrhoda Books, pp. 32–33, ISBN 0-87614-443-1 
^ Kilcup, Karen (2000), Native American Women's Writing, C. 1800–1924, Cambridge: Blackwell Publishers, pp. 314–316, ISBN 0-631-20518-7 
^ Cavallo, Dominick (1999), A Fiction of the past, New York: St. Martin's Press, p. 90, ISBN 0-312-23501-1 
^ Nagel, Joane (1997), American Indian Ethnic Renewal, Oxford Oxfordshire: Oxford University Press, p. 191, ISBN 0-19-512063-9 
^ French, Laurence (2003), Native American Justice, Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Inc, pp. 113–117, ISBN 0-8304-1575-0 
^ Fontana, Vincent (2003), Municipal Liability, Aspen Law & Business Publishers, pp. 241–242, ISBN 0-7355-1375-9 
^ Hiernaux, Jean (1975). The People of Africa. Scribners. p. 59. ISBN 0684140403. 
^ Byrd, pp. 2–5
^ Prasso, Sheridan (2005), The Asian Mystique, New York: Public Affairs Press, pp. 115–116, ISBN 1-58648-214-9 
^ a b Reid, Anthony (1988). Southeast Asia in the Age of Commerce, 1450–1680. New Haven: Yale University Press. p. 82. ISBN 0-300-04750-9. 
^ a b Law, Kam-yee (2003), The Chinese Cultural Revolution Reconsidered: beyond purge and Holocaust, Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-73835-7 
^ "Olympic crackdown on China's bad habits". BBC News. August 6, 2007. Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Sherrow, Victoria (2006) Encyclopedia of hair: a cultural history, Greenwood Publishing Group. p. 242. ISBN 0313331456
^ The Tale of Genji, a novel about courtly life in medieval Japan.


Bibliography[edit]

Byrd, Ayana; Tharps, Lori (2002). Hair Story. New York: St. Martin's Griffin. ISBN 0-312-28322-9. 







v
t
e


Human hair




List of hairstyles / facial hairstyles



Classification




by type



Lanugo
Androgenic
Terminal
Vellus





by location



Nose
Ear
Eyebrow
Eyelash
Underarm
Chest
Abdominal
Pubic
Leg













v
t
e


Human hair color



Hair color



Black
Blond
Brown (varieties: Chestnut • Auburn)
Red (varieties: Auburn • Titian)
White/Grey





Hair coloring



Blue rinse
Grecian Formula
Hair dye stripping
Hair highlighting
Henna
Hydrogen peroxide
Blue hair





Other



Disappearing blonde gene
Fischer–Saller scale
Fischer scale
Melanocortin 1 receptor













Hairstyles



Afro
Asymmetric cut
Bangs
Beehive
Big hair
Blowout
Bob cut
Bouffant
Bowl cut
Braid or Plait
Brush cut
Bun (odango)
Bunches
Burr
Businessman cut
Butch cut
Buzz cut
Caesar cut
Chignon
Chonmage
Chupryna
Comb over
Conk
Cornrows
Crew cut
Crochet braids
Cropped hair
Croydon facelift
Curtained hair
Devilock
Dido flip
Digital perm
Dreadlocks
Duck's ass
Extensions
Feathered hair
Finger wave
Flattop
Fontange
French braid
French twist
Frosted tips
Harvard clip
High and tight
Hime cut
Historical Christian hairstyles
Hi-top fade
Induction cut
Ivy League
Jewfro
Jheri curl
Kiss curl
Layered hair
Liberty spikes
Long hair
Lob cut
Marcelling
Mod cut
Mohawk
Mullet
1950s
1980s
Pageboy
Part
Payot
Pigtail
Pixie cut
Pompadour
Ponytail
Punch perm
Princeton
Professional cut
Queue
Quiff
Rattail
Razor cut
Regular haircut
Regular taper cut
Ringlets
Shag
Shape-Up
Short back and sides
Short brush cut
Short hair
Spiky hair
Standard haircut
Surfer hair
Taper cut
Tonsure
Updo
Undercut
Waves
Wings





Facial hair



Beard
Chin curtain
Chinstrap
Designer stubble
Goatee
Moustache

Fu Manchu
handlebar
horseshoe
pencil
toothbrush
walrus


Neckbeard
Shenandoah
Sideburns
Soul patch
Van Dyke





Hair loss




Cosmetic



Removal

waxing
threading
plucking
chemical
electric
laser
IPL


Shaving

head
leg
cream
brush
soap


Razor

electric
safety
straight







other



Alopecia

areata
totalis
universalis


Male-pattern hair loss
Glabrousness
Hypertrichosis
Management
Trichophilia
Trichotillomania
Pogonophobia








Haircare Products



Brush
Clay
Clipper
Comb
Conditioner
Dryer
Gel
Hot comb
Iron
Mousse
Pomade
Relaxer
Rollers
Shampoo
Spray
Wax





Haircare Techniques



Backcombing
Crimping
Curly Girl Method
Perm
Shampoo and set
Straightening





Documentaries



My Nappy Roots: A Journey Through Black Hair-itage (2008)
Good Hair (2009)





Related Topics



Afro-textured hair
Bearded lady
Barber (pole)
Eponymous hairstyle
Good hair (phrase)
Hairdresser
Hair fetishism (pubic)
Hair follicle
Hair growth
Hypertrichosis
Trichotillomania










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Long_hair&oldid=791632801"					
Categories: HairstylesPejorative terms for peopleHeavy metal fashionHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from December 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014Articles with unsourced statements from June 2015Articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from June 2017Articles needing additional references from August 2014All articles needing additional referencesGood articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةBrezhonegDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisGalegoItalianoLietuvių日本語Simple EnglishไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 14:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Long hair - Wikipedia






















 







Long hair

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Hair length)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about human head hair. For other uses, see Longhair (disambiguation).




A man with shoulder length hair, 1599






A woman with waist length hair


Long hair is a hairstyle where the head hair is allowed to grow to considerable length. Exactly what constitutes long hair can change from culture to culture, or even within cultures. For example, a woman with chin-length hair in some cultures may be said to have short hair, while a man with the same length of hair in some of the same cultures would be said to have long hair.
Males having short, cut hair are in many cultures viewed as being under society's control, such as while in the military or prison or as punishment for a crime. Although recently in The United States it has become more socially acceptable and more common for men to have hair reaching all the way down to their upper back. Long, thick hair has been a sign of wealth, power or prominence throughout time and history.[citation needed]
Long lustrous female hair is generally rated attractive by both men and women across cultures.[1][2] The prevalence of trichophilia (hair partialism or fetishism) is 7% in the population, and very long hair is a common subject of devotion in this group.[3][4]



Contents


1 Biological significance
2 Psychological significance
3 Cultural meaning
4 Transferred meaning
5 Hair lengths

5.1 Maximum hair length


6 Cultural history

6.1 In Jewish and Christian scriptures
6.2 Western culture

6.2.1 Ancient Greece and Rome
6.2.2 Middle Ages
6.2.3 Recent trends among women
6.2.4 Recent trends among men
6.2.5 African Americans
6.2.6 Contemporary North America


6.3 Middle East

6.3.1 Judaism
6.3.2 Islam


6.4 Native Americans
6.5 Africa
6.6 Asia

6.6.1 China
6.6.2 Southeast Asia
6.6.3 Japan
6.6.4 Sikhism




7 See also
8 Images
9 References
10 Bibliography



Biological significance[edit]




A woman with mid-back level hair


Humans, horses, and orangutans are among the few species that may grow their head hair very long. Humans are believed to have lost their fur 2.5–3 million years ago as hominids when transitioning from a forest habitat to the open savanna, as an effect of natural selection, since this development made it possible to run fast and hunt animals close to the equator without getting overheated. An exception was however head hair, which was kept to provide thermal insulation of the scalp from the sun, to protect against ultra-violet radiation exposure, and also to provide cooling (when sweat evaporates from soaked hair).[citation needed] The ability to grow straight hair, has been observed among Homo sapiens sub-groups in less sunny regions further away from the equator. Relative to kinky Afro-textured hair, straight hair allows more UV light to pass to the scalp (which is essential for the production of vitamin D, that is important for bone development).
Scientists also view the ability to grow very long hair as a result of sexual selection, since long and healthy hair is a sign of fertility and youth.[5][need quotation to verify] An evolutionary biology explanation for this attraction is that hair length and quality can act as a cue to youth and health, signifying a woman's reproductive potential.[6] As hair grows slowly, long hair may reveal 2–3 years of a person's health status, nutrition, age and reproductive fitness. Malnutrition and deficiencies in minerals and vitamins due to starvation causes loss of hair or changes in hair color (e.g. dark hair turning reddish).[7]
Psychological significance[edit]
Anthropologists speculate that the functional significance of long head hair may be adornment, a by-product of secondary natural selection once other androgenic/somatic hair (body hair) had largely been lost. Another possibility is that long head hair is a result of Fisherian runaway sexual selection, where long lustrous hair is a visible marker for a healthy individual. For some groups or individuals, however, short hair is the selected trait.[5]
By seven to nine months, infants can tell the sexes apart based on hair length, voice pitch and faces.[8]
Cultural meaning[edit]
Ways of life often viewed as more rigid, such as soldiers and religious cultures, frequently have explicit rules regarding hair length. For example, Buddhist monks shave their heads as part of their order of worship.[9] Similarly, religious men with long hair include the Nazarites of the Hebrew Bible (Samson being a famous example)[10] and the Sikhs.[11] Subservient cultures may view male long hair negatively, and are sometimes detected by their rulers through hair length, as was the case with the Gaelic Irish under English rule and the Moors under Spanish rule in Medieval Spain.[clarification needed]
East Asian cultures have traditionally seen long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up in styles such as the ponytail, plait, or any bun.[12]
Transferred meaning[edit]
The traditional connotation of "long hair" in English meant, roughly, someone artistically knowledgeable or wise, an aesthete.[13] As a descriptive term, it has been applied to Merovingians and classical music enthusiasts, as well as hippies and aesthetes.[13]
Hair lengths[edit]







A Polish woman with armpit length hair








An american woman with mid back length hair








An Italian woman with waist length hair








A Sri Lankan woman with classic length hair








Tibetan woman with thigh-length hair








Manhattan woman with knee-length braided hair





Hair length is most often measured (in centimeters or inches) from the line of the scalp on the forehead up over the highest point of the skull to its termination, and sometimes from the crown, the latter resulting in 10 centimeter lower values in average.[14] In cosmetology, hair lengths are usually categorized according to the part of the body where the bulk of the longest hair terminates: chin level, shoulder length, lower shoulderblade/mid-back level, waist length, hip-length, classic length (extends to almost buttock-length, i.e. upper thigh-length, where the legs meet the buttocks), thigh-length, knee-length and ankle/floor length hair.[14][15]
Hair usually takes about two years to reach shoulder length,[16] and about seven years to reach waist-length/hip-length, including occasional trims (approximately 80–90 cm (32–36 inches) from forehead for most people) [15][16]
Maximum hair length[edit]




Portrait of Julie Manet by Renoir, 1894


The maximum hair length that is possible to reach is about 15 cm (6 in) for infants (below the age of 1), about 60 cm (24 in) for children, and generally 100 cm (40 in) for adults. Documentation for decrease of the maximum length with age cannot be found in the literature. Some individuals can reach excessive lengths. Lengths greater than 150 cm (59 in) are frequently observed in long hair contests.[17] Xie Qiuping had the longest documented hair in the world, measuring 5.627 m (18 ft 5.54 in) in May 2004.[18]
The maximum terminal hair length depends on the length of the anagen (period of hair growth) for the individual. Waist-length hair or longer is only possible to reach for people with long anagen. The anagen lasts between 2 and 7 years, for some individuals even longer, and follows by shorter catagen (transition) and telogen (resting) periods. At any given time, about 85% of hair strands are in anagen.[19] The fibroblast growth factor 5 (FGF5) gene affects the hair cycle in mammals including humans; blocking FGF5 in the human scalp (by applying a herbal extract that blocked FGF5) extends the hair cycle, resulting in less hair fall and increased hair growth.[20]
Cultural history[edit]
In Jewish and Christian scriptures[edit]



"She, as a veil down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned golden tresses wore
Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved,
As the vine curls her tendrils..."



– John Milton's description of Eve in Paradise Lost


In the Old Testament, the Nazirites would go for long periods of time without cutting their hair to show devotion to God.[21] Samson is one example; his strength depended upon his refraining from cutting his hair, described as worn in "seven locks".[10]
In the New Testament, Saint Paul (formerly Saul of Tarsus) wrote, "Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. But if any seem contentious, we have no such custom, neither do the churches of God."[22]
An interpretation from observing nature: The male animals such as the Lion have the longer hair than the female; thus it is not a shame for a man to have long hair.
Western culture[edit]
Ancient Greece and Rome[edit]
In ancient Greece, long male hair was a symbol of wealth and power, while a shaven head was appropriate for a slave. The ancient Greeks had several gods and heroes who wore their hair long, including Zeus, Achilles, Apollo, and Poseidon. Greek soldiers are said to have worn their hair long in battle. Such warriors considered it a sign of aristocracy and are said to have combed it openly in order to show off. Also, in order to keep enemies from getting a hold of it in battle, they were known to cut the front short, but leave it long in the back, where it was more out of reach. A widely held alternative interpretation of the conventional belief is that they kept it long, and simply tied it back in a style known as a ponytail in order to keep it out of their enemies' reach. The ponytail method allowed warriors, who often traveled to battle with a minimal amount of equipment in order to avoid excessively heavy loads over long marches, to keep their hair manageable with a small piece of string to hold their pony tail in place and a knife to cut the back to length with one simple slice. Around the sixth century, however, the Greek men shifted to shorter hairstyles, with the exception of the Spartans. Women in the culture remained with the longer style, which for them showed freedom, health, and wealth, as well as good behavior.[23] In men, it was considered a sign of false pride by this time.[24]
Pliny the Elder in his Natural History and Varro related that the Romans did not begin to cut their hair short until barbers were introduced to Italy from Sicily by P. Ticinius Mena in 299 BC.[25] Women in Roman times valued long hair, usually with a center part. Apart from in the earliest times, men's hair was usually shorter than women's, although other cultures of the time, such as Greeks in the east, considered long hair to be typical of philosophers, who were thought to be too engrossed in learning to bother with hair.[26] Strictly in the province of Rome, however, the shorter hairstyle was especially popular.[24] When Julius Caesar conquered the Gauls, who favored long hair, he ordered it to be cut short.[27]
Middle Ages[edit]
In the European middle ages, shorter hair often signified servitude and peasantry, while long hair was often attributed to freemen, as was the case with the Germanic Goths and Merovingians.
The Gaelic Irish (both men and women)[28] took great pride in their long hair—for example, a person could be heavily fined for cutting a man's hair short against his will.[29] When the Anglo-Normans and the English colonized Ireland, hair length came to signify one's allegiance. Irishmen who cut their hair short were deemed to be forsaking their Irish heritage. Likewise, English colonists who wore their hair long in the back were deemed to be forsaking their role as English subjects and giving in to the Irish life. Thus, hair length was one of the most common ways of judging a true Englishman in this period. Muslims in Christian areas were ordered to keep their hair short and parted, as their longer style was considered rebellious and barbaric.[30]




Empress Elisabeth of Austria wearing thigh-length hair in 1865. (Painting by Franz Xaver Winterhalter)


The long hair tradition was widespread among English and French men in the 11th and 12th centuries, though it was considered, mostly because of endorsement of the Roman Catholic Church, acceptable for men also to have shorter hair. The tradition was largely brought about by monarchs who rejected the shorter hairstyle, causing the people to follow. Wulfstan, a religious leader, worried that those with longer hair would fight like women, and be unable to protect England from foreign invasion. This idea can be found in later military leaders as well, such as those of the American Confederacy.[31] Knights and rulers would also sometimes cut or pull out their hair in order to show penitence and mourning, and a squire's hair was generally shorter than a knight's. Married women who let their hair flow out in public were frowned upon, as this was normally reserved for the unwed, although they were allowed to let it out in mourning, to show their distressed state. Through these centuries it was expected of Eastern Christians to wear long hair as well as long beards, which was especially expected from clergy and monks.
In England, during the English Civil Wars of 1642 to 1651, male hair length was emblematic of the disputes between Cavaliers and Roundheads (Puritans). Cavaliers wore longer hair, and were less religious-minded, thought of by the Roundheads as lecherous. The more devout Roundheads typically had somewhat shorter hair[9]
Around this time, long hair in England also came to be associated with adventurers who traveled to America and were familiar with the native culture there, short hair with less adventurous types.
Recent trends among women[edit]







The Seven Sutherland Sisters were singing and showing off their famous floor-length hair in a sideshow of Barnum & Bailey's from about 1882 to 1907.








Opera singer Mary Garden in 1908 with knee-length hair








Indonesian woman with waist-length hair









Dutch woman with thigh-length hair








Ngbandi girls with hip-length hair





Growing and wearing long hair was common among women in the Western world until World War One.[15] Long female hair never ceased in western culture, though it was rare during the 1920s and 1930s, and was frequent especially around 1970 and 1985.[citation needed]
In most current cultures, it is more typical for women to wear long hair than for men to do so. An American study shows significant correlation between hair length and age, which indicates that younger women tend to have longer hair than older women. A significant correlation was also found between women's hair length and hair quality. Moreover, hair quality was correlated with the women's perceived physical health. Consistent with principles of evolutionary psychology, these results indicate that hair length and quality can act as a cue to a woman's youth and health, signifying reproductive potential. The correlation between the woman's hair length and marital status, or number of children, was however not more than to be expected from the correlation between hair length and age.[6]
Recent trends among men[edit]




Long male hair in western youth culture became popular in the 1960s and 70s with The Beatles.






Bob Marley made rastafari culture and dreadlocks popular also outside Jamaica.


Before World War One men generally had longer hair and beards. However, short hair on men was introduced in World War One for soldiers. Slaves and defeated armies were often required to shave their heads. The trench warfare in 1914 to 1918 exposed men to flea and lice infestations, which prompted the order to cut short hair, establishing a military tradition,[15] and it expanded among civils by imitation.
Beat poets during the 1950s wore longer hairstyles. By 1960, a small "beatnik" community in Newquay, Cornwall, England (including a young Wizz Jones) had attracted the attention of their neighbors for growing their hair to a length past the shoulders, resulting in a television interview with Alan Whicker on BBC television's Tonight series.[32] The 1960s also introduced The Beatles, who started a more widespread longer hair trend. The social revolution of the 1960s led to a renaissance of unchecked hair growth,[15] and long hair, especially on men, was worn as a political or countercultural symbol or protest and as a symbol of masculinity. This cultural symbol extended to several Western countries in the Americas, Western Europe, South Africa, and Australia.[33] Specific long hairstyles such as dreadlocks have been part of counterculture movements seeking to define other alternative cultures and lifestyles since this time.[12] Longer hair in general remained popular due to the youth rebellion throughout the liberal decade of the 1960s.[33] The long hair trend grew with the spread of the hippie movement in the 1960s[33] and, in the 1970s, longer hair styles would become the norm among men and women.
In the 1970s, the popularity of Jamaica's reggae music and musician Bob Marley prompted interest in dreadlocks internationally. The anti-establishment philosophy of Rastafari, echoed in much of the reggae of the time, resonated with leaning youth of all ethnicities – especially and primarily among African Americans and other Blacks, but among counterculture whites as well.[34] Eastern Christians are encouraged[by whom?] to wear long hair with long beard. In the 1980s the view of long hair as a solitary signifier of political or counter-cultural identity was countered and parodied in films such as Rambo and many other militaristic heroes of media which challenged then-contemporary views of tradition.[35] In the 2000's longer hairstyles among men became popular among neopagans and rock enthusiasts;[36] for example, musicians in Metal bands and their fans often wear long hair. Long hair may be grown for the purpose of being donated to an organization, such as Locks of Love, for hairpieces to help those who could not have hair otherwise, such as those who are diagnosed with alopecia aerate. Today long hair has gained even more popularity. Even among mainstream men it is socially acceptable to have hair reaching around the upper back. This could in part be due to the "man bun" trend where men pull their shoulder length or longer hair back into a topknot Bun (hairstyle).
African Americans[edit]
When African slaves were freed in America, they struggled to reach the social status of whites. Many former slaves tried to conform their hairstyles as part of this struggle. Women, especially, felt pressure to make their hair long and oily, rather than keeping the shorter, tightly coiled style they had known.[37] However, during the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s, African-Americans such as Malcolm X advocated hairstyles such as afros and dreadlocks, in order to embrace their race, and to return to West African roots.[38]
Social pressures at the time were heavily influencing these Americans (women) to have long, straight hair, like white people did.[39] This resulted in the Black is beautiful movement, wherein African Americans wore long hair, that was however, untreated and unmodified. More recently, hair-extensions have become widespread. Scholars have pointed out the continued pressure on black women to have long, smooth hair. Amelia Jones points out that dolls for children, such as Barbies, add to this pressure, citing as an example a new, black Barbie with long hair. Blacks, she believes, should be able to be themselves without feeling pressured to "tame" their hair.[40]
Contemporary North America[edit]
1972, it was estimated that 24% of American women wore shoulder length hair or longer (44% of women in ages 14 to 44), meaning slightly more than 12% of men and women altogether. Similar frequency was found in 2001, when it was estimated that about 13% of the US adult population, male as well as females, has hair shoulder-length or longer, about 2.4% have hair reaching to the bottom of the shoulder blades or longer, about 0.3% have hair waist length or longer, and only about 0.017% have hair buttocks-length or longer.[41] By extrapolating the above data and the number of hair length records, the number of people with shoulder-length hair or longer in the USA is estimated to be 27 million, those with waist-length hair roughly 900,000, those with buttocks-length hair to be 40,000, with knee length hair to 2,000 and with ankle length hair to 70.[14]
Middle East[edit]
Judaism[edit]
Strict orthodox Judaism forbids men from cutting their sidelocks, but other hair may be kept as desired. Hair is not cut during a time of mourning. The Torah in Deuteronomy 14:1 prohibits removing hair in mourning for the dead.
Islam[edit]




Transjordanian Bedouin with shoulder length hair, during World War II


In the Muslim world, it seems the trend of hair styles is now favouring short over long in men. In the past, Bedouin Muslims often wore their hair in long braids, but influences from the Western world have caused a change in attitudes. Bedouins are now less likely to have long hair.[42] Islamic countries in North Africa such as Egypt view long hair in men as modernist and in one case the Egyptian police viewed it as Satanic and a sign of an infidel.[43] Spanish rulers during the Medieval Period suspected long-haired males to be Moors or Moriscos, therefore long hair was forbidden since it was believed to be a Moorish custom. However, modern North African men have adopted Western short hair.
Muslims regard the Prophet Muhammad as the best example to live by, and try to emulate him whenever possible. The Islamic Prophet Muhammad reportedly in Sahih Muslim had hair that "hung over his shoulders and earlobes".[44] Sahih Bukhari, regarded the most authentic of hadith, also supports this using a prime example of the prophet Isa (Jesus).[45] The Prophet Muhammad has also described Jesus as "having long hair reaching his ear lobes."[46] Malik's Muwatta 51.2.6 reported, Yahya related to me from Malik from Yahya ibn Said that Abu Qatada al-Ansari said to the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, "I have a lot of hair which comes down to my shoulders, shall I comb it? The Messenger of Allah. may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said, "Yes, and honour it." Sometimes Abu Qatada oiled it twice in one day because the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said to him. "Honour it."
With regards to women, neither Qur'an nor Sunnah explicitly state that women cannot cut their hair. Hadith does mention that women should not imitate men, and vice versa, and hence many scholars on this assumption, decree that women should let their hair grow longer than the hair of the Prophet, reaching beyond their shoulders, as hadith mentions that the Prophet had his hair between his shoulder and his earlobes. (He described Jesus's hair, which hung to his earlobes, as long.[47])
However, according to some hadiths regarding the rules of awrah, women are required to grow hair long, long enough that it would cover the breasts or as much awrah parts of the body when they're being buried, because she lacks clothes and long hair would be used as a covering instead.
Some Muslims are also opposed to men having long hair as it is also important in Islam to have clear differences (in appearance) between sexes. And generally these cultures encourage women to have long hair and men to have short hair.[48] The Taliban in Afghanistan viewed long hair for men as a western influence, and punished it by arrest and forced haircuts,[49] although this would be a direct contradiction of the sunnah of the Prophet. Similar measures have been taken by Islamists in Iraq.[50] In spite of this, several Taliban affiliated members of the Mehsud clan are recognisable by their long hair.[51][52] The Saudi Islamist fighter Amir Khattab was also notable for his long hair. Dervishes of some Sufi orders, such as the Kasnazani, often have long hair and whirl it around during rituals.[53]
Native Americans[edit]




Yakima boy with mid-back level hair. (Photo by Edward S. Curtis, 1868–1952.)


Many Native American men wore long hair before the arrival of western influences on their culture. (In Cherokee legends, for example, males said to be handsome were often described as having "long hair almost to the ground" or similar formulas.[54]). Both men and women of these cultures have frequently struggled to maintain their tradition but have faced heavy opposition. Many consider it a sign of giving in to western influences to have their hair cut.[55][56] Early American settlers saw long-haired, native men as rebelling against their civilized society. Mountain men and trappers who adopted the customs were also considered amoral, and often identified by their long hair.[57] Since the cultural movements of the Sixties and Seventies, however, Native Americans have felt less pressure to have short hair, as different movements have defended their cultural rights.[58] For example, several states have loosened prison regulations, allowing Native Americans to wear long hair during incarceration, along with other cultural allowances.[59] There has been resistance to these changes, however, as long hair is sometimes used to hide drugs, as well as to identify with a gang.[60]
Africa[edit]




Somali woman with shoulder-length hair.


Throughout much of Africa, afro-textured hair is the most frequent hair form, except among the Afro-Asiatic (Hamito-Semitic) speaking populations in North Africa and the Horn of Africa. In the latter regions, naturally long hair is instead more common.[61]
In West African cultures, women with long hair were highly valued. Long, thick hair was seen as a sign of health, strength, and capability to bear many children. In keeping with this general theme, women who were too young for marriage would shave a portion of their heads to signal so. This tradition, however, did not extend to every West African culture, as several valued shorter hair.[62]
Asia[edit]
Historically, East Asian cultures viewed long hair as a sign of youth and aesthetic beauty. Long hair is associated with private life and sexuality. East Asian cultures see long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up.[12] Lay Buddhists have long hair, while Buddhist monks have shaved heads.[9]







Japanese woman combing her long hair. (Colour woodblock print from 1920 by Hashiguchi Goyō.)








Illustration of The Tale of Genji, painted by Tosa Mitsuoki (1617–1691).








Chinese orthodox Christian man from 1874








Nosu girls in China 1922.








A hindoo "fakir" or Sadhu with long hair. Lithograph 1844 by Emily Eden after Lowes Cato Dickinson.





China[edit]
In ancient China and Korea, hair was regarded as a precious legacy from parents. Most people would never cut their hair after they became adults, and cutting off one's hair was a penalty for minor crimes. Both men and women would coil up their hair and many hair-coiling styles were developed.
Beginning in 1619, the ethnic Manchu Qing dynasty forced all men in China to adopt the queue: a long braid down the back with the hair near the forehead completely shaved. Hair length and style became a life-or-death matter in 1645 as the Manchu told them either their hair or their head would be cut. By 1651, the population of China had been reduced from 51 million to just 20 million, as a whole generation resisted the order for the sake of Confucian ideals against shaving or harming their hair.
Nearly every Han rebel group began by shearing this pigtail (most especially in the case of the Taiping, who were known in Chinese as the "Longhairs"), but the queue on penalty of death lasted until 1911, when the Chinese people cut their queues in unison at a time of rebellion. Americans at first judged Chinese immigrant laborers to be poor workers because their long hair brought an association with women.[63]
Islamic and Christian missionaries among the Chinese were strong advocates of shorter male hair for their converts.[64] Around the Destruction of Four Olds period in 1964, almost anything seen as part of Traditional Chinese culture would lead to problems with the Communist Red Guards. Items that attracted dangerous attention if caught in the public included jewelry and long male hair.[65] These things were regarded as symbols of bourgeois lifestyle, that represented wealth. People had to avoid them or suffer serious consequences such as tortures and beatings by the guards.[65] More recently, long hair was ridiculed in China from October 1983 to December 1983, as part of the short and unsuccessful Anti-Spiritual Pollution Campaign.[66]
Also, in Chinese ancient and modern poetry, long hair is a common symbol used by poets, for example Li Bai and Li Shangyin, to express their depression and sadness.
Southeast Asia[edit]
In Southeast Asia and Indonesia, male long hair was valued in until the seventeenth century, when the area adopted outside influences including Islam and Christianity. Invading cultures enforced shorter hairstyles on men as a sign of servitude, as well. They were also confused at the short hairstyles among women in certain areas, such as Thailand, and struggled to explain why women in the area had such short hair. They came up with several mythical stories, one of which involved a king who found a long hair in his rice and, in a rage, demanded that all women keep their hair short.[64]
In rural areas in certain Asian countries, for example India, girls still usually let their hair grow long, and knee-length hair is not unusual.[67]
Japan[edit]
In the medieval Japan, heian gentleman were not very interested in a woman's physical beauty and rarely had an opportunity to see it. The only physical attribute of interest was a woman's hair, which had to be thick and longer than she was tall. The fascination with long hair was one reason why a woman's becoming a nun was regarded with such seriousness — it could never again grow to its full length. This explains why Genji refuses to let Murasaki (his de facto wife in the classical Japanese novel The Tale of Genji) take the tonsure when she is ill.[68]
Sikhism[edit]
For Sikhs, Kesh is the practice of allowing one's hair to grow naturally as a symbol of devotion to God and lack of worldliness.[11]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (August 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The Sikhs were commanded by Guru Gobind Singh at the Baisakhi Amrit Sanchar in 1699 to wear long uncut hair called Kesh at all times to signify the strength and vitality of the Sikh people. This was one of the 'five requisites of faith', collectively called Kakars that form the external visible identifiers to clearly affirm a Sikh's commitment and dedication to the order (Hukam) of the tenth master and made one a member of the Khalsa. The Khalsa is the "Saint-Soldier" of Guru Gobind Singh who stated the following: "He does not recognize anyone else except One Lord, not even the bestowal of charities, performance of merciful acts, austerities and restraint on pilgrim-stations; the perfect light of the Lord illuminates his heart, then consider him as the immaculate Khalsa." (Guru Gobind Singh in the Dasam Granth page 1350)
The Kesh or unshorn long hair is an indispensable part of the human body as created by waheguru that is the mainstay of the 'Jivan Jaach' and the Rehni that was prescribed by Guru Gobind Singh Sahib by which a Sikh is clearly and quickly identified, Kesh. The kanga, another requisite of faith is usually tucked behind the "Rishi Knot" and tied under the turban. The uncut long head hair and the beard in the case of men forms the main kakar for the Sikhs.
KESADHARI, a term defining a Sikh as one who carries on his head the full growth of his kes (hair) which he never trims or cuts for any reason. Anyone, Sikh or non-Sikh, may keep the hair unshorn, but for the Sikh kes, unshorn hair, is a requisite of faith and an inviolable vow. The Sikh Rahit Maryada published by the Shiromani Gurdwara Prabandhak Committee, statutory body for the control and management of Sikh shrines and by extension for laying down rules about Sikh beliefs and practices, issued in 1945, after long and minute deliberations among Sikh scholars and theologians, defines a Sikh thus: Every Sikh who has been admitted to the rites of amrit, i.e. who has been initiated as a Sikh, must allow his hair to grow to its full length. This also applies to those born of Sikh families but [who] have not yet received the rites of amrit of the tenth master, Guru Gobind Singh. ".
See also[edit]

Grooming
Haircut
Hair extensions
Hair stick
Lady Godiva
Long hair fetishism, a form of Trichophilia
Rapunzel

Images[edit]

Female long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Female long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)

References[edit]


^ Buss, David M. (2005). The handbook of evolutionary psychology. John Wiley and Sons. p. 309. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3. 
^ Bereczkei, T. (2007). "Hair length, facial attractiveness, personality attribution; A multiple fitness model of hairdressing". Review of Psychology. 13 (1): 35–42. 
^ Scorolli, C; Ghirlanda, S; Enquist, M; Zattoni, S; Jannini, E A (2007). "Relative prevalence of different fetishes". International Journal of Impotence Research. 19 (4): 432–7. PMID 17304204. doi:10.1038/sj.ijir.3901547. 
^ "Heels top the global fetish leader board". England. 
^ a b Watson, James (2005). Darwin: the Indelible Stamp; the Evolution of an Idea. Philadelphia: Running Press. p. 1042. ISBN 0-7624-2136-3. 
^ a b Hinsz, Verlin B.; Matz, David C.; Patience, Rebecca A. (2001). "Does women's hair signal reproductive potential?". Journal of Experimental Social Psychology. 37 (2): 166. doi:10.1006/jesp.2000.1450. 
^ Sugiyama, Lawrence S. (2005) "Physical Attractiveness in Adaptationist Perspective", Chapter 10 in Buss, David M. (ed.) The Handbook of Evolutionary Psychology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3
^ Williams, Simon Johnson; Birke, Lynda I. A.; Bendelow, Gillian (2003). Debating biology: sociological reflections on health, medicine, and society. Routledge. p. 130. ISBN 0-415-27903-8. 
^ a b c Leach, E. R. (July 1958). "Magical Hair". Journal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. 88 (2): 147–164. JSTOR 2844249. doi:10.2307/2844249. 
^ a b Judges 13–16
^ a b Fowler, Jeaneane (1997). World Religions: an Introduction for Students. Brighton: Sussex Academic Press. p. 352. ISBN 1-898723-48-6. 
^ a b c Maynard, Margaret (2004), Dress and Globalisation, Manchester: Manchester University Press, p. 104, ISBN 0-7190-6389-2 
^ a b Oxford English Dictionary
^ a b c Clarence Robbins and Marjorie Gene Robbins, "Scalp hair length. II. Estimating the percentages of adults in the USA and larger populations by hari length." Journal of cosmetic science 54.4 (2003): 367–378.
^ a b c d e Gonzalez, Anthony (2007). Cosmetology. Global Media. p. 54. ISBN 81-89940-45-7. 
^ a b Hemat, R. A. S. (2007). Andropathy. Urotext. p. 375. ISBN 1-903737-08-7. 
^ Robbins, Clarence R. (2002). Chemical and physical behavior of human hair. Springer. ISBN 0-387-95094-X. 
^ Guinness World Records: Longest hair. guinnessworldrecords.com
^ Tortora & Derrickson (2012). Principles of Anatomy & Physiology (13 ed.). John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p. 163. 
^ Maeda, T.; Yamamoto, T.; Isikawa, Y.; Itoh, N.; Arase, S. (2007). "Sanguisorba Officinalis Root Extract Has FGF-5 Inhibitory Activity and Reduces Hair Loss by Causing Prolongation of the Anagen Period". Nishi Nihon Hifuka. 69: 81. doi:10.2336/nishinihonhifu.69.81. 
^ Numbers 6:5, Numbers 6:18–19
^ KJV 1 Corinthians 11:14–16
^ Irwin, M. Eleanor (Oct 1990). "Odysseus' "Hyacinthine Hair" in 'Odyssey' 6.231". Phoenix. 44 (3): 205–218. JSTOR 1088933. doi:10.2307/1088933. 
^ a b Nicolson, Frank W. (1891). "Greek and Roman Barbers". Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 2: 41–56. JSTOR 310326. 
^ Pliny the Elder at Perseus
^ Bartman, Elizabeth (Jan 2001). "Hair and the Artifice of Roman Female Adornment". American Journal of Archaeology. 105 (1): 1–25. JSTOR 507324. 
^ Felt, Joseph (1967). Customs of New England. New York: Burt Franklin. p. 187. ISBN 0-8337-1105-9. 
^ Connolly, Sean J (2007). "Prologue". Contested island: Ireland 1460–1630. Oxford University Press. p. 7. 
^ The Brehon Laws: A Legal Handbook: Chapter VII, Laurence Ginnell (1894)
^ Bartlett, Robert (1994). "Symbolic Meanings of Hair in the Middle Ages". Transactions of the Royal Historical Society. Sixth series. 4: 43–60. JSTOR 3679214. doi:10.2307/3679214. 
^ McManus, Howard Rollins (1989). The Battle of Cloids Mountain of Virginia, 1864. University of Michigan. p. 35. 
^ Whicker, Alan. Tonight: "Beatniks in Newquay". BBC, 1960.
^ a b c Bronski, Michael (2000), The Pleasure Principle: Sex, Backlash, and the Struggle for Gay Freedom, Stonewall Inn Editions, pp. 95–96, ISBN 0-312-25287-0 
^ Gossai, Hemchand; Murrell, Nathaniel (2000), Religion, Culture, and Tradition in the Caribbean, New York: St. Martin's Press, pp. 181–190, ISBN 0-312-23242-X 
^ Lu, Hsiao-Peng (1997), Transnational Chinese Cinemas, Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press, p. 229, ISBN 0-8248-1845-8 
^ Weinstein, Deena (2000), Heavy Metal, New York: Da Capo Press, p. 129, ISBN 0-306-80970-2 
^ Byrd, pp. 25–49
^ Synnott, Anthony (September 1987). "Shame and Glory: A Sociology of Hair". The British Journal of Sociology. 38 (3): 381–413. JSTOR 590695. doi:10.2307/590695. 
^ Taylor, Paul C. (1999). "Malcolm's Conk and Danto's Colors; Or, Four Logical Petitions concerning Race, Beauty, and Aesthetics". The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism. 57 (1): 16–20. JSTOR 432060. doi:10.2307/432060. 
^ Jones, Amelia (2003). The Feminism and Visual Culture Reader. New York: Routledge. p. 343. ISBN 0415267056
^ Robbins, C; Robbins, M. G. (2003). "Scalp hair length. I. Hair length in Florida theme parks: An approximation of hair length in the United States of America". Journal of cosmetic science. 54 (1): 53–62. PMID 12644859. 
^ Massad, Joseph (2001), Colonial Effects, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 137–140, 208–210, ISBN 0-231-12322-1 
^ Heper, Metin (1998), Ismet Inonu: the Making of a Turkish Statesman, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 153, ISBN 90-04-09919-0 
^ Sahih Muslim Book 30 Number 5773: "Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 7 Book 72 Number 788: "Narrated Al-Bara': I did not see anybody in a red cloak looking more handsome than the Prophet Narrated Malik: The hair of the Prophet used to hang near his shoulders. Narrated Shu'ba: The hair of the Prophet used to hang down to the earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128 : Narrated 'Abdullah bin 'Umar: Allah's Apostle said, "I saw myself (in a dream) near the Ka'ba last night, and I saw a man with whitish red complexion, the best you may see amongst men of that complexion having long hair reaching his earlobes which was the best hair of its sort, and he had combed his hair and water was dropping from it, and he was performing the Tawaf around the Ka'ba while he was leaning on two men or on the shoulders of two men. I asked, 'Who is this man?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, son of Mary.' Then I saw another man with very curly hair, blind in the right eye which looked like a protruding out grape. I asked, 'Who is this?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, Ad-Dajjal.'"
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128
^ Joseph, Suad; Najmabadi, Afsaneh (2005), Encyclopedia of Women & Islamic Cultures: Family, Body, Sexuality and Health, Volume 3, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 35, ISBN 90-04-12819-0 
^ Rashid, Ahmed (2002), Taliban: Islam, oil and the new great game in central Asia, I B Tauris & Co Ltd, p. 219, ISBN 1-86064-830-4 
^ Raghavan, Sudarsan (2006-10-06), "Another freedom cut short: Iraq's barbers under threat", The Washington Post, archived from the original on 2006-10-06 
^ "South Asia | Profile: Abdullah Mehsud". BBC News. 2007-07-24. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ "Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud threatens US months after 'death'". The Daily Telegraph. 2010-05-03. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ Wong, Edward (2005-08-22). "Iraq's Sufis attacked as strife widens". The New York Times. 
^ Kirk, Lowell (1999). "Cherokee Myths and Legends". Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Ferris, Jeri (1991), Native American Doctor, Minneapolis: Carolrhoda Books, pp. 32–33, ISBN 0-87614-443-1 
^ Kilcup, Karen (2000), Native American Women's Writing, C. 1800–1924, Cambridge: Blackwell Publishers, pp. 314–316, ISBN 0-631-20518-7 
^ Cavallo, Dominick (1999), A Fiction of the past, New York: St. Martin's Press, p. 90, ISBN 0-312-23501-1 
^ Nagel, Joane (1997), American Indian Ethnic Renewal, Oxford Oxfordshire: Oxford University Press, p. 191, ISBN 0-19-512063-9 
^ French, Laurence (2003), Native American Justice, Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Inc, pp. 113–117, ISBN 0-8304-1575-0 
^ Fontana, Vincent (2003), Municipal Liability, Aspen Law & Business Publishers, pp. 241–242, ISBN 0-7355-1375-9 
^ Hiernaux, Jean (1975). The People of Africa. Scribners. p. 59. ISBN 0684140403. 
^ Byrd, pp. 2–5
^ Prasso, Sheridan (2005), The Asian Mystique, New York: Public Affairs Press, pp. 115–116, ISBN 1-58648-214-9 
^ a b Reid, Anthony (1988). Southeast Asia in the Age of Commerce, 1450–1680. New Haven: Yale University Press. p. 82. ISBN 0-300-04750-9. 
^ a b Law, Kam-yee (2003), The Chinese Cultural Revolution Reconsidered: beyond purge and Holocaust, Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-73835-7 
^ "Olympic crackdown on China's bad habits". BBC News. August 6, 2007. Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Sherrow, Victoria (2006) Encyclopedia of hair: a cultural history, Greenwood Publishing Group. p. 242. ISBN 0313331456
^ The Tale of Genji, a novel about courtly life in medieval Japan.


Bibliography[edit]

Byrd, Ayana; Tharps, Lori (2002). Hair Story. New York: St. Martin's Griffin. ISBN 0-312-28322-9. 







v
t
e


Human hair




List of hairstyles / facial hairstyles



Classification




by type



Lanugo
Androgenic
Terminal
Vellus





by location



Nose
Ear
Eyebrow
Eyelash
Underarm
Chest
Abdominal
Pubic
Leg













v
t
e


Human hair color



Hair color



Black
Blond
Brown (varieties: Chestnut • Auburn)
Red (varieties: Auburn • Titian)
White/Grey





Hair coloring



Blue rinse
Grecian Formula
Hair dye stripping
Hair highlighting
Henna
Hydrogen peroxide
Blue hair





Other



Disappearing blonde gene
Fischer–Saller scale
Fischer scale
Melanocortin 1 receptor













Hairstyles



Afro
Asymmetric cut
Bangs
Beehive
Big hair
Blowout
Bob cut
Bouffant
Bowl cut
Braid or Plait
Brush cut
Bun (odango)
Bunches
Burr
Businessman cut
Butch cut
Buzz cut
Caesar cut
Chignon
Chonmage
Chupryna
Comb over
Conk
Cornrows
Crew cut
Crochet braids
Cropped hair
Croydon facelift
Curtained hair
Devilock
Dido flip
Digital perm
Dreadlocks
Duck's ass
Extensions
Feathered hair
Finger wave
Flattop
Fontange
French braid
French twist
Frosted tips
Harvard clip
High and tight
Hime cut
Historical Christian hairstyles
Hi-top fade
Induction cut
Ivy League
Jewfro
Jheri curl
Kiss curl
Layered hair
Liberty spikes
Long hair
Lob cut
Marcelling
Mod cut
Mohawk
Mullet
1950s
1980s
Pageboy
Part
Payot
Pigtail
Pixie cut
Pompadour
Ponytail
Punch perm
Princeton
Professional cut
Queue
Quiff
Rattail
Razor cut
Regular haircut
Regular taper cut
Ringlets
Shag
Shape-Up
Short back and sides
Short brush cut
Short hair
Spiky hair
Standard haircut
Surfer hair
Taper cut
Tonsure
Updo
Undercut
Waves
Wings





Facial hair



Beard
Chin curtain
Chinstrap
Designer stubble
Goatee
Moustache

Fu Manchu
handlebar
horseshoe
pencil
toothbrush
walrus


Neckbeard
Shenandoah
Sideburns
Soul patch
Van Dyke





Hair loss




Cosmetic



Removal

waxing
threading
plucking
chemical
electric
laser
IPL


Shaving

head
leg
cream
brush
soap


Razor

electric
safety
straight







other



Alopecia

areata
totalis
universalis


Male-pattern hair loss
Glabrousness
Hypertrichosis
Management
Trichophilia
Trichotillomania
Pogonophobia








Haircare Products



Brush
Clay
Clipper
Comb
Conditioner
Dryer
Gel
Hot comb
Iron
Mousse
Pomade
Relaxer
Rollers
Shampoo
Spray
Wax





Haircare Techniques



Backcombing
Crimping
Curly Girl Method
Perm
Shampoo and set
Straightening





Documentaries



My Nappy Roots: A Journey Through Black Hair-itage (2008)
Good Hair (2009)





Related Topics



Afro-textured hair
Bearded lady
Barber (pole)
Eponymous hairstyle
Good hair (phrase)
Hairdresser
Hair fetishism (pubic)
Hair follicle
Hair growth
Hypertrichosis
Trichotillomania










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Long_hair&oldid=791632801"					
Categories: HairstylesPejorative terms for peopleHeavy metal fashionHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from December 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014Articles with unsourced statements from June 2015Articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from June 2017Articles needing additional references from August 2014All articles needing additional referencesGood articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةBrezhonegDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisGalegoItalianoLietuvių日本語Simple EnglishไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 14:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Vyjayantimala)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Long hair - Wikipedia






















 







Long hair

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Hair length)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about human head hair. For other uses, see Longhair (disambiguation).




A man with shoulder length hair, 1599






A woman with waist length hair


Long hair is a hairstyle where the head hair is allowed to grow to considerable length. Exactly what constitutes long hair can change from culture to culture, or even within cultures. For example, a woman with chin-length hair in some cultures may be said to have short hair, while a man with the same length of hair in some of the same cultures would be said to have long hair.
Males having short, cut hair are in many cultures viewed as being under society's control, such as while in the military or prison or as punishment for a crime. Although recently in The United States it has become more socially acceptable and more common for men to have hair reaching all the way down to their upper back. Long, thick hair has been a sign of wealth, power or prominence throughout time and history.[citation needed]
Long lustrous female hair is generally rated attractive by both men and women across cultures.[1][2] The prevalence of trichophilia (hair partialism or fetishism) is 7% in the population, and very long hair is a common subject of devotion in this group.[3][4]



Contents


1 Biological significance
2 Psychological significance
3 Cultural meaning
4 Transferred meaning
5 Hair lengths

5.1 Maximum hair length


6 Cultural history

6.1 In Jewish and Christian scriptures
6.2 Western culture

6.2.1 Ancient Greece and Rome
6.2.2 Middle Ages
6.2.3 Recent trends among women
6.2.4 Recent trends among men
6.2.5 African Americans
6.2.6 Contemporary North America


6.3 Middle East

6.3.1 Judaism
6.3.2 Islam


6.4 Native Americans
6.5 Africa
6.6 Asia

6.6.1 China
6.6.2 Southeast Asia
6.6.3 Japan
6.6.4 Sikhism




7 See also
8 Images
9 References
10 Bibliography



Biological significance[edit]




A woman with mid-back level hair


Humans, horses, and orangutans are among the few species that may grow their head hair very long. Humans are believed to have lost their fur 2.5–3 million years ago as hominids when transitioning from a forest habitat to the open savanna, as an effect of natural selection, since this development made it possible to run fast and hunt animals close to the equator without getting overheated. An exception was however head hair, which was kept to provide thermal insulation of the scalp from the sun, to protect against ultra-violet radiation exposure, and also to provide cooling (when sweat evaporates from soaked hair).[citation needed] The ability to grow straight hair, has been observed among Homo sapiens sub-groups in less sunny regions further away from the equator. Relative to kinky Afro-textured hair, straight hair allows more UV light to pass to the scalp (which is essential for the production of vitamin D, that is important for bone development).
Scientists also view the ability to grow very long hair as a result of sexual selection, since long and healthy hair is a sign of fertility and youth.[5][need quotation to verify] An evolutionary biology explanation for this attraction is that hair length and quality can act as a cue to youth and health, signifying a woman's reproductive potential.[6] As hair grows slowly, long hair may reveal 2–3 years of a person's health status, nutrition, age and reproductive fitness. Malnutrition and deficiencies in minerals and vitamins due to starvation causes loss of hair or changes in hair color (e.g. dark hair turning reddish).[7]
Psychological significance[edit]
Anthropologists speculate that the functional significance of long head hair may be adornment, a by-product of secondary natural selection once other androgenic/somatic hair (body hair) had largely been lost. Another possibility is that long head hair is a result of Fisherian runaway sexual selection, where long lustrous hair is a visible marker for a healthy individual. For some groups or individuals, however, short hair is the selected trait.[5]
By seven to nine months, infants can tell the sexes apart based on hair length, voice pitch and faces.[8]
Cultural meaning[edit]
Ways of life often viewed as more rigid, such as soldiers and religious cultures, frequently have explicit rules regarding hair length. For example, Buddhist monks shave their heads as part of their order of worship.[9] Similarly, religious men with long hair include the Nazarites of the Hebrew Bible (Samson being a famous example)[10] and the Sikhs.[11] Subservient cultures may view male long hair negatively, and are sometimes detected by their rulers through hair length, as was the case with the Gaelic Irish under English rule and the Moors under Spanish rule in Medieval Spain.[clarification needed]
East Asian cultures have traditionally seen long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up in styles such as the ponytail, plait, or any bun.[12]
Transferred meaning[edit]
The traditional connotation of "long hair" in English meant, roughly, someone artistically knowledgeable or wise, an aesthete.[13] As a descriptive term, it has been applied to Merovingians and classical music enthusiasts, as well as hippies and aesthetes.[13]
Hair lengths[edit]







A Polish woman with armpit length hair








An american woman with mid back length hair








An Italian woman with waist length hair








A Sri Lankan woman with classic length hair








Tibetan woman with thigh-length hair








Manhattan woman with knee-length braided hair





Hair length is most often measured (in centimeters or inches) from the line of the scalp on the forehead up over the highest point of the skull to its termination, and sometimes from the crown, the latter resulting in 10 centimeter lower values in average.[14] In cosmetology, hair lengths are usually categorized according to the part of the body where the bulk of the longest hair terminates: chin level, shoulder length, lower shoulderblade/mid-back level, waist length, hip-length, classic length (extends to almost buttock-length, i.e. upper thigh-length, where the legs meet the buttocks), thigh-length, knee-length and ankle/floor length hair.[14][15]
Hair usually takes about two years to reach shoulder length,[16] and about seven years to reach waist-length/hip-length, including occasional trims (approximately 80–90 cm (32–36 inches) from forehead for most people) [15][16]
Maximum hair length[edit]




Portrait of Julie Manet by Renoir, 1894


The maximum hair length that is possible to reach is about 15 cm (6 in) for infants (below the age of 1), about 60 cm (24 in) for children, and generally 100 cm (40 in) for adults. Documentation for decrease of the maximum length with age cannot be found in the literature. Some individuals can reach excessive lengths. Lengths greater than 150 cm (59 in) are frequently observed in long hair contests.[17] Xie Qiuping had the longest documented hair in the world, measuring 5.627 m (18 ft 5.54 in) in May 2004.[18]
The maximum terminal hair length depends on the length of the anagen (period of hair growth) for the individual. Waist-length hair or longer is only possible to reach for people with long anagen. The anagen lasts between 2 and 7 years, for some individuals even longer, and follows by shorter catagen (transition) and telogen (resting) periods. At any given time, about 85% of hair strands are in anagen.[19] The fibroblast growth factor 5 (FGF5) gene affects the hair cycle in mammals including humans; blocking FGF5 in the human scalp (by applying a herbal extract that blocked FGF5) extends the hair cycle, resulting in less hair fall and increased hair growth.[20]
Cultural history[edit]
In Jewish and Christian scriptures[edit]



"She, as a veil down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned golden tresses wore
Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved,
As the vine curls her tendrils..."



– John Milton's description of Eve in Paradise Lost


In the Old Testament, the Nazirites would go for long periods of time without cutting their hair to show devotion to God.[21] Samson is one example; his strength depended upon his refraining from cutting his hair, described as worn in "seven locks".[10]
In the New Testament, Saint Paul (formerly Saul of Tarsus) wrote, "Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. But if any seem contentious, we have no such custom, neither do the churches of God."[22]
An interpretation from observing nature: The male animals such as the Lion have the longer hair than the female; thus it is not a shame for a man to have long hair.
Western culture[edit]
Ancient Greece and Rome[edit]
In ancient Greece, long male hair was a symbol of wealth and power, while a shaven head was appropriate for a slave. The ancient Greeks had several gods and heroes who wore their hair long, including Zeus, Achilles, Apollo, and Poseidon. Greek soldiers are said to have worn their hair long in battle. Such warriors considered it a sign of aristocracy and are said to have combed it openly in order to show off. Also, in order to keep enemies from getting a hold of it in battle, they were known to cut the front short, but leave it long in the back, where it was more out of reach. A widely held alternative interpretation of the conventional belief is that they kept it long, and simply tied it back in a style known as a ponytail in order to keep it out of their enemies' reach. The ponytail method allowed warriors, who often traveled to battle with a minimal amount of equipment in order to avoid excessively heavy loads over long marches, to keep their hair manageable with a small piece of string to hold their pony tail in place and a knife to cut the back to length with one simple slice. Around the sixth century, however, the Greek men shifted to shorter hairstyles, with the exception of the Spartans. Women in the culture remained with the longer style, which for them showed freedom, health, and wealth, as well as good behavior.[23] In men, it was considered a sign of false pride by this time.[24]
Pliny the Elder in his Natural History and Varro related that the Romans did not begin to cut their hair short until barbers were introduced to Italy from Sicily by P. Ticinius Mena in 299 BC.[25] Women in Roman times valued long hair, usually with a center part. Apart from in the earliest times, men's hair was usually shorter than women's, although other cultures of the time, such as Greeks in the east, considered long hair to be typical of philosophers, who were thought to be too engrossed in learning to bother with hair.[26] Strictly in the province of Rome, however, the shorter hairstyle was especially popular.[24] When Julius Caesar conquered the Gauls, who favored long hair, he ordered it to be cut short.[27]
Middle Ages[edit]
In the European middle ages, shorter hair often signified servitude and peasantry, while long hair was often attributed to freemen, as was the case with the Germanic Goths and Merovingians.
The Gaelic Irish (both men and women)[28] took great pride in their long hair—for example, a person could be heavily fined for cutting a man's hair short against his will.[29] When the Anglo-Normans and the English colonized Ireland, hair length came to signify one's allegiance. Irishmen who cut their hair short were deemed to be forsaking their Irish heritage. Likewise, English colonists who wore their hair long in the back were deemed to be forsaking their role as English subjects and giving in to the Irish life. Thus, hair length was one of the most common ways of judging a true Englishman in this period. Muslims in Christian areas were ordered to keep their hair short and parted, as their longer style was considered rebellious and barbaric.[30]




Empress Elisabeth of Austria wearing thigh-length hair in 1865. (Painting by Franz Xaver Winterhalter)


The long hair tradition was widespread among English and French men in the 11th and 12th centuries, though it was considered, mostly because of endorsement of the Roman Catholic Church, acceptable for men also to have shorter hair. The tradition was largely brought about by monarchs who rejected the shorter hairstyle, causing the people to follow. Wulfstan, a religious leader, worried that those with longer hair would fight like women, and be unable to protect England from foreign invasion. This idea can be found in later military leaders as well, such as those of the American Confederacy.[31] Knights and rulers would also sometimes cut or pull out their hair in order to show penitence and mourning, and a squire's hair was generally shorter than a knight's. Married women who let their hair flow out in public were frowned upon, as this was normally reserved for the unwed, although they were allowed to let it out in mourning, to show their distressed state. Through these centuries it was expected of Eastern Christians to wear long hair as well as long beards, which was especially expected from clergy and monks.
In England, during the English Civil Wars of 1642 to 1651, male hair length was emblematic of the disputes between Cavaliers and Roundheads (Puritans). Cavaliers wore longer hair, and were less religious-minded, thought of by the Roundheads as lecherous. The more devout Roundheads typically had somewhat shorter hair[9]
Around this time, long hair in England also came to be associated with adventurers who traveled to America and were familiar with the native culture there, short hair with less adventurous types.
Recent trends among women[edit]







The Seven Sutherland Sisters were singing and showing off their famous floor-length hair in a sideshow of Barnum & Bailey's from about 1882 to 1907.








Opera singer Mary Garden in 1908 with knee-length hair








Indonesian woman with waist-length hair









Dutch woman with thigh-length hair








Ngbandi girls with hip-length hair





Growing and wearing long hair was common among women in the Western world until World War One.[15] Long female hair never ceased in western culture, though it was rare during the 1920s and 1930s, and was frequent especially around 1970 and 1985.[citation needed]
In most current cultures, it is more typical for women to wear long hair than for men to do so. An American study shows significant correlation between hair length and age, which indicates that younger women tend to have longer hair than older women. A significant correlation was also found between women's hair length and hair quality. Moreover, hair quality was correlated with the women's perceived physical health. Consistent with principles of evolutionary psychology, these results indicate that hair length and quality can act as a cue to a woman's youth and health, signifying reproductive potential. The correlation between the woman's hair length and marital status, or number of children, was however not more than to be expected from the correlation between hair length and age.[6]
Recent trends among men[edit]




Long male hair in western youth culture became popular in the 1960s and 70s with The Beatles.






Bob Marley made rastafari culture and dreadlocks popular also outside Jamaica.


Before World War One men generally had longer hair and beards. However, short hair on men was introduced in World War One for soldiers. Slaves and defeated armies were often required to shave their heads. The trench warfare in 1914 to 1918 exposed men to flea and lice infestations, which prompted the order to cut short hair, establishing a military tradition,[15] and it expanded among civils by imitation.
Beat poets during the 1950s wore longer hairstyles. By 1960, a small "beatnik" community in Newquay, Cornwall, England (including a young Wizz Jones) had attracted the attention of their neighbors for growing their hair to a length past the shoulders, resulting in a television interview with Alan Whicker on BBC television's Tonight series.[32] The 1960s also introduced The Beatles, who started a more widespread longer hair trend. The social revolution of the 1960s led to a renaissance of unchecked hair growth,[15] and long hair, especially on men, was worn as a political or countercultural symbol or protest and as a symbol of masculinity. This cultural symbol extended to several Western countries in the Americas, Western Europe, South Africa, and Australia.[33] Specific long hairstyles such as dreadlocks have been part of counterculture movements seeking to define other alternative cultures and lifestyles since this time.[12] Longer hair in general remained popular due to the youth rebellion throughout the liberal decade of the 1960s.[33] The long hair trend grew with the spread of the hippie movement in the 1960s[33] and, in the 1970s, longer hair styles would become the norm among men and women.
In the 1970s, the popularity of Jamaica's reggae music and musician Bob Marley prompted interest in dreadlocks internationally. The anti-establishment philosophy of Rastafari, echoed in much of the reggae of the time, resonated with leaning youth of all ethnicities – especially and primarily among African Americans and other Blacks, but among counterculture whites as well.[34] Eastern Christians are encouraged[by whom?] to wear long hair with long beard. In the 1980s the view of long hair as a solitary signifier of political or counter-cultural identity was countered and parodied in films such as Rambo and many other militaristic heroes of media which challenged then-contemporary views of tradition.[35] In the 2000's longer hairstyles among men became popular among neopagans and rock enthusiasts;[36] for example, musicians in Metal bands and their fans often wear long hair. Long hair may be grown for the purpose of being donated to an organization, such as Locks of Love, for hairpieces to help those who could not have hair otherwise, such as those who are diagnosed with alopecia aerate. Today long hair has gained even more popularity. Even among mainstream men it is socially acceptable to have hair reaching around the upper back. This could in part be due to the "man bun" trend where men pull their shoulder length or longer hair back into a topknot Bun (hairstyle).
African Americans[edit]
When African slaves were freed in America, they struggled to reach the social status of whites. Many former slaves tried to conform their hairstyles as part of this struggle. Women, especially, felt pressure to make their hair long and oily, rather than keeping the shorter, tightly coiled style they had known.[37] However, during the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s, African-Americans such as Malcolm X advocated hairstyles such as afros and dreadlocks, in order to embrace their race, and to return to West African roots.[38]
Social pressures at the time were heavily influencing these Americans (women) to have long, straight hair, like white people did.[39] This resulted in the Black is beautiful movement, wherein African Americans wore long hair, that was however, untreated and unmodified. More recently, hair-extensions have become widespread. Scholars have pointed out the continued pressure on black women to have long, smooth hair. Amelia Jones points out that dolls for children, such as Barbies, add to this pressure, citing as an example a new, black Barbie with long hair. Blacks, she believes, should be able to be themselves without feeling pressured to "tame" their hair.[40]
Contemporary North America[edit]
1972, it was estimated that 24% of American women wore shoulder length hair or longer (44% of women in ages 14 to 44), meaning slightly more than 12% of men and women altogether. Similar frequency was found in 2001, when it was estimated that about 13% of the US adult population, male as well as females, has hair shoulder-length or longer, about 2.4% have hair reaching to the bottom of the shoulder blades or longer, about 0.3% have hair waist length or longer, and only about 0.017% have hair buttocks-length or longer.[41] By extrapolating the above data and the number of hair length records, the number of people with shoulder-length hair or longer in the USA is estimated to be 27 million, those with waist-length hair roughly 900,000, those with buttocks-length hair to be 40,000, with knee length hair to 2,000 and with ankle length hair to 70.[14]
Middle East[edit]
Judaism[edit]
Strict orthodox Judaism forbids men from cutting their sidelocks, but other hair may be kept as desired. Hair is not cut during a time of mourning. The Torah in Deuteronomy 14:1 prohibits removing hair in mourning for the dead.
Islam[edit]




Transjordanian Bedouin with shoulder length hair, during World War II


In the Muslim world, it seems the trend of hair styles is now favouring short over long in men. In the past, Bedouin Muslims often wore their hair in long braids, but influences from the Western world have caused a change in attitudes. Bedouins are now less likely to have long hair.[42] Islamic countries in North Africa such as Egypt view long hair in men as modernist and in one case the Egyptian police viewed it as Satanic and a sign of an infidel.[43] Spanish rulers during the Medieval Period suspected long-haired males to be Moors or Moriscos, therefore long hair was forbidden since it was believed to be a Moorish custom. However, modern North African men have adopted Western short hair.
Muslims regard the Prophet Muhammad as the best example to live by, and try to emulate him whenever possible. The Islamic Prophet Muhammad reportedly in Sahih Muslim had hair that "hung over his shoulders and earlobes".[44] Sahih Bukhari, regarded the most authentic of hadith, also supports this using a prime example of the prophet Isa (Jesus).[45] The Prophet Muhammad has also described Jesus as "having long hair reaching his ear lobes."[46] Malik's Muwatta 51.2.6 reported, Yahya related to me from Malik from Yahya ibn Said that Abu Qatada al-Ansari said to the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, "I have a lot of hair which comes down to my shoulders, shall I comb it? The Messenger of Allah. may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said, "Yes, and honour it." Sometimes Abu Qatada oiled it twice in one day because the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said to him. "Honour it."
With regards to women, neither Qur'an nor Sunnah explicitly state that women cannot cut their hair. Hadith does mention that women should not imitate men, and vice versa, and hence many scholars on this assumption, decree that women should let their hair grow longer than the hair of the Prophet, reaching beyond their shoulders, as hadith mentions that the Prophet had his hair between his shoulder and his earlobes. (He described Jesus's hair, which hung to his earlobes, as long.[47])
However, according to some hadiths regarding the rules of awrah, women are required to grow hair long, long enough that it would cover the breasts or as much awrah parts of the body when they're being buried, because she lacks clothes and long hair would be used as a covering instead.
Some Muslims are also opposed to men having long hair as it is also important in Islam to have clear differences (in appearance) between sexes. And generally these cultures encourage women to have long hair and men to have short hair.[48] The Taliban in Afghanistan viewed long hair for men as a western influence, and punished it by arrest and forced haircuts,[49] although this would be a direct contradiction of the sunnah of the Prophet. Similar measures have been taken by Islamists in Iraq.[50] In spite of this, several Taliban affiliated members of the Mehsud clan are recognisable by their long hair.[51][52] The Saudi Islamist fighter Amir Khattab was also notable for his long hair. Dervishes of some Sufi orders, such as the Kasnazani, often have long hair and whirl it around during rituals.[53]
Native Americans[edit]




Yakima boy with mid-back level hair. (Photo by Edward S. Curtis, 1868–1952.)


Many Native American men wore long hair before the arrival of western influences on their culture. (In Cherokee legends, for example, males said to be handsome were often described as having "long hair almost to the ground" or similar formulas.[54]). Both men and women of these cultures have frequently struggled to maintain their tradition but have faced heavy opposition. Many consider it a sign of giving in to western influences to have their hair cut.[55][56] Early American settlers saw long-haired, native men as rebelling against their civilized society. Mountain men and trappers who adopted the customs were also considered amoral, and often identified by their long hair.[57] Since the cultural movements of the Sixties and Seventies, however, Native Americans have felt less pressure to have short hair, as different movements have defended their cultural rights.[58] For example, several states have loosened prison regulations, allowing Native Americans to wear long hair during incarceration, along with other cultural allowances.[59] There has been resistance to these changes, however, as long hair is sometimes used to hide drugs, as well as to identify with a gang.[60]
Africa[edit]




Somali woman with shoulder-length hair.


Throughout much of Africa, afro-textured hair is the most frequent hair form, except among the Afro-Asiatic (Hamito-Semitic) speaking populations in North Africa and the Horn of Africa. In the latter regions, naturally long hair is instead more common.[61]
In West African cultures, women with long hair were highly valued. Long, thick hair was seen as a sign of health, strength, and capability to bear many children. In keeping with this general theme, women who were too young for marriage would shave a portion of their heads to signal so. This tradition, however, did not extend to every West African culture, as several valued shorter hair.[62]
Asia[edit]
Historically, East Asian cultures viewed long hair as a sign of youth and aesthetic beauty. Long hair is associated with private life and sexuality. East Asian cultures see long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up.[12] Lay Buddhists have long hair, while Buddhist monks have shaved heads.[9]







Japanese woman combing her long hair. (Colour woodblock print from 1920 by Hashiguchi Goyō.)








Illustration of The Tale of Genji, painted by Tosa Mitsuoki (1617–1691).








Chinese orthodox Christian man from 1874








Nosu girls in China 1922.








A hindoo "fakir" or Sadhu with long hair. Lithograph 1844 by Emily Eden after Lowes Cato Dickinson.





China[edit]
In ancient China and Korea, hair was regarded as a precious legacy from parents. Most people would never cut their hair after they became adults, and cutting off one's hair was a penalty for minor crimes. Both men and women would coil up their hair and many hair-coiling styles were developed.
Beginning in 1619, the ethnic Manchu Qing dynasty forced all men in China to adopt the queue: a long braid down the back with the hair near the forehead completely shaved. Hair length and style became a life-or-death matter in 1645 as the Manchu told them either their hair or their head would be cut. By 1651, the population of China had been reduced from 51 million to just 20 million, as a whole generation resisted the order for the sake of Confucian ideals against shaving or harming their hair.
Nearly every Han rebel group began by shearing this pigtail (most especially in the case of the Taiping, who were known in Chinese as the "Longhairs"), but the queue on penalty of death lasted until 1911, when the Chinese people cut their queues in unison at a time of rebellion. Americans at first judged Chinese immigrant laborers to be poor workers because their long hair brought an association with women.[63]
Islamic and Christian missionaries among the Chinese were strong advocates of shorter male hair for their converts.[64] Around the Destruction of Four Olds period in 1964, almost anything seen as part of Traditional Chinese culture would lead to problems with the Communist Red Guards. Items that attracted dangerous attention if caught in the public included jewelry and long male hair.[65] These things were regarded as symbols of bourgeois lifestyle, that represented wealth. People had to avoid them or suffer serious consequences such as tortures and beatings by the guards.[65] More recently, long hair was ridiculed in China from October 1983 to December 1983, as part of the short and unsuccessful Anti-Spiritual Pollution Campaign.[66]
Also, in Chinese ancient and modern poetry, long hair is a common symbol used by poets, for example Li Bai and Li Shangyin, to express their depression and sadness.
Southeast Asia[edit]
In Southeast Asia and Indonesia, male long hair was valued in until the seventeenth century, when the area adopted outside influences including Islam and Christianity. Invading cultures enforced shorter hairstyles on men as a sign of servitude, as well. They were also confused at the short hairstyles among women in certain areas, such as Thailand, and struggled to explain why women in the area had such short hair. They came up with several mythical stories, one of which involved a king who found a long hair in his rice and, in a rage, demanded that all women keep their hair short.[64]
In rural areas in certain Asian countries, for example India, girls still usually let their hair grow long, and knee-length hair is not unusual.[67]
Japan[edit]
In the medieval Japan, heian gentleman were not very interested in a woman's physical beauty and rarely had an opportunity to see it. The only physical attribute of interest was a woman's hair, which had to be thick and longer than she was tall. The fascination with long hair was one reason why a woman's becoming a nun was regarded with such seriousness — it could never again grow to its full length. This explains why Genji refuses to let Murasaki (his de facto wife in the classical Japanese novel The Tale of Genji) take the tonsure when she is ill.[68]
Sikhism[edit]
For Sikhs, Kesh is the practice of allowing one's hair to grow naturally as a symbol of devotion to God and lack of worldliness.[11]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (August 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The Sikhs were commanded by Guru Gobind Singh at the Baisakhi Amrit Sanchar in 1699 to wear long uncut hair called Kesh at all times to signify the strength and vitality of the Sikh people. This was one of the 'five requisites of faith', collectively called Kakars that form the external visible identifiers to clearly affirm a Sikh's commitment and dedication to the order (Hukam) of the tenth master and made one a member of the Khalsa. The Khalsa is the "Saint-Soldier" of Guru Gobind Singh who stated the following: "He does not recognize anyone else except One Lord, not even the bestowal of charities, performance of merciful acts, austerities and restraint on pilgrim-stations; the perfect light of the Lord illuminates his heart, then consider him as the immaculate Khalsa." (Guru Gobind Singh in the Dasam Granth page 1350)
The Kesh or unshorn long hair is an indispensable part of the human body as created by waheguru that is the mainstay of the 'Jivan Jaach' and the Rehni that was prescribed by Guru Gobind Singh Sahib by which a Sikh is clearly and quickly identified, Kesh. The kanga, another requisite of faith is usually tucked behind the "Rishi Knot" and tied under the turban. The uncut long head hair and the beard in the case of men forms the main kakar for the Sikhs.
KESADHARI, a term defining a Sikh as one who carries on his head the full growth of his kes (hair) which he never trims or cuts for any reason. Anyone, Sikh or non-Sikh, may keep the hair unshorn, but for the Sikh kes, unshorn hair, is a requisite of faith and an inviolable vow. The Sikh Rahit Maryada published by the Shiromani Gurdwara Prabandhak Committee, statutory body for the control and management of Sikh shrines and by extension for laying down rules about Sikh beliefs and practices, issued in 1945, after long and minute deliberations among Sikh scholars and theologians, defines a Sikh thus: Every Sikh who has been admitted to the rites of amrit, i.e. who has been initiated as a Sikh, must allow his hair to grow to its full length. This also applies to those born of Sikh families but [who] have not yet received the rites of amrit of the tenth master, Guru Gobind Singh. ".
See also[edit]

Grooming
Haircut
Hair extensions
Hair stick
Lady Godiva
Long hair fetishism, a form of Trichophilia
Rapunzel

Images[edit]

Female long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Female long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)

References[edit]


^ Buss, David M. (2005). The handbook of evolutionary psychology. John Wiley and Sons. p. 309. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3. 
^ Bereczkei, T. (2007). "Hair length, facial attractiveness, personality attribution; A multiple fitness model of hairdressing". Review of Psychology. 13 (1): 35–42. 
^ Scorolli, C; Ghirlanda, S; Enquist, M; Zattoni, S; Jannini, E A (2007). "Relative prevalence of different fetishes". International Journal of Impotence Research. 19 (4): 432–7. PMID 17304204. doi:10.1038/sj.ijir.3901547. 
^ "Heels top the global fetish leader board". England. 
^ a b Watson, James (2005). Darwin: the Indelible Stamp; the Evolution of an Idea. Philadelphia: Running Press. p. 1042. ISBN 0-7624-2136-3. 
^ a b Hinsz, Verlin B.; Matz, David C.; Patience, Rebecca A. (2001). "Does women's hair signal reproductive potential?". Journal of Experimental Social Psychology. 37 (2): 166. doi:10.1006/jesp.2000.1450. 
^ Sugiyama, Lawrence S. (2005) "Physical Attractiveness in Adaptationist Perspective", Chapter 10 in Buss, David M. (ed.) The Handbook of Evolutionary Psychology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3
^ Williams, Simon Johnson; Birke, Lynda I. A.; Bendelow, Gillian (2003). Debating biology: sociological reflections on health, medicine, and society. Routledge. p. 130. ISBN 0-415-27903-8. 
^ a b c Leach, E. R. (July 1958). "Magical Hair". Journal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. 88 (2): 147–164. JSTOR 2844249. doi:10.2307/2844249. 
^ a b Judges 13–16
^ a b Fowler, Jeaneane (1997). World Religions: an Introduction for Students. Brighton: Sussex Academic Press. p. 352. ISBN 1-898723-48-6. 
^ a b c Maynard, Margaret (2004), Dress and Globalisation, Manchester: Manchester University Press, p. 104, ISBN 0-7190-6389-2 
^ a b Oxford English Dictionary
^ a b c Clarence Robbins and Marjorie Gene Robbins, "Scalp hair length. II. Estimating the percentages of adults in the USA and larger populations by hari length." Journal of cosmetic science 54.4 (2003): 367–378.
^ a b c d e Gonzalez, Anthony (2007). Cosmetology. Global Media. p. 54. ISBN 81-89940-45-7. 
^ a b Hemat, R. A. S. (2007). Andropathy. Urotext. p. 375. ISBN 1-903737-08-7. 
^ Robbins, Clarence R. (2002). Chemical and physical behavior of human hair. Springer. ISBN 0-387-95094-X. 
^ Guinness World Records: Longest hair. guinnessworldrecords.com
^ Tortora & Derrickson (2012). Principles of Anatomy & Physiology (13 ed.). John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p. 163. 
^ Maeda, T.; Yamamoto, T.; Isikawa, Y.; Itoh, N.; Arase, S. (2007). "Sanguisorba Officinalis Root Extract Has FGF-5 Inhibitory Activity and Reduces Hair Loss by Causing Prolongation of the Anagen Period". Nishi Nihon Hifuka. 69: 81. doi:10.2336/nishinihonhifu.69.81. 
^ Numbers 6:5, Numbers 6:18–19
^ KJV 1 Corinthians 11:14–16
^ Irwin, M. Eleanor (Oct 1990). "Odysseus' "Hyacinthine Hair" in 'Odyssey' 6.231". Phoenix. 44 (3): 205–218. JSTOR 1088933. doi:10.2307/1088933. 
^ a b Nicolson, Frank W. (1891). "Greek and Roman Barbers". Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 2: 41–56. JSTOR 310326. 
^ Pliny the Elder at Perseus
^ Bartman, Elizabeth (Jan 2001). "Hair and the Artifice of Roman Female Adornment". American Journal of Archaeology. 105 (1): 1–25. JSTOR 507324. 
^ Felt, Joseph (1967). Customs of New England. New York: Burt Franklin. p. 187. ISBN 0-8337-1105-9. 
^ Connolly, Sean J (2007). "Prologue". Contested island: Ireland 1460–1630. Oxford University Press. p. 7. 
^ The Brehon Laws: A Legal Handbook: Chapter VII, Laurence Ginnell (1894)
^ Bartlett, Robert (1994). "Symbolic Meanings of Hair in the Middle Ages". Transactions of the Royal Historical Society. Sixth series. 4: 43–60. JSTOR 3679214. doi:10.2307/3679214. 
^ McManus, Howard Rollins (1989). The Battle of Cloids Mountain of Virginia, 1864. University of Michigan. p. 35. 
^ Whicker, Alan. Tonight: "Beatniks in Newquay". BBC, 1960.
^ a b c Bronski, Michael (2000), The Pleasure Principle: Sex, Backlash, and the Struggle for Gay Freedom, Stonewall Inn Editions, pp. 95–96, ISBN 0-312-25287-0 
^ Gossai, Hemchand; Murrell, Nathaniel (2000), Religion, Culture, and Tradition in the Caribbean, New York: St. Martin's Press, pp. 181–190, ISBN 0-312-23242-X 
^ Lu, Hsiao-Peng (1997), Transnational Chinese Cinemas, Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press, p. 229, ISBN 0-8248-1845-8 
^ Weinstein, Deena (2000), Heavy Metal, New York: Da Capo Press, p. 129, ISBN 0-306-80970-2 
^ Byrd, pp. 25–49
^ Synnott, Anthony (September 1987). "Shame and Glory: A Sociology of Hair". The British Journal of Sociology. 38 (3): 381–413. JSTOR 590695. doi:10.2307/590695. 
^ Taylor, Paul C. (1999). "Malcolm's Conk and Danto's Colors; Or, Four Logical Petitions concerning Race, Beauty, and Aesthetics". The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism. 57 (1): 16–20. JSTOR 432060. doi:10.2307/432060. 
^ Jones, Amelia (2003). The Feminism and Visual Culture Reader. New York: Routledge. p. 343. ISBN 0415267056
^ Robbins, C; Robbins, M. G. (2003). "Scalp hair length. I. Hair length in Florida theme parks: An approximation of hair length in the United States of America". Journal of cosmetic science. 54 (1): 53–62. PMID 12644859. 
^ Massad, Joseph (2001), Colonial Effects, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 137–140, 208–210, ISBN 0-231-12322-1 
^ Heper, Metin (1998), Ismet Inonu: the Making of a Turkish Statesman, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 153, ISBN 90-04-09919-0 
^ Sahih Muslim Book 30 Number 5773: "Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 7 Book 72 Number 788: "Narrated Al-Bara': I did not see anybody in a red cloak looking more handsome than the Prophet Narrated Malik: The hair of the Prophet used to hang near his shoulders. Narrated Shu'ba: The hair of the Prophet used to hang down to the earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128 : Narrated 'Abdullah bin 'Umar: Allah's Apostle said, "I saw myself (in a dream) near the Ka'ba last night, and I saw a man with whitish red complexion, the best you may see amongst men of that complexion having long hair reaching his earlobes which was the best hair of its sort, and he had combed his hair and water was dropping from it, and he was performing the Tawaf around the Ka'ba while he was leaning on two men or on the shoulders of two men. I asked, 'Who is this man?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, son of Mary.' Then I saw another man with very curly hair, blind in the right eye which looked like a protruding out grape. I asked, 'Who is this?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, Ad-Dajjal.'"
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128
^ Joseph, Suad; Najmabadi, Afsaneh (2005), Encyclopedia of Women & Islamic Cultures: Family, Body, Sexuality and Health, Volume 3, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 35, ISBN 90-04-12819-0 
^ Rashid, Ahmed (2002), Taliban: Islam, oil and the new great game in central Asia, I B Tauris & Co Ltd, p. 219, ISBN 1-86064-830-4 
^ Raghavan, Sudarsan (2006-10-06), "Another freedom cut short: Iraq's barbers under threat", The Washington Post, archived from the original on 2006-10-06 
^ "South Asia | Profile: Abdullah Mehsud". BBC News. 2007-07-24. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ "Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud threatens US months after 'death'". The Daily Telegraph. 2010-05-03. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ Wong, Edward (2005-08-22). "Iraq's Sufis attacked as strife widens". The New York Times. 
^ Kirk, Lowell (1999). "Cherokee Myths and Legends". Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Ferris, Jeri (1991), Native American Doctor, Minneapolis: Carolrhoda Books, pp. 32–33, ISBN 0-87614-443-1 
^ Kilcup, Karen (2000), Native American Women's Writing, C. 1800–1924, Cambridge: Blackwell Publishers, pp. 314–316, ISBN 0-631-20518-7 
^ Cavallo, Dominick (1999), A Fiction of the past, New York: St. Martin's Press, p. 90, ISBN 0-312-23501-1 
^ Nagel, Joane (1997), American Indian Ethnic Renewal, Oxford Oxfordshire: Oxford University Press, p. 191, ISBN 0-19-512063-9 
^ French, Laurence (2003), Native American Justice, Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Inc, pp. 113–117, ISBN 0-8304-1575-0 
^ Fontana, Vincent (2003), Municipal Liability, Aspen Law & Business Publishers, pp. 241–242, ISBN 0-7355-1375-9 
^ Hiernaux, Jean (1975). The People of Africa. Scribners. p. 59. ISBN 0684140403. 
^ Byrd, pp. 2–5
^ Prasso, Sheridan (2005), The Asian Mystique, New York: Public Affairs Press, pp. 115–116, ISBN 1-58648-214-9 
^ a b Reid, Anthony (1988). Southeast Asia in the Age of Commerce, 1450–1680. New Haven: Yale University Press. p. 82. ISBN 0-300-04750-9. 
^ a b Law, Kam-yee (2003), The Chinese Cultural Revolution Reconsidered: beyond purge and Holocaust, Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-73835-7 
^ "Olympic crackdown on China's bad habits". BBC News. August 6, 2007. Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Sherrow, Victoria (2006) Encyclopedia of hair: a cultural history, Greenwood Publishing Group. p. 242. ISBN 0313331456
^ The Tale of Genji, a novel about courtly life in medieval Japan.


Bibliography[edit]

Byrd, Ayana; Tharps, Lori (2002). Hair Story. New York: St. Martin's Griffin. ISBN 0-312-28322-9. 







v
t
e


Human hair




List of hairstyles / facial hairstyles



Classification




by type



Lanugo
Androgenic
Terminal
Vellus





by location



Nose
Ear
Eyebrow
Eyelash
Underarm
Chest
Abdominal
Pubic
Leg













v
t
e


Human hair color



Hair color



Black
Blond
Brown (varieties: Chestnut • Auburn)
Red (varieties: Auburn • Titian)
White/Grey





Hair coloring



Blue rinse
Grecian Formula
Hair dye stripping
Hair highlighting
Henna
Hydrogen peroxide
Blue hair





Other



Disappearing blonde gene
Fischer–Saller scale
Fischer scale
Melanocortin 1 receptor













Hairstyles



Afro
Asymmetric cut
Bangs
Beehive
Big hair
Blowout
Bob cut
Bouffant
Bowl cut
Braid or Plait
Brush cut
Bun (odango)
Bunches
Burr
Businessman cut
Butch cut
Buzz cut
Caesar cut
Chignon
Chonmage
Chupryna
Comb over
Conk
Cornrows
Crew cut
Crochet braids
Cropped hair
Croydon facelift
Curtained hair
Devilock
Dido flip
Digital perm
Dreadlocks
Duck's ass
Extensions
Feathered hair
Finger wave
Flattop
Fontange
French braid
French twist
Frosted tips
Harvard clip
High and tight
Hime cut
Historical Christian hairstyles
Hi-top fade
Induction cut
Ivy League
Jewfro
Jheri curl
Kiss curl
Layered hair
Liberty spikes
Long hair
Lob cut
Marcelling
Mod cut
Mohawk
Mullet
1950s
1980s
Pageboy
Part
Payot
Pigtail
Pixie cut
Pompadour
Ponytail
Punch perm
Princeton
Professional cut
Queue
Quiff
Rattail
Razor cut
Regular haircut
Regular taper cut
Ringlets
Shag
Shape-Up
Short back and sides
Short brush cut
Short hair
Spiky hair
Standard haircut
Surfer hair
Taper cut
Tonsure
Updo
Undercut
Waves
Wings





Facial hair



Beard
Chin curtain
Chinstrap
Designer stubble
Goatee
Moustache

Fu Manchu
handlebar
horseshoe
pencil
toothbrush
walrus


Neckbeard
Shenandoah
Sideburns
Soul patch
Van Dyke





Hair loss




Cosmetic



Removal

waxing
threading
plucking
chemical
electric
laser
IPL


Shaving

head
leg
cream
brush
soap


Razor

electric
safety
straight







other



Alopecia

areata
totalis
universalis


Male-pattern hair loss
Glabrousness
Hypertrichosis
Management
Trichophilia
Trichotillomania
Pogonophobia








Haircare Products



Brush
Clay
Clipper
Comb
Conditioner
Dryer
Gel
Hot comb
Iron
Mousse
Pomade
Relaxer
Rollers
Shampoo
Spray
Wax





Haircare Techniques



Backcombing
Crimping
Curly Girl Method
Perm
Shampoo and set
Straightening





Documentaries



My Nappy Roots: A Journey Through Black Hair-itage (2008)
Good Hair (2009)





Related Topics



Afro-textured hair
Bearded lady
Barber (pole)
Eponymous hairstyle
Good hair (phrase)
Hairdresser
Hair fetishism (pubic)
Hair follicle
Hair growth
Hypertrichosis
Trichotillomania










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Long_hair&oldid=791632801"					
Categories: HairstylesPejorative terms for peopleHeavy metal fashionHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from December 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014Articles with unsourced statements from June 2015Articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from June 2017Articles needing additional references from August 2014All articles needing additional referencesGood articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةBrezhonegDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisGalegoItalianoLietuvių日本語Simple EnglishไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 14:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












 Neetu Singhs Special Connection With Vyjayanthimala























msn  back to msn home

video










web search














Sign in








Change language and content:

América Latina (español)
Argentina (español)
Australia (English)
België (Nederlands)
Belgique (français)
Brasil (português)
Canada (English)
Canada (français)
Chile (español)
Colombia (español)
Danmark (Dansk)
Deutschland (Deutsch)
España (español)
France (français)
India (English)
Indonesia (Bahasa Indonesia)
Ireland (English)
Italia (italiano)
Malaysia (English)
México (español)
Nederland (Nederlands)
New Zealand (English)
Norge (norsk, bokmål)
Österreich (Deutsch)
Perú (español)
Philippines (English)
Polska (polski)
Portugal (Português)
Schweiz (Deutsch)
Singapore (English)
South Africa (English)
Suisse (français)
Suomi (suomi)
Sverige (svenska)
Türkiye (Türkçe)
United Arab Emirates (English)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
United States (español)
Venezuela (español)
Việt Nam (Tiếng Việt)
Ελλάδα (ελληνικά)
Россия (Pусский)
ישראל (עברית)‏
الإمارات العربية المتحدة (العربية‏)
المملكة العربية السعودية (العربية‏)
مصر (العربية‏)
ไทย (ไทย)
한국 (한국어)
中华人民共和国 (简体中文)
台灣 (繁體中文)
日本 (日本語)
香港特别行政區 (繁體中文)




 Feedback


























































































SETTINGS
OFF






HD
HQ
SD
LO

























































UP NEXT
Sussanne Khan Twinkle Khanna And Dimple Kapadia Spotted At Juhu






 Neetu Singhs Special Connection With Vyjayanthimala
                                    








Lehren



Duration: 02:10
08-07-2017





SHARE




SHARE




TWEET




SHARE




EMAIL







 Yesteryears actress Neetu Singh is celebrating her 59th birthday today. On the occasion of her birthday check out Neetu Singhs special connection with Vyjayanthimala. More videos http://www.lehren.com




 READ MORE
                                

 SEE LESS
                                









PLAYLIST




 Neetu Singhs Special Connection With Vyjayanthimala

 Lehren



        NOW PLAYING
    




 Sussanne Khan Twinkle Khanna And Dimple Kapadia Spotted At Juhu

 Lehren



        UP NEXT
    




 Gauahar Khan And Sania Mirza Spotted At A Restaurant

 Lehren





 Devon Ke Dev Actress Puja Banerjees Engagement Date REVEALED

 Lehren





 Suniel Shetty reacts on nepotism controversy

 Lehren





 Amjad Khans Biggest Weakness

 Lehren





 Shah Rukh Khan Is Interested In Making Love Not Watching It

 Lehren





 Ex Bigg Boss Contestant FLAUNTS Her Bikini Body

 Lehren





 Jhanvi Kapoor and Mom Sridevis SUPER COOL Vacation Look

 Lehren





 Shah Rukh KISS Anushka Publicly On A Romantic Dinner Date

 Lehren





 Shah Rukh Khans Mature Reaction On His Daughter Suhana Khans Paparazzi Incident

 Lehren





















More from Lehren






 Indu Sarkar MOVIE REVIEW

 Lehren

2:51




 Mubarakan Public Review

 Lehren

2:30




 Inder Kumar Talks About Bollywood Fitness Regime

 Lehren

3:15




 Akshay Reveals Secret Behind Toilet Ek Prem Katha Title

 Lehren

1:38




 Akshay Kumar To Keep Special Screening For PM Modi

 Lehren

0:48




 Raag Desh MOVIE REVIEW

 Lehren

2:48




 Shruti Hasaan And Her Boyfriend First Public Appearance Together

 Lehren

1:49




 Akshay Kumars SMART Reply On Insulting National Flag

 Lehren

1:03








 Anupam Kher Supports RJ Malishka Over Potholes BMC Controversy

 Lehren

1:48




 Inder Kumars First Interview On Masoom Movie On Location

 Lehren

1:39




 Akshay Kumar Teases Bhumi Pednekar On Being A Yash Raj Heroine

 Lehren

1:19




 Krystle Dsouza And Karan Tacker Party Together At Ekta Kapoors Lipstick Under My Burkha Success Bash

 Lehren

2:50




 Akshay Trolls A Reporter For Not Doing A Romantic Movies

 Lehren

1:27




 Anita Hassanandani And Rohit Reddy Attend Ekta Kapoors Lipstick Under My Burkha Success Party

 Lehren

1:12




 Salman Khans Wanted Actor Inder Kumar Passes Away

 Lehren

1:32




 Akshay Kumar Reacts On Piracy

 Lehren

0:45
















                Feedback
            







Found the story interesting?
Like us on Facebook to see similar stories


I am already a fan, don't show this again






Send Feedback
Provide Feedback
Report a Problem


We appreciate your input!



Select a category:

I am having problems with Top Destinations
I am having issues with searching
I am having problems with Featured Apps
I see an error in the content
Other



How we can improve?





Please give an overall site rating:









Submit
Close


Privacy Statement


Help


Help and Support

If you have any questions about MSN India, please contact our Grievance Officer at indiaGOMSN@microsoft.com | +91-11-46502222


 

















 





	EDGAR ONLINE - ELECTRONIC ARTS INC. - SEC FILINGS































                                     
                                




Welcome


                                                |
                                            

Help


                                                |
                                            

About EDGAR Online
                                                   


                                                |
                                            

 Login 















Dashboard 

Today 
Company

Industry

Search
Screener

Analytics




































ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.: EA  (Nasdaq Global Market)











Enter your Email to Learn More:  
                                 












Form






                         (Filer)
                    

                         Received

                        (
                        Period
                        
                        ) 
                    


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(SIMONSON RICHARD A) 
 07/27/17 (07/26/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(COLEMAN LEONARD S JR) 
 07/27/17 (07/26/17) 


8-K

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.
 07/27/17 (07/27/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(MOSS KENNETH A) 
 07/18/17 (07/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(JORGENSEN BLAKE J) 
 07/14/17 (07/13/17) 


8-K

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.
 07/11/17 (07/10/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(SODERLUND PATRICK) 
 07/06/17 (07/03/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(WILSON ANDREW) 
 07/06/17 (07/03/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(LINZNER JOEL) 
 07/06/17 (07/03/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(MIELE LAURA) 
 07/06/17 (07/03/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(BRUZZO CHRIS) 
 07/06/17 (07/03/17) 


CT ORDER

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.
 07/06/17 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(WILSON ANDREW) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(SINGH VIJAYANTHIMALA) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(SODERLUND PATRICK) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(LINZNER JOEL) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(MIELE LAURA) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(MOSS KENNETH A) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(SCHATZ JACOB J.) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 


4

ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.(BRUZZO CHRIS) 
 06/20/17 (06/16/17) 




                             
                        












             Results 1 - 20 of 2025




 


  
            
                    [1]
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
                
             
            Next 10 Pages


[ Show Next 20 Results ] 
























Last Trade













Last Trade: 
$118.06
                 
            
Change: 

0.46 (0.39%)
                 
            
Trade Time: 
03:41 PM EST
                 
            
Market Cap: 
$36.55B







Trade EA now with 























© 2017
                                
 
                                























                 
            











            © 1995-2017

EDGAR® Online, a division of Donnelley Financial Solutions
            All rights reserved  Solutions
                for Corporations 
            Terms of Use
             
                Privacy Statement













Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Vyjayanthimala Bali will return to the big screen - Entertainment
 



Health Tips


English News


Hindi News


Education


Board Results


Classifieds


Radio City
























App

E-Paper





































Mumbai



More in Mumbai



South Mumbai News


Western Suburbs News


Navi Mumbai News


Central Mumbai News


Thane News


East Mumbai News


North Mumbai News




Baywatch sham! Only 32 lifeguards for 10 lakh beachgoers in Mumbai




Mumbai Crime: Boss calls teen to pay pending dues, slashes her face




Mumbai Crime: Molester dad asked daughters to massage his private parts




Bollywood actor Inder Kumar passes away in Mumbai




Mumbai: Lack of land and tainted contractor kill Powai bird park







Entertainment



More in Entertainment



Bollywood News


Television News


Hollywood News


Movies


Movie Reviews


Regional Cinema News




Inder Kumar passes away: Raveena Tandon, other celebs express shock




Twinkle Khanna celebrates sister Rinke Khanna's birthday




Sanjay Dutt has a special birthday surprise for his daughter Trishala




Akshay Kumar admits that he was touched inappropriately as a child




Indu Sarkar Movie Review: Take the emergency exit







News



More in News



Mumbai News


Mumbai Rains


Crime News


National News


Hatke News 


International News


Columnists




Ghatkopar building collapse: How Shiv Sena goon Sunil Shitap got away




Mumbai Crime: Boss calls teen to pay pending dues, slashes her face




Ghatkopar building collapse: 17 dead, man buried alive for 7 hours




Mumbai: Serial molester's scooter model gives him away, nabbed




Mumbai: 82-year-old fights man who duped wife of Rs 1.14 crore







Photos



More in Photos



Entertainment galleries


News galleries


Sports galleries


Life and style galleries




Photos: Dolly Bindra, other celebs at Inder Kumar's last rites




Who was Inder Kumar? Salman Khan's 'Wanted' co-star passes away




Photos: Dia Mirza turns traditional at the India Couture Week




Photos: Soha Ali Khan flaunts her baby bump in style




Photos: 10 fake rape cases that will shock you!







Videos



More in Videos



Entertainment Videos


News Videos


Sports Videos




Watch video: 'Wanted' actor Inder Kumar passes away




Why Huma Qureshi should be a Body Positive Ambassador!




5 things Kriti Sanon cannot live without!




Will Madhur Bhandarkar's 'Indu Sarkar' cause an 'Aandhi'?




Sania Mirza praises Indian Women's cricket team







Sports



More in Sports



Cricket


Football


Tennis


Local Sports


Other Sports


Motor Sports




BCCI wants Indian cricket captain Virat Kohli to quit his job!




Cheteshwar Pujara: I don't need extra motivation to play cricket




India vs Sri Lanka: Another fine debut for Hardik Pandya




Brett Lee is postered and loving it!




Shikhar Dhawan: I wanted to be with family, but destiny had other plans for me







Life & Style



More in Life & Style



Horoscope


Relationships


Food


Technology


Cars-Bikes


Health


Travel


Sunday-midday


Dr. Love


Environment


People


Culture




Read your personal letters out loud at his performance




Tech: 5 WhatsApp features that make it an all-time favourite




Mumbai Food: 6 offbeat versions of the vada pav you must try




Learn to recreate vibrant tile patterns of Moroccan monuments on canvas




Talking to yourself may help control emotions effortlessly







Movies























Entertainment
			News
		




Bollywood
			News
		










Next
Vyjayanthimala Bali will return to the big screen
By Kunal M Shah
                    | Posted 03-Oct-2012Now Available on the mid-day iOS App, Download Now





Facebook


Twitter


Pintrest


Google+



Feedback
















   Renowned yesteryear actress Dr Vyjayanthimala Bali had taken to a self-imposed exile in the early ’70s and has never been seen on the celluloid ever since. The actress will finally return to the big screen to convey an important message in Sandeep Malani’s Janleva 555.      Malani says, “Producer Kalpana Pandit and I had approached the legendary Vyjayanthimalaji requesting her to lend her name to the project. The significance of the social message in the film is huge. We filmed her at her ancestral residence in Chennai.”    While talking about the film, the veteran adds, “I am glad to know that the film has been made to help acquire ventilator systems and supply to hospitals. It’s very useful for people in the villages and especially for children who die of snakebites. I request everybody to watch this film because it will be one of its kind.”    Kalpana, who also stars in the film, sums up, “There can be no bigger blessing for my maiden home production than receiving the good wishes of the first original superstar of Indian cinema.”  Sonu Sood to promote Janleva 555   Sonu Sood has decided to step up in support of Jaanleva 555 and will be leaving no stone unturned to promote the film. Prabhu Deva and dancer-turned-actress Sudha Chandran have also pledged their support for the film.  - Asira Tarannum 



Tags:

Sandeep Malani


Janleva 555


Dr Vyjayanthimala Bali


big screen


social cause


Bollywood






Facebook


Twitter


Pintrest


Google+


Feedback




Next Story Arjun Kapoor to work with father Boney in a Tamil remake 






Related Stories




Anant Nag returns to Bollywood after two-decade absence


Bollywood News | 06-Oct-2012





'I am Sridevi's greatest fan ever'


Bollywood News | 05-Oct-2012





Kalpana Pandit to make her Bollywood debut


Bollywood News | 03-Sep-2012










MORE FROM JAGRAN








0 Comments






Leave a Reply



Name *






Email *






Comment (You have 500 characters left)






Enter the text as shown in the image *


























Send Us Feedback
We value your feedback. Please provide us with  your suggestions and comments.






Send Us Your Feedback 

Help us understand what’s happening?Abusive contentIt’s a spam newsReport any site related issueThe user experience isn’t goodOther feedback & suggestion 



















TrEnding






Mumbai: How Sena goon terrorised collapsed Ghatkopar building residents


National News|28-Jul-2017








Mumbai: Speeding car falls off Bandra flyover, 1 dead


National News|27-Jul-2017








Gauri Khan goes sunbathing with Suhana and AbRam on beach


Bollywood News|27-Jul-2017








Revealed! The real reason why Mumait Khan left 'Bigg Boss'


Bollywood News|27-Jul-2017








Remember Rinke Khanna? The actress who disappeared from Bollywood


Bollywood News|27-Jul-2017








Photos: Twinkle Khanna's day out with BFF Anu Dewan


Bollywood News|27-Jul-2017








Swiggy scam: Even we got a hard deal, allege Mumbai restaurateurs


National News|27-Jul-2017








Mumbai Crime: Molester dad asked daughters to massage his private parts


National News|27-Jul-2017








Rosesh from 'Sarabhai vs Sarabhai' takes on Bharti Singh


Television News|27-Jul-2017








Feast like a king at the new Maharaja Bhog outlet in Lower Parel


Food News|27-Jul-2017








Mumbai: Renowned Ganpati idol maker Vijay Khatu passes away


National News|26-Jul-2017























Trending


Most ReaD


Most Commented







BCCI wants Indian cricket captain Virat Kohli to quit his job!


Cricket News|28-Jul-2017




Bollywood actor Inder Kumar passes away in Mumbai


Bollywood News|28-Jul-2017




Indu Sarkar Movie Review: Take the emergency exit


Bollywood News|28-Jul-2017




Mumbai: MNS workers target shops over Gujarati signboards


National News|28-Jul-2017






Rishi Kapoor slams 'Jagga Jasoos' director: Anurag Basu betrayed us


Bollywood  News|24-Jul-2017




Kangana Ranaut: If Saif Ali Khan is right, I would be a farmer


Bollywood  News|22-Jul-2017




Mumbai building collapse in Ghatkopar: 8 dead, over 50 trapped


National  News|26-Jul-2017




Swiggy scam: Even we got a hard deal, allege Mumbai restaurateurs


National  News|27-Jul-2017






Imagica accident: Injured mother-daughter duo in Mumbai hospital ICU


National  News|06-Feb-2014




CBSE cbse nic in Class 10th X Board Result 2014 to be declared today on www cbse nic in at 4 PM


National  News|20-May-2014




Online auto rickshaw permits: Results of 7 RTOs declared


National  News|26-Feb-2014




CBSE Results 2015: CBSE 10th Board (cbse.nic.in) X Class Results declared at 2 PM today, 28th May at cbseresults.nic.in


Board Exam Result  News|28-May-2015




2014 MHADA lottery: Flats in Virar will be ready only in Dec '15'


National  News|07-Feb-2014




See More Latest News




















 









                Home



                Mumbai



                News



                Entertainment



                Crime



                Sports



                Life & Style



                Photos



                Videos


























GET Updates from mid-day.com






View Site Map







Network: Hindi News | Gujrati News | Urdu NewsCopyright © 2017 Mid-Day Infomedia Ltd. All rights reserved.



          About Us | 
          Advertise with us | 
          Privacy Policy | 
          Terms and Conditions | 
          Contact Us | Corporate
          



Go to top





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      


Vijayanthimala  Singh - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Vijayanthimala  Singh
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Vijayanthimala  Singh. Find out Vijayanthimala  Singh address and contact details. View other people related to Vijayanthimala  Singh - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

209 REDWOOD SHORES PARKWAY  REDWOOD CITY 94065 CA




Companies related to Vijayanthimala  Singh
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0000712515ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.SVP, Chief People Officer 209 REDWOOD SHORES PARKWAY  REDWOOD CITY 94065




Vijayanthimala  Singh on the Web
Persons related to Vijayanthimala  Singh - ELECTRONIC ARTS INC.NamePositionCityM RICHARD  ASHERM RICHARD  ASHERDirector REDWOOD CITYKENNETH A  BARKERSVP, Chief Accounting Officer KENNETH A  BARKERVP Chief Accounting Officer REDWOOD CITYKENNETH A  BARKERSVP, Chief Accounting Officer REDWOOD CITYKENNETH A  BARKERSVP, Chief Accounting Officer REDWOOD CITYStephen G  BeneSVP and General Counsel REDWOOD CITYStephen G  BeneSVP and General Counsel REDWOOD CITYLucy  BradshawSVP, Maxis Studio REDWOOD CITYERIC F  BROWNEVP & Chief Financial Officer REDWOOD CITYChris  BruzzoEVP, Chief Marketing Officer SEATTLEChris  BruzzoEVP, Chief Marketing Officer REDWOOD CITYWILLIAM J  BYRONWILLIAM J  BYRONDirector REDWOOD CITYLEONARD S  COLEMAN JRDirector LEONARD S  COLEMAN JRDirector REDWOOD CITYLEONARD S  COLEMAN JRDirector REDWOOD CITYLEONARD S  COLEMAN JRDirector REDWOOD CITYLEONARD S  COLEMAN JRDirector REDWOOD CITYBARRY L  COTTLEEVP & GM, EA Interactive REDWOOD CITYBROWN  ERICREDWOOD CITYGERHARD  FLORINGERHARD  FLORINEVP Western Word Publishing REDWOOD CITYGERHARD  FLORINSVP, MD European Publishing REDWOOD CITYGIBEAU  FRANKREDWOOD CITYDAVID  GARDNEREVP, COO WWS REDWOOD CITYLAYBOURNE  GERALDINEREDWOOD CITYFrank  GibeauEVP, EA Mobile REDWOOD CITYFRANK D  GIBEAUPresident of EA Labels REDWOOD CITYMAFFEI  GREGORYREDWOOD CITYErick  HachenburgREDWOOD CITYJAY C  HOAGDirector PALO ALTORoche L Talbott  HoskinsDirector PLEASANTONJeff  HuberDirector REDWOOD CITYRODNEY  HUMBLEEVP, EA Play Label REDWOOD CITYRODNEY  HUMBLEEVP, EA Play Label REDWOOD CITYHUBER  JEFFREYREDWOOD CITYWARREN  JENSONEVP, CFO AND CAO REDWOOD CITYRICCITIELLO  JOHNREDWOOD CITYBlake J  JorgensenEVP & Chief Financial Officer SAN FRANCISCOBlake J  JorgensenEVP & Chief Financial Officer REDWOOD CITYJEFFREY S  KARPEVP, EA PLAY Label REDWOOD CITYRUTH A  KENNEDYRUTH A  KENNEDYEVP, General Counsel REDWOOD CITYGARY M  KUSINDirector REDWOOD CITYMITCHELL  LASKYEVP EA Mobile & Online REDWOOD CITYPROBST,  LAWRENCE IIIREDWOOD CITYGERALDINE B  LAYBOURNEDirector REDWOOD CITYV PAUL  LEEV PAUL  LEEPresident, Worldwide Studios REDWOOD CITYCOLEMAN  LEONARDREDWOOD CITYSRERE  LINDAREDWOOD CITYJOEL  LINZNEREVP Worldwide Business Affairs REDWOOD CITYJOEL  LINZNERSVP Business & Legal Affairs REDWOOD CITYJOEL  LINZNERSVP Business & Legal Affairs REDWOOD CITYJOEL  LINZNEREVP Business & Legal Affairs JOEL  LINZNEREVP Legal and Business Affairs REDWOOD CITY,JOEL  LINZNEREVP Legal & Business Affairs REDWOOD CITY,UBINAS  LUISREDWOOD CITYGREGORY B  MAFFEIGREGORY B  MAFFEIDirector REDWOOD CITYGREGORY B  MAFFEIDirector REDWOOD CITYMichael  MarchettiSVP & GM, EA Mobile REDWOOD CITYDON  MATTRICKPresident, Worldwide Studios REDWOOD CITYBRUCE  MCMILLANBRUCE  MCMILLANEVP Worldwide Studios REDWOOD CITYLaura  MieleEVP Global Publishing REDWOOD CITYPeter  MooreEVP & Chief Comp. Officer REDWOOD CITYPETER R.  MOOREChief Operating Officer REDWOOD CITYKenneth A  MossEVP, Chief Technology Officer REDWOOD CITYTIMOTHY  MOTTTIMOTHY  MOTTDirector REDWOOD CITYVivek  PaulDirector REDWOOD CITYVivek  PaulDirector REDWOOD CITYMOORE  PETERREDWOOD CITYROBERT W  PITTMANDirector REDWOOD CITYROBERT W  PITTMANDirector REDWOOD CITYROBERT W  PITTMANDirector REDWOOD CITYROBERT W  PITTMANDirector REDWOOD CITYROBERT W  PITTMANDirector REDWOOD CITYJOHN  PLEASANTSREDWOOD CITYJOHN  PLEASANTSPres., Global Publ & COO REDWOOD CITYLAWRENCE F  PROBST IIIDirector LAWRENCE F  PROBST IIIDirector REDWOOD CITYJOHN  RICCITIELLOCEO, Director REDWOOD CITYJOHN S.  RICCITIELLOChief Executive Officer REDWOOD CITYSIMONSON  RICHARDREDWOOD CITYJ RUSSELL  RUEFFEVP, Human Resources REDWOOD CITYJohn  SchappertChief Operating Officer REDWOOD CITYJacob J.  SchatzSVP and General Counsel REDWOOD CITYKRISTIAN  SEGERSTRALEEVP, Digital REDWOOD CITYRichard A  SimonsonDirector REDWOOD CITYVijayanthimala  SinghSVP, Chief People Officer REDWOOD CITYNANCY L  SMITHNANCY L  SMITHEVP, Global Publishing Org. REDWOOD CITYSAMANTHA S.  SMITHSVP, EA Mobile REDWOOD CITYPatrick  SoderlundEVP, EA Worldwide Studios REDWOOD CITYLINDA J  SREREDirector REDWOOD CITYRajat  TanejaEVP, Chief Technology Officer REDWOOD CITYGabrielle B  ToledanoEVP, Chief Talent Officer REDWOOD CITYLuis A  UbinasDirector REDWOOD CITYPAUL  VIVEKREDWOOD CITYKATHY P  VRABECKPres. EA Casual Entertainment REDWOOD CITYDenise  WarrenDirector REDWOOD CITYAndrew  WilsonChief Executive Officer REDWOOD CITY












 






Vyjayanthimala and Rajendra Kumar in a movie still.
()-()Java script disabled, please check your browser settings.IndiatimesThe Times of IndiaThe Economic TimesMoreMore : Times points
                                                        You are now a  Member on the Times Points program.Click here to know more about the Times Points program.HI, My TimesLOGOUTSign InFollow100 Yrs of Indian Cinema()-()HomeHomeCityIndiaWorldBusinessTechSportsEntertainmentTVLife & StyleWomenSpiritualityNRIPhotosVideosKamal Haasan’s daughter Akshara says she is still an atheist tho...Farmers stall EPE work in mutiple villages, arrestedArt of Living event on Yamuna: New panel gives different findingsNigerian national held in Juhu with drugsShivpal Yadav warns SP of forming Samajwadi Secular MorchaSRA row: Chavan demands probe, removal of housing ministerPETN explosive case: NIA team visits UP AssemblyCompelled, Karnataka govt asks BMRCL to remove HindiWhat is the link between firing on Vikram Goud and drugs?Assam flood damage 'very profound, large-scale': Central teamOppn protests in RS over 'abduction' of Cong Guj MLARJD MLAs protest against Nitish outside Bihar assemblyIllegal telephone exchange case: Dayanidhi Maran appears in CBI courtBihar fiasco may hit Rahul Gandhi's ascension plansHow BJP-JDU reunion came aboutTwo calls framed PM Modi - Nitish Kumar comfortBRICS NSAs meet to discuss cooperation in counter-terrorismNo plans to make Aadhaar mandatory for air tickets: Govt to MPsGermany warns US over Russia sanctionsN Korea fires missile which lands in sea off JapanOne dead in knife attack in Hamburg supermarketRussia hits back, orders US diplomats to leavePakistan's SC disqualifies finance minister Ishaq DarGulf crisis: Qatar won't 'outsource foreign policy'Republican Obamacare repeal bill fails in US SenateUS House approves spending bill to fund Trump border wallWH infighting turns ugly: Scaramucci vs PriebusMalware attack on MTNL broadband in DelhiPay Rs 579 crore in share transfer dispute, SC tells SpiceJetL&T Q1 net profit jumps 51% to Rs 1,028 croreGovernment may prefer another airline as Air India buyerGST compliance delays billing cycle for telecom companiesAnti-trust body raps Trai for stepping into its turfCrackdown against shell companies: I-T dept to share vital tax dataITC Q1 net profit up 7.37% to Rs 2,560.50 croreFacebook profit rises 71%, mobile ad sales up 50%Apple iPhone 7, iPhone 7 Plus price details revealed, goes up to...Apple slashes prices of iPhone 6s and iPhone 6s Plus by up to Rs 22,00...WhatsApp privacy policy challenged in Delhi High Court: 5 things to kn...Apple iOS 10 surpasses iOS 9 in early adoption in just 24 hoursFitbit Charge 2 review: Towards a healthier youApple iPhone 7, iPhone 7 Plus available for pre-order in IndiaApple CEO Tim Cook on India, Steve Jobs, missteps and moreRCom, Aircel announce merger; create fourth largest telco in IndiaInitial batches of iPhone 7 Plus sold out: Apple1st Test: Mukund, Kohli fifties stretch lead to 498Why not IPL broadcasting rights be e-auctioned: SC asks BCCIWill Chitra's London dream take flight?Day 3 talking points: The DRS debate and Perera's misfortuneFocussed on present, not thinking about past or future: MukundTelangana govt to give Rs 1 crore, house plot to Mithali RajWe need to be patient on court to win titles: Ashwini PonnappaBolt could reverse retirement decision: GatlinJhulan Goswami gets promotion after World Cup showTwinkle Khanna-Sussanne Khan celebrate Rinke Khanna's birthday‘Wanted’ actor Inder Kumar passes away Sushant throws surprise b’day party for KritiShruti & beau Michael at 'Raag Desh' screeningWhen Akshay Kumar suffered child abuseMovie review: Indu SarkarSonam Kapoor-Anand’s burger & basketball datesB'day special: 5 best Dhanush films you must watchSRK-Anushka head to Gokuldham societyAre you having your green tea right?Sex moves that’ll drive you both crazyArjun Rampal returns to ramp for Rohit Bal's showReview: The Rise of SivagamiIn conversation with Bollywood's favourite architectNew Star Wars stories releasing this winter!This coffee and coconut oil combination is helping people lose weight!5 real extra-marital affair confessionsFed up of skyrocketing tomato prices? Try these alternatives in your f...Two Sikh Americans killed in the USIndia's bureaucrats wedded to status quo: NRI author3 Indian-origin Muslims get prison for attacked on non-Muslims in UKTeam with a PIO scientist develops AI system that creates 3D models fr...Indian in US jailed for illegally selling silencers for gunsSikh man asked to take off kirpan while on a bus in AustraliaAllow women to sing hymns at Golden Temple, Sikh-Americans sayIndian-origin Muslim woman murdered in suspected honour killing in UKVisiting NRI takes on child molesters in KolkataPoonam sizzles in a music videoMalaika, Amrita slay in style...Neha Dhupia clicks selfieCelebs PDA caught on camera!Hawayein: Song launchSuchitra gets rape threatsDDCA defamation case: Ram Jethmalani cal...Himachal Pradesh: 44 dead after bus fall...After ‘triple talaq’, victim’s family th...Ex-NFL star Aaron Hernandez found dead i...Sonu Nigam hits out at fanatics, shaves ...Government abolishes red beacons for VIP...When Akshara aka Hina Khan had a reunion with her Yeh Rishta Kya...Nisha Rawal has an important tip for new momsWatch: Chandrakanta actress Kritika Kamra stars in a music videoA look at Madhubala actress Drashti Dhami's style evolutionBhavini Purohit launches her YouTube channelPrarthana Behere to tie the knot in NovemberWhen Harry Met Sejal actors Shah Rukh Khan, Anushka Sharma shoot with ...Did you know Inder Kumar played Mihir Virani oposite Smriti Irani on K...Bharti Singh to quit The Kapil Sharma Show soonFOLLOW TOIPhotosMoviesCelebsCELEBSBollywoodInternationalTamilTeluguMalayalamKannadaBengaliMarathiPunjabiCeleb ThemesSportsMusicRoyaltyB-town lends support to Nawazuddin Siddiqui, raise...Kangana Ranaut writes an open letter to Saif Ali K...Bobby DeolAnushka Sharma's Portfolio PicsBruna AbdullahRishi Kapoor slams Anurag Basu for ‘Jagga Jasoos’ ...Sara Ali KhanCelebs who left usFOLLOW US ONFashionFASHIONIndian ShowsForeign ShowsIndian-ModelsForeign-Models-in-IndiaForeign-ModelsDesignersFDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 4: Anju ModiFDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 3: Tarun Tahilia...FDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 2: Manav Gangwan...FDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 1: Rohit BalColombiamoda 2017 (Medellin)FUNKSHION Swim Fashion WeekVan Heusen's Innerwear & Athleisure collection sho...Shaadi by Marriott - Abu Jani and Sandeep KhoslaFOLLOW US ONBeauty PageantsBEAUTY PAGEANTSMiss IndiaMiss DivaMiss WorldMiss UniverseMiss InternationalMiss EarthMr. India WorldWorld-PageantsPamela Pasinetti wins Miss Grand Thailand 2017fbb Femina Miss India 2017 winners visit Fabellefbb Femina Miss India 2017: Red Carpetfbb Femina Miss India 2017: Performancesfbb Colors Femina Miss India 2017: Sub Contest win...Performances at fbb Colors Femina Miss India 2017 ...Miss India 2017: Srinidhi Shetty, Rohit Khandelwal...Ashley Powell wins Miss International UK 2017 titl...FOLLOW US ONAwardsAWARDSTOIFAFilmfare AwardsTimes Regional Film AwardsGolden Globe AwardsIIFATimes Food Guide Nightlife AwardsAcademy AwardsBAFTAMirchi Music AwardsGrammyIPL AwardsAwards and HonoursPlatino Awards 2017ESPYS AwardsKids' Choice Sports AwardsICC Women Achiever AwardsTimes Now NRI of the Year Awards '17Beirut International Awards Festivals 2017GQ's The 50 Most Influential Young IndiansSportsperson of the Year 2017FOLLOW US ONEventsEVENTSDelhiMumbaiKolkataBangaloreHyderabadChennaiPuneLucknowAhmedabadNagpurKanpurJaipurGoaKeralaChandigarhHawayein: Song launchRahul Bose’s initiative against child sexual abuseUrvashi launches jewellery lineRaag Desh: PromotionsCelebs at an eventAnsh Darshak Utsav InaugurationHimalayan Orchard Pure LaunchQaidi Band: Song LaunchFOLLOW US ONTVTVStarsShowsBehind-the-ScenesThe Kapil Sharma Show: On the setsGame Of Thrones: Indian TV celebs reveal their fav...Shweta MehtaDev: LaunchNoFilter Neha: Press ConferenceMTV Dropout Pvt. Ltd.: LaunchThe Drama Company: On the setsKhatron Ke Khiladi Season 8: ScreeningFOLLOW US ONSportsSPORTSCricketIPLTennisFootballBadmintonGolfHockeyF1Other SportsBasket-BallOlympicsEventsICC Women's World Cup 2017: India beat Australia t...Commonwealth Youth Games 2017: Opening CeremonyRoger Federer wins Wimbledon 2017FINA World Championships 2017Garbine Muguruza wins Wimbledon 2017Wimbledon: Venus Williams beats Johanna KontaGarbine Muguruza enters into Wimbledon semi-finalsRavi Shastri named new India coachFOLLOW US ONGadgetsGADGETSCelebs-and-TechComputersTabletsPhonesCamerasAccessoriesAppliancesServicesNews EventsUrvashi Rautela launches her own app named after h...Motorola unveils E4, E4plusAirtel announces 'Project Next'Huawei launches Honor 8 in IndiaShruti Hassan launches Philips Hue White AmbianceWorld Science Festival 2017Google I/O 2017Adah Sharma launches OPPO F3FOLLOW US ONLensLensFood DrinksBeauty HealthHome GardenTravelArdor Resto Bar and LoungeDaniell's TavernCocktails & DreamsThe Pint RoomCrostiniLatitudeTaramiThe Oriental BlossomFOLLOW US ONNewsNEWSIndiaWorldBusinessAutoEventsHeavy monsoon rains lash IndiaRam Nath Kovind sworn in as India’s 14th PresidentGujarat floods: PM Modi undertakes aerial survey o...Delhi Government asked Philip Morris to remove cig...Earthquake in Turkey and Greece leaves several dea...Ram Nath Kovind sweeps Presidential pollArmy organises 'Know your Army' campaignHeavy downpour disrupts normal life in several par...FOLLOW US ONHoli SpecialHOLI SPECIALVineet Jain's Holi Party 2015Vineet Jain's Zoom Holi PartyVineet Jain's Holi Party 2013Holi 2013Holi 2012Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2012Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2011Holi 2011Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2010Holi 2010Vineet Jain Holi Party 2009Vineet Jain Holi Party 2008Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 1Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 2Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 3Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 2Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 1Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 3Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 4Kesariee's hot Holi shootFOLLOW US ONBollywoodInternationalTamilTeluguMalayalamKannadaBengaliMarathiPunjabiBhojpuriPremiereFilm Festivals100 Yrs of Indian CinemaPhotos / Movies Gallery / 100 Yrs of Indian Cinema GalleryTrending Now :Ranbir KapoorKatrina KaifShah Rukh KhanKangana RanautSalman KhanAnushka SharmaHrithik RoshanPriyanka ChopraFOLLOW US ON:PhotosTOIVyjayanthimala's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian CinemaLast updated on - Aug 13, 2013PhotosTOIView Gallery From Startclose11 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796574.cms11Vyjayanthimala with co-star Prithviraj Kapoor during a photoshoot.Vyjayanthimala with co-star Prithviraj Kapoor during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, Prithviraj KapoorVyjayanthimala, Prithviraj KapoorVyjayanthimala with co-star Prithviraj Kapoor during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, Prithviraj KapoorVyjayanthimala, Prithviraj Kapoorfalse Photos: 12 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796563.cms12Vyjayanthimala caught unaware by the lensman during a photoshoot.Vyjayanthimala caught unaware by the lensman during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimala caught unaware by the lensman during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 13 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796562.cms13Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot.Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 14 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796561.cms14Vyjayanthimala poses with co-star Nutan (C)during a photoshoot.Vyjayanthimala poses with co-star Nutan (C)during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, NutanVyjayanthimala, NutanVyjayanthimala poses with co-star Nutan (C)during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, NutanVyjayanthimala, Nutanfalse Photos: 15 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796555.cms15An accomplished dancer, Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot.An accomplished dancer, Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaAn accomplished dancer, Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 16 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796546.cms16Dressed in a saree, kohl eyed Vyjayanthimala takes your breath away during the photoshoot.Dressed in a saree, kohl eyed Vyjayanthimala takes your breath away during the photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaDressed in a saree, kohl eyed Vyjayanthimala takes your breath away during the photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 17 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796542.cms17Veteran actress Vyjayanthimala during a movie still.Veteran actress Vyjayanthimala during a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaVeteran actress Vyjayanthimala during a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 18 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796533.cms18Evergreen beauty Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot.Evergreen beauty Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaEvergreen beauty Vyjayanthimala strikes a pose during a photoshoot. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 19 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796532.cms19Veteran actress Vyjayanthimala in a movie still.Veteran actress Vyjayanthimala in a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalaVeteran actress Vyjayanthimala in a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 VyjayanthimalaVyjayanthimalafalse Photos: 20 / 20/movies/100-yrs-of-indian-cinema/vyjayanthimalas-toi-archives-100-years-of-indian-cinema/eventshow/21796526.cms20Vyjayanthimala and Rajendra Kumar in a movie still.Vyjayanthimala and Rajendra Kumar in a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, Rajendra KumarVyjayanthimala, Rajendra KumarVyjayanthimala and Rajendra Kumar in a movie still. (BCCL)See more of :
								 Vyjayanthimala, Rajendra KumarVyjayanthimala, Rajendra Kumarfalse Photos: Related GalleriesMovies' first lookBazaar: On the setsDekh Kamon Lage: PremiereBus Stop: PremiereThe Black Prince: PremiereValerian and the City of a Thousand Planets: Premi...Munna Michael: ScreeningDunkirk: PremiereLandline: PremiereHema Malini's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian C...Amitabh Bachchan's personal album100 Yrs of Cinema: Legends felicitatedDev Anand's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian Cin...Rishi Kapoor's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian ...Saira Banu's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian Ci...Vyjayanthimala's TOI Archives - 100 Years of India...Sridevi's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian Cinem...Kishore Kumar's TOI Archives - 100 Years of Indian...From Around The WebRecommended by Colombia Featured GalleriesActor Inder Kumar passes awayElli Avram looks stunning in bikiniSridevi & Jhanvi's fun-filled vacationGauri, Suhana & AbRam on beachScroll DownNever miss a trending photoLike us on Facebook 
						   XTHE TIMES OF INDIAPowered by INDIATIMESAbout usAdvertise with usTerms of Use and Grievance Redressal PolicyPrivacy policyFeedbackRSSNewsletterTOI MobileePaperSitemapArchivesOther Times Group news sitesThe Economic Timesइकनॉमिक टाइम्स | ઈકોનોમિક ટાઈમ્સPune Mirror | Bangalore MirrorAhmedabad Mirror | ItsMyAscentEducation Times | Brand CapitalMumbai Mirror | Times NowIndiatimes | नवभारत टाइम्समहाराष्ट्र टाइम्स | ವಿಜಯ ಕರ್ನಾಟಕGo Green | NavGujarat SamayTamil Samayam | Telugu SamayamMalayalam SamayamLiving and entertainmentTimescity | iDiva | Entertainment | ZoomLuxpresso | Gadget Reviews | Online Songs | smartappInterest NetworkitimesTrending topicsWorld | PoliticsBusiness | SportsEntertainmentXiaomi MobileMotorola MobileServicesBook print ads | Online shoppingMatrimonial | Astrology | Jobs | Tech Community | Property | Buy carCars in India | Free Classifieds | Send money to India | Restaurants in Delhi | Movie Show Timings in Mumbai | Remit to India | Buy MobilesListen Songs | Real Estate Developers|Hindi News|Mobile Recharge|Compare Mobile PhonesCopyright © 2017 Bennett, Coleman & Co. Ltd. All rights reserved. For reprint rights: Times Syndication Service



Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.




















Year Ender 2015- The Times of India PhotogallerySTEPS FOR DISABLING AD BLOCKER()-()Java script disabled, please check your browser settings.IndiatimesThe Times of IndiaThe Economic TimesMoreMore : Times points
                                                        You are now a  Member on the Times Points program.Click here to know more about the Times Points program.HI, My TimesLOGOUTSign InFollowYear Ender 2015()-()HomeHomeCityIndiaWorldBusinessTechSportsEntertainmentTVLife & StyleWomenSpiritualityNRIPhotosVideosKamal Haasan’s daughter Akshara says she is still an atheist tho...Farmers stall EPE work in mutiple villages, arrestedArt of Living event on Yamuna: New panel gives different findingsNigerian national held in Juhu with drugsShivpal Yadav warns SP of forming Samajwadi Secular MorchaSRA row: Chavan demands probe, removal of housing ministerPETN explosive case: NIA team visits UP AssemblyCompelled, Karnataka govt asks BMRCL to remove HindiWhat is the link between firing on Vikram Goud and drugs?Assam flood damage 'very profound, large-scale': Central teamOppn protests in RS over 'abduction' of Cong Guj MLARJD MLAs protest against Nitish outside Bihar assemblyIllegal telephone exchange case: Dayanidhi Maran appears in CBI courtBihar fiasco may hit Rahul Gandhi's ascension plansHow BJP-JDU reunion came aboutTwo calls framed PM Modi - Nitish Kumar comfortBRICS NSAs meet to discuss cooperation in counter-terrorismNo plans to make Aadhaar mandatory for air tickets: Govt to MPsGermany warns US over Russia sanctionsN Korea fires missile which lands in sea off JapanOne dead in knife attack in Hamburg supermarketRussia hits back, orders US diplomats to leavePakistan's SC disqualifies finance minister Ishaq DarGulf crisis: Qatar won't 'outsource foreign policy'Republican Obamacare repeal bill fails in US SenateUS House approves spending bill to fund Trump border wallWH infighting turns ugly: Scaramucci vs PriebusMalware attack on MTNL broadband in DelhiPay Rs 579 crore in share transfer dispute, SC tells SpiceJetL&T Q1 net profit jumps 51% to Rs 1,028 croreGovernment may prefer another airline as Air India buyerGST compliance delays billing cycle for telecom companiesAnti-trust body raps Trai for stepping into its turfCrackdown against shell companies: I-T dept to share vital tax dataITC Q1 net profit up 7.37% to Rs 2,560.50 croreFacebook profit rises 71%, mobile ad sales up 50%Apple iPhone 7, iPhone 7 Plus price details revealed, goes up to...Apple slashes prices of iPhone 6s and iPhone 6s Plus by up to Rs 22,00...WhatsApp privacy policy challenged in Delhi High Court: 5 things to kn...Apple iOS 10 surpasses iOS 9 in early adoption in just 24 hoursFitbit Charge 2 review: Towards a healthier youApple iPhone 7, iPhone 7 Plus available for pre-order in IndiaApple CEO Tim Cook on India, Steve Jobs, missteps and moreRCom, Aircel announce merger; create fourth largest telco in IndiaInitial batches of iPhone 7 Plus sold out: Apple1st Test: Mukund, Kohli fifties stretch lead to 498Why not IPL broadcasting rights be e-auctioned: SC asks BCCIWill Chitra's London dream take flight?Day 3 talking points: The DRS debate and Perera's misfortuneFocussed on present, not thinking about past or future: MukundVivo Pro Kabaddi: Telugu Titans beat Tamil Thalaivas in openerVivo Pro Kabaddi: Puneri Paltan crush U MumbaTelangana govt to give Rs 1 crore, house plot to Mithali RajWe need to be patient on court to win titles: Ashwini PonnappaTwinkle Khanna-Sussanne Khan celebrate Rinke Khanna's birthday‘Wanted’ actor Inder Kumar passes away Sushant throws surprise b’day party for KritiShruti & beau Michael at 'Raag Desh' screeningWhen Akshay Kumar suffered child abuseMovie review: Indu SarkarSonam Kapoor-Anand’s burger & basketball datesB'day special: 5 best Dhanush films you must watchSRK-Anushka head to Gokuldham societyAre you having your green tea right?Sex moves that’ll drive you both crazyArjun Rampal returns to ramp for Rohit Bal's showReview: The Rise of SivagamiIn conversation with Bollywood's favourite architectNew Star Wars stories releasing this winter!This coffee and coconut oil combination is helping people lose weight!5 real extra-marital affair confessionsFed up of skyrocketing tomato prices? Try these alternatives in your f...Two Sikh Americans killed in the USIndia's bureaucrats wedded to status quo: NRI author3 Indian-origin Muslims get prison for attacked on non-Muslims in UKTeam with a PIO scientist develops AI system that creates 3D models fr...Indian in US jailed for illegally selling silencers for gunsSikh man asked to take off kirpan while on a bus in AustraliaAllow women to sing hymns at Golden Temple, Sikh-Americans sayIndian-origin Muslim woman murdered in suspected honour killing in UKVisiting NRI takes on child molesters in KolkataPoonam sizzles in a music videoMalaika, Amrita slay in style...Neha Dhupia clicks selfieCelebs PDA caught on camera!Hawayein: Song launchSuchitra gets rape threatsDDCA defamation case: Ram Jethmalani cal...Himachal Pradesh: 44 dead after bus fall...After ‘triple talaq’, victim’s family th...Ex-NFL star Aaron Hernandez found dead i...Sonu Nigam hits out at fanatics, shaves ...Government abolishes red beacons for VIP...When Akshara aka Hina Khan had a reunion with her Yeh Rishta Kya...Nisha Rawal has an important tip for new momsWatch: Chandrakanta actress Kritika Kamra stars in a music videoA look at Madhubala actress Drashti Dhami's style evolutionBhavini Purohit launches her YouTube channelPrarthana Behere to tie the knot in NovemberWhen Harry Met Sejal actors Shah Rukh Khan, Anushka Sharma shoot with ...Did you know Inder Kumar played Mihir Virani oposite Smriti Irani on K...Bharti Singh to quit The Kapil Sharma Show soonFOLLOW TOIPhotosMoviesMOVIESBollywoodInternationalTamilTeluguMalayalamKannadaBengaliMarathiPunjabiBhojpuriPremiereFilm FestivalsMovies' first lookBazaar: On the setsDekh Kamon Lage: PremiereBus Stop: PremiereThe Black Prince: PremiereValerian and the City of a Thousand Planets: Premi...Munna Michael: ScreeningDunkirk: PremiereFOLLOW US ONCelebsCELEBSBollywoodInternationalTamilTeluguMalayalamKannadaBengaliMarathiPunjabiCeleb ThemesSportsMusicRoyaltyB-town lends support to Nawazuddin Siddiqui, raise...Kangana Ranaut writes an open letter to Saif Ali K...Bobby DeolAnushka Sharma's Portfolio PicsBruna AbdullahRishi Kapoor slams Anurag Basu for ‘Jagga Jasoos’ ...Sara Ali KhanCelebs who left usFOLLOW US ONFashionFASHIONIndian ShowsForeign ShowsIndian-ModelsForeign-Models-in-IndiaForeign-ModelsDesignersFDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 4: Anju ModiFDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 3: Tarun Tahilia...FDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 2: Manav Gangwan...FDCI India Couture Week 2017: Day 1: Rohit BalColombiamoda 2017 (Medellin)FUNKSHION Swim Fashion WeekVan Heusen's Innerwear & Athleisure collection sho...Shaadi by Marriott - Abu Jani and Sandeep KhoslaFOLLOW US ONBeauty PageantsBEAUTY PAGEANTSMiss IndiaMiss DivaMiss WorldMiss UniverseMiss InternationalMiss EarthMr. India WorldWorld-PageantsPamela Pasinetti wins Miss Grand Thailand 2017fbb Femina Miss India 2017 winners visit Fabellefbb Femina Miss India 2017: Red Carpetfbb Femina Miss India 2017: Performancesfbb Colors Femina Miss India 2017: Sub Contest win...Performances at fbb Colors Femina Miss India 2017 ...Miss India 2017: Srinidhi Shetty, Rohit Khandelwal...Ashley Powell wins Miss International UK 2017 titl...FOLLOW US ONAwardsAWARDSTOIFAFilmfare AwardsTimes Regional Film AwardsGolden Globe AwardsIIFATimes Food Guide Nightlife AwardsAcademy AwardsBAFTAMirchi Music AwardsGrammyIPL AwardsAwards and HonoursPlatino Awards 2017ESPYS AwardsKids' Choice Sports AwardsICC Women Achiever AwardsTimes Now NRI of the Year Awards '17Beirut International Awards Festivals 2017GQ's The 50 Most Influential Young IndiansSportsperson of the Year 2017FOLLOW US ONEventsEVENTSDelhiMumbaiKolkataBangaloreHyderabadChennaiPuneLucknowAhmedabadNagpurKanpurJaipurGoaKeralaChandigarhHawayein: Song launchRahul Bose’s initiative against child sexual abuseUrvashi launches jewellery lineRaag Desh: PromotionsCelebs at an eventAnsh Darshak Utsav InaugurationHimalayan Orchard Pure LaunchQaidi Band: Song LaunchFOLLOW US ONTVTVStarsShowsBehind-the-ScenesThe Kapil Sharma Show: On the setsGame Of Thrones: Indian TV celebs reveal their fav...Shweta MehtaDev: LaunchNoFilter Neha: Press ConferenceMTV Dropout Pvt. Ltd.: LaunchThe Drama Company: On the setsKhatron Ke Khiladi Season 8: ScreeningFOLLOW US ONSportsSPORTSCricketIPLTennisFootballBadmintonGolfHockeyF1Other SportsBasket-BallOlympicsEventsICC Women's World Cup 2017: India beat Australia t...Commonwealth Youth Games 2017: Opening CeremonyRoger Federer wins Wimbledon 2017FINA World Championships 2017Garbine Muguruza wins Wimbledon 2017Wimbledon: Venus Williams beats Johanna KontaGarbine Muguruza enters into Wimbledon semi-finalsRavi Shastri named new India coachFOLLOW US ONGadgetsGADGETSCelebs-and-TechComputersTabletsPhonesCamerasAccessoriesAppliancesServicesNews EventsUrvashi Rautela launches her own app named after h...Motorola unveils E4, E4plusAirtel announces 'Project Next'Huawei launches Honor 8 in IndiaShruti Hassan launches Philips Hue White AmbianceWorld Science Festival 2017Google I/O 2017Adah Sharma launches OPPO F3FOLLOW US ONLensLensFood DrinksBeauty HealthHome GardenTravelArdor Resto Bar and LoungeDaniell's TavernCocktails & DreamsThe Pint RoomCrostiniLatitudeTaramiThe Oriental BlossomFOLLOW US ONNewsNEWSIndiaWorldBusinessAutoEventsHeavy monsoon rains lash IndiaRam Nath Kovind sworn in as India’s 14th PresidentGujarat floods: PM Modi undertakes aerial survey o...Delhi Government asked Philip Morris to remove cig...Earthquake in Turkey and Greece leaves several dea...Ram Nath Kovind sweeps Presidential pollArmy organises 'Know your Army' campaignHeavy downpour disrupts normal life in several par...FOLLOW US ONHoli SpecialHOLI SPECIALVineet Jain's Holi Party 2015Vineet Jain's Zoom Holi PartyVineet Jain's Holi Party 2013Holi 2013Holi 2012Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2012Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2011Holi 2011Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2010Holi 2010Vineet Jain Holi Party 2009Vineet Jain Holi Party 2008Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 1Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 2Vineet Jain's Holi Party 2017 - 3Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 2Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 1Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 3Vineet Jain's Holi Party '16 - 4Kesariee's hot Holi shootFOLLOW US ONPhotos / Year Ender 2015Trending Now :Ranbir KapoorKatrina KaifShah Rukh KhanKangana RanautSalman KhanAnushka SharmaHrithik RoshanPriyanka ChopraFOLLOW US ON:PhotosTOIYear Ender 2015Hot Pictures of 2015Personalities who bid adieu to their Career in 2015Top 25 Debutant Actors of 2015Celebrity weddings of 2015Best pictures of Royals from 2015Science & Technology in 2015Most 'Liked' Instagram photos of 2015Top Bollywood songs of 2015Top mobile devices of 2015Disasters that shook the world in 2015Top 25 Indian Filmmakers of 2015Best of oddly 2015Top 25 Movies in 2015Best dressed celebs of 2015Famous personalities who left us in 2015Popular English songs of 2015Best Phones launched under Rs10,000 this yearTop 25 Good Reads of 2015Best pictures of 2015Movie debacles of 2015Top Google searches of 2015THE TIMES OF INDIAPowered by INDIATIMESAbout usAdvertise with usTerms of Use and Grievance Redressal PolicyPrivacy policyFeedbackRSSNewsletterTOI MobileePaperSitemapArchivesOther Times Group news sitesThe Economic Timesइकनॉमिक टाइम्स | ઈકોનોમિક ટાઈમ્સPune Mirror | Bangalore MirrorAhmedabad Mirror | ItsMyAscentEducation Times | Brand CapitalMumbai Mirror | Times NowIndiatimes | नवभारत टाइम्समहाराष्ट्र टाइम्स | ವಿಜಯ ಕರ್ನಾಟಕGo Green | NavGujarat SamayTamil Samayam | Telugu SamayamMalayalam SamayamLiving and entertainmentTimescity | iDiva | Entertainment | ZoomLuxpresso | Gadget Reviews | Online Songs | smartappInterest NetworkitimesTrending topicsWorld | PoliticsBusiness | SportsEntertainmentXiaomi MobileMotorola MobileServicesBook print ads | Online shoppingMatrimonial | Astrology | Jobs | Tech Community | Property | Buy carCars in India | Free Classifieds | Send money to India | Restaurants in Delhi | Movie Show Timings in Mumbai | Remit to India | Buy MobilesListen Songs | Real Estate Developers|Hindi News|Mobile Recharge|Compare Mobile PhonesCopyright © 2017 Bennett, Coleman & Co. Ltd. All rights reserved. For reprint rights: Times Syndication Service










 





Long hair - Wikipedia






















 







Long hair

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Hair length)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about human head hair. For other uses, see Longhair (disambiguation).




A man with shoulder length hair, 1599






A woman with waist length hair


Long hair is a hairstyle where the head hair is allowed to grow to considerable length. Exactly what constitutes long hair can change from culture to culture, or even within cultures. For example, a woman with chin-length hair in some cultures may be said to have short hair, while a man with the same length of hair in some of the same cultures would be said to have long hair.
Males having short, cut hair are in many cultures viewed as being under society's control, such as while in the military or prison or as punishment for a crime. Although recently in The United States it has become more socially acceptable and more common for men to have hair reaching all the way down to their upper back. Long, thick hair has been a sign of wealth, power or prominence throughout time and history.[citation needed]
Long lustrous female hair is generally rated attractive by both men and women across cultures.[1][2] The prevalence of trichophilia (hair partialism or fetishism) is 7% in the population, and very long hair is a common subject of devotion in this group.[3][4]



Contents


1 Biological significance
2 Psychological significance
3 Cultural meaning
4 Transferred meaning
5 Hair lengths

5.1 Maximum hair length


6 Cultural history

6.1 In Jewish and Christian scriptures
6.2 Western culture

6.2.1 Ancient Greece and Rome
6.2.2 Middle Ages
6.2.3 Recent trends among women
6.2.4 Recent trends among men
6.2.5 African Americans
6.2.6 Contemporary North America


6.3 Middle East

6.3.1 Judaism
6.3.2 Islam


6.4 Native Americans
6.5 Africa
6.6 Asia

6.6.1 China
6.6.2 Southeast Asia
6.6.3 Japan
6.6.4 Sikhism




7 See also
8 Images
9 References
10 Bibliography



Biological significance[edit]




A woman with mid-back level hair


Humans, horses, and orangutans are among the few species that may grow their head hair very long. Humans are believed to have lost their fur 2.5–3 million years ago as hominids when transitioning from a forest habitat to the open savanna, as an effect of natural selection, since this development made it possible to run fast and hunt animals close to the equator without getting overheated. An exception was however head hair, which was kept to provide thermal insulation of the scalp from the sun, to protect against ultra-violet radiation exposure, and also to provide cooling (when sweat evaporates from soaked hair).[citation needed] The ability to grow straight hair, has been observed among Homo sapiens sub-groups in less sunny regions further away from the equator. Relative to kinky Afro-textured hair, straight hair allows more UV light to pass to the scalp (which is essential for the production of vitamin D, that is important for bone development).
Scientists also view the ability to grow very long hair as a result of sexual selection, since long and healthy hair is a sign of fertility and youth.[5][need quotation to verify] An evolutionary biology explanation for this attraction is that hair length and quality can act as a cue to youth and health, signifying a woman's reproductive potential.[6] As hair grows slowly, long hair may reveal 2–3 years of a person's health status, nutrition, age and reproductive fitness. Malnutrition and deficiencies in minerals and vitamins due to starvation causes loss of hair or changes in hair color (e.g. dark hair turning reddish).[7]
Psychological significance[edit]
Anthropologists speculate that the functional significance of long head hair may be adornment, a by-product of secondary natural selection once other androgenic/somatic hair (body hair) had largely been lost. Another possibility is that long head hair is a result of Fisherian runaway sexual selection, where long lustrous hair is a visible marker for a healthy individual. For some groups or individuals, however, short hair is the selected trait.[5]
By seven to nine months, infants can tell the sexes apart based on hair length, voice pitch and faces.[8]
Cultural meaning[edit]
Ways of life often viewed as more rigid, such as soldiers and religious cultures, frequently have explicit rules regarding hair length. For example, Buddhist monks shave their heads as part of their order of worship.[9] Similarly, religious men with long hair include the Nazarites of the Hebrew Bible (Samson being a famous example)[10] and the Sikhs.[11] Subservient cultures may view male long hair negatively, and are sometimes detected by their rulers through hair length, as was the case with the Gaelic Irish under English rule and the Moors under Spanish rule in Medieval Spain.[clarification needed]
East Asian cultures have traditionally seen long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up in styles such as the ponytail, plait, or any bun.[12]
Transferred meaning[edit]
The traditional connotation of "long hair" in English meant, roughly, someone artistically knowledgeable or wise, an aesthete.[13] As a descriptive term, it has been applied to Merovingians and classical music enthusiasts, as well as hippies and aesthetes.[13]
Hair lengths[edit]







A Polish woman with armpit length hair








An american woman with mid back length hair








An Italian woman with waist length hair








A Sri Lankan woman with classic length hair








Tibetan woman with thigh-length hair








Manhattan woman with knee-length braided hair





Hair length is most often measured (in centimeters or inches) from the line of the scalp on the forehead up over the highest point of the skull to its termination, and sometimes from the crown, the latter resulting in 10 centimeter lower values in average.[14] In cosmetology, hair lengths are usually categorized according to the part of the body where the bulk of the longest hair terminates: chin level, shoulder length, lower shoulderblade/mid-back level, waist length, hip-length, classic length (extends to almost buttock-length, i.e. upper thigh-length, where the legs meet the buttocks), thigh-length, knee-length and ankle/floor length hair.[14][15]
Hair usually takes about two years to reach shoulder length,[16] and about seven years to reach waist-length/hip-length, including occasional trims (approximately 80–90 cm (32–36 inches) from forehead for most people) [15][16]
Maximum hair length[edit]




Portrait of Julie Manet by Renoir, 1894


The maximum hair length that is possible to reach is about 15 cm (6 in) for infants (below the age of 1), about 60 cm (24 in) for children, and generally 100 cm (40 in) for adults. Documentation for decrease of the maximum length with age cannot be found in the literature. Some individuals can reach excessive lengths. Lengths greater than 150 cm (59 in) are frequently observed in long hair contests.[17] Xie Qiuping had the longest documented hair in the world, measuring 5.627 m (18 ft 5.54 in) in May 2004.[18]
The maximum terminal hair length depends on the length of the anagen (period of hair growth) for the individual. Waist-length hair or longer is only possible to reach for people with long anagen. The anagen lasts between 2 and 7 years, for some individuals even longer, and follows by shorter catagen (transition) and telogen (resting) periods. At any given time, about 85% of hair strands are in anagen.[19] The fibroblast growth factor 5 (FGF5) gene affects the hair cycle in mammals including humans; blocking FGF5 in the human scalp (by applying a herbal extract that blocked FGF5) extends the hair cycle, resulting in less hair fall and increased hair growth.[20]
Cultural history[edit]
In Jewish and Christian scriptures[edit]



"She, as a veil down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned golden tresses wore
Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved,
As the vine curls her tendrils..."



– John Milton's description of Eve in Paradise Lost


In the Old Testament, the Nazirites would go for long periods of time without cutting their hair to show devotion to God.[21] Samson is one example; his strength depended upon his refraining from cutting his hair, described as worn in "seven locks".[10]
In the New Testament, Saint Paul (formerly Saul of Tarsus) wrote, "Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. But if any seem contentious, we have no such custom, neither do the churches of God."[22]
An interpretation from observing nature: The male animals such as the Lion have the longer hair than the female; thus it is not a shame for a man to have long hair.
Western culture[edit]
Ancient Greece and Rome[edit]
In ancient Greece, long male hair was a symbol of wealth and power, while a shaven head was appropriate for a slave. The ancient Greeks had several gods and heroes who wore their hair long, including Zeus, Achilles, Apollo, and Poseidon. Greek soldiers are said to have worn their hair long in battle. Such warriors considered it a sign of aristocracy and are said to have combed it openly in order to show off. Also, in order to keep enemies from getting a hold of it in battle, they were known to cut the front short, but leave it long in the back, where it was more out of reach. A widely held alternative interpretation of the conventional belief is that they kept it long, and simply tied it back in a style known as a ponytail in order to keep it out of their enemies' reach. The ponytail method allowed warriors, who often traveled to battle with a minimal amount of equipment in order to avoid excessively heavy loads over long marches, to keep their hair manageable with a small piece of string to hold their pony tail in place and a knife to cut the back to length with one simple slice. Around the sixth century, however, the Greek men shifted to shorter hairstyles, with the exception of the Spartans. Women in the culture remained with the longer style, which for them showed freedom, health, and wealth, as well as good behavior.[23] In men, it was considered a sign of false pride by this time.[24]
Pliny the Elder in his Natural History and Varro related that the Romans did not begin to cut their hair short until barbers were introduced to Italy from Sicily by P. Ticinius Mena in 299 BC.[25] Women in Roman times valued long hair, usually with a center part. Apart from in the earliest times, men's hair was usually shorter than women's, although other cultures of the time, such as Greeks in the east, considered long hair to be typical of philosophers, who were thought to be too engrossed in learning to bother with hair.[26] Strictly in the province of Rome, however, the shorter hairstyle was especially popular.[24] When Julius Caesar conquered the Gauls, who favored long hair, he ordered it to be cut short.[27]
Middle Ages[edit]
In the European middle ages, shorter hair often signified servitude and peasantry, while long hair was often attributed to freemen, as was the case with the Germanic Goths and Merovingians.
The Gaelic Irish (both men and women)[28] took great pride in their long hair—for example, a person could be heavily fined for cutting a man's hair short against his will.[29] When the Anglo-Normans and the English colonized Ireland, hair length came to signify one's allegiance. Irishmen who cut their hair short were deemed to be forsaking their Irish heritage. Likewise, English colonists who wore their hair long in the back were deemed to be forsaking their role as English subjects and giving in to the Irish life. Thus, hair length was one of the most common ways of judging a true Englishman in this period. Muslims in Christian areas were ordered to keep their hair short and parted, as their longer style was considered rebellious and barbaric.[30]




Empress Elisabeth of Austria wearing thigh-length hair in 1865. (Painting by Franz Xaver Winterhalter)


The long hair tradition was widespread among English and French men in the 11th and 12th centuries, though it was considered, mostly because of endorsement of the Roman Catholic Church, acceptable for men also to have shorter hair. The tradition was largely brought about by monarchs who rejected the shorter hairstyle, causing the people to follow. Wulfstan, a religious leader, worried that those with longer hair would fight like women, and be unable to protect England from foreign invasion. This idea can be found in later military leaders as well, such as those of the American Confederacy.[31] Knights and rulers would also sometimes cut or pull out their hair in order to show penitence and mourning, and a squire's hair was generally shorter than a knight's. Married women who let their hair flow out in public were frowned upon, as this was normally reserved for the unwed, although they were allowed to let it out in mourning, to show their distressed state. Through these centuries it was expected of Eastern Christians to wear long hair as well as long beards, which was especially expected from clergy and monks.
In England, during the English Civil Wars of 1642 to 1651, male hair length was emblematic of the disputes between Cavaliers and Roundheads (Puritans). Cavaliers wore longer hair, and were less religious-minded, thought of by the Roundheads as lecherous. The more devout Roundheads typically had somewhat shorter hair[9]
Around this time, long hair in England also came to be associated with adventurers who traveled to America and were familiar with the native culture there, short hair with less adventurous types.
Recent trends among women[edit]







The Seven Sutherland Sisters were singing and showing off their famous floor-length hair in a sideshow of Barnum & Bailey's from about 1882 to 1907.








Opera singer Mary Garden in 1908 with knee-length hair








Indonesian woman with waist-length hair









Dutch woman with thigh-length hair








Ngbandi girls with hip-length hair





Growing and wearing long hair was common among women in the Western world until World War One.[15] Long female hair never ceased in western culture, though it was rare during the 1920s and 1930s, and was frequent especially around 1970 and 1985.[citation needed]
In most current cultures, it is more typical for women to wear long hair than for men to do so. An American study shows significant correlation between hair length and age, which indicates that younger women tend to have longer hair than older women. A significant correlation was also found between women's hair length and hair quality. Moreover, hair quality was correlated with the women's perceived physical health. Consistent with principles of evolutionary psychology, these results indicate that hair length and quality can act as a cue to a woman's youth and health, signifying reproductive potential. The correlation between the woman's hair length and marital status, or number of children, was however not more than to be expected from the correlation between hair length and age.[6]
Recent trends among men[edit]




Long male hair in western youth culture became popular in the 1960s and 70s with The Beatles.






Bob Marley made rastafari culture and dreadlocks popular also outside Jamaica.


Before World War One men generally had longer hair and beards. However, short hair on men was introduced in World War One for soldiers. Slaves and defeated armies were often required to shave their heads. The trench warfare in 1914 to 1918 exposed men to flea and lice infestations, which prompted the order to cut short hair, establishing a military tradition,[15] and it expanded among civils by imitation.
Beat poets during the 1950s wore longer hairstyles. By 1960, a small "beatnik" community in Newquay, Cornwall, England (including a young Wizz Jones) had attracted the attention of their neighbors for growing their hair to a length past the shoulders, resulting in a television interview with Alan Whicker on BBC television's Tonight series.[32] The 1960s also introduced The Beatles, who started a more widespread longer hair trend. The social revolution of the 1960s led to a renaissance of unchecked hair growth,[15] and long hair, especially on men, was worn as a political or countercultural symbol or protest and as a symbol of masculinity. This cultural symbol extended to several Western countries in the Americas, Western Europe, South Africa, and Australia.[33] Specific long hairstyles such as dreadlocks have been part of counterculture movements seeking to define other alternative cultures and lifestyles since this time.[12] Longer hair in general remained popular due to the youth rebellion throughout the liberal decade of the 1960s.[33] The long hair trend grew with the spread of the hippie movement in the 1960s[33] and, in the 1970s, longer hair styles would become the norm among men and women.
In the 1970s, the popularity of Jamaica's reggae music and musician Bob Marley prompted interest in dreadlocks internationally. The anti-establishment philosophy of Rastafari, echoed in much of the reggae of the time, resonated with leaning youth of all ethnicities – especially and primarily among African Americans and other Blacks, but among counterculture whites as well.[34] Eastern Christians are encouraged[by whom?] to wear long hair with long beard. In the 1980s the view of long hair as a solitary signifier of political or counter-cultural identity was countered and parodied in films such as Rambo and many other militaristic heroes of media which challenged then-contemporary views of tradition.[35] In the 2000's longer hairstyles among men became popular among neopagans and rock enthusiasts;[36] for example, musicians in Metal bands and their fans often wear long hair. Long hair may be grown for the purpose of being donated to an organization, such as Locks of Love, for hairpieces to help those who could not have hair otherwise, such as those who are diagnosed with alopecia aerate. Today long hair has gained even more popularity. Even among mainstream men it is socially acceptable to have hair reaching around the upper back. This could in part be due to the "man bun" trend where men pull their shoulder length or longer hair back into a topknot Bun (hairstyle).
African Americans[edit]
When African slaves were freed in America, they struggled to reach the social status of whites. Many former slaves tried to conform their hairstyles as part of this struggle. Women, especially, felt pressure to make their hair long and oily, rather than keeping the shorter, tightly coiled style they had known.[37] However, during the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s, African-Americans such as Malcolm X advocated hairstyles such as afros and dreadlocks, in order to embrace their race, and to return to West African roots.[38]
Social pressures at the time were heavily influencing these Americans (women) to have long, straight hair, like white people did.[39] This resulted in the Black is beautiful movement, wherein African Americans wore long hair, that was however, untreated and unmodified. More recently, hair-extensions have become widespread. Scholars have pointed out the continued pressure on black women to have long, smooth hair. Amelia Jones points out that dolls for children, such as Barbies, add to this pressure, citing as an example a new, black Barbie with long hair. Blacks, she believes, should be able to be themselves without feeling pressured to "tame" their hair.[40]
Contemporary North America[edit]
1972, it was estimated that 24% of American women wore shoulder length hair or longer (44% of women in ages 14 to 44), meaning slightly more than 12% of men and women altogether. Similar frequency was found in 2001, when it was estimated that about 13% of the US adult population, male as well as females, has hair shoulder-length or longer, about 2.4% have hair reaching to the bottom of the shoulder blades or longer, about 0.3% have hair waist length or longer, and only about 0.017% have hair buttocks-length or longer.[41] By extrapolating the above data and the number of hair length records, the number of people with shoulder-length hair or longer in the USA is estimated to be 27 million, those with waist-length hair roughly 900,000, those with buttocks-length hair to be 40,000, with knee length hair to 2,000 and with ankle length hair to 70.[14]
Middle East[edit]
Judaism[edit]
Strict orthodox Judaism forbids men from cutting their sidelocks, but other hair may be kept as desired. Hair is not cut during a time of mourning. The Torah in Deuteronomy 14:1 prohibits removing hair in mourning for the dead.
Islam[edit]




Transjordanian Bedouin with shoulder length hair, during World War II


In the Muslim world, it seems the trend of hair styles is now favouring short over long in men. In the past, Bedouin Muslims often wore their hair in long braids, but influences from the Western world have caused a change in attitudes. Bedouins are now less likely to have long hair.[42] Islamic countries in North Africa such as Egypt view long hair in men as modernist and in one case the Egyptian police viewed it as Satanic and a sign of an infidel.[43] Spanish rulers during the Medieval Period suspected long-haired males to be Moors or Moriscos, therefore long hair was forbidden since it was believed to be a Moorish custom. However, modern North African men have adopted Western short hair.
Muslims regard the Prophet Muhammad as the best example to live by, and try to emulate him whenever possible. The Islamic Prophet Muhammad reportedly in Sahih Muslim had hair that "hung over his shoulders and earlobes".[44] Sahih Bukhari, regarded the most authentic of hadith, also supports this using a prime example of the prophet Isa (Jesus).[45] The Prophet Muhammad has also described Jesus as "having long hair reaching his ear lobes."[46] Malik's Muwatta 51.2.6 reported, Yahya related to me from Malik from Yahya ibn Said that Abu Qatada al-Ansari said to the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, "I have a lot of hair which comes down to my shoulders, shall I comb it? The Messenger of Allah. may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said, "Yes, and honour it." Sometimes Abu Qatada oiled it twice in one day because the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said to him. "Honour it."
With regards to women, neither Qur'an nor Sunnah explicitly state that women cannot cut their hair. Hadith does mention that women should not imitate men, and vice versa, and hence many scholars on this assumption, decree that women should let their hair grow longer than the hair of the Prophet, reaching beyond their shoulders, as hadith mentions that the Prophet had his hair between his shoulder and his earlobes. (He described Jesus's hair, which hung to his earlobes, as long.[47])
However, according to some hadiths regarding the rules of awrah, women are required to grow hair long, long enough that it would cover the breasts or as much awrah parts of the body when they're being buried, because she lacks clothes and long hair would be used as a covering instead.
Some Muslims are also opposed to men having long hair as it is also important in Islam to have clear differences (in appearance) between sexes. And generally these cultures encourage women to have long hair and men to have short hair.[48] The Taliban in Afghanistan viewed long hair for men as a western influence, and punished it by arrest and forced haircuts,[49] although this would be a direct contradiction of the sunnah of the Prophet. Similar measures have been taken by Islamists in Iraq.[50] In spite of this, several Taliban affiliated members of the Mehsud clan are recognisable by their long hair.[51][52] The Saudi Islamist fighter Amir Khattab was also notable for his long hair. Dervishes of some Sufi orders, such as the Kasnazani, often have long hair and whirl it around during rituals.[53]
Native Americans[edit]




Yakima boy with mid-back level hair. (Photo by Edward S. Curtis, 1868–1952.)


Many Native American men wore long hair before the arrival of western influences on their culture. (In Cherokee legends, for example, males said to be handsome were often described as having "long hair almost to the ground" or similar formulas.[54]). Both men and women of these cultures have frequently struggled to maintain their tradition but have faced heavy opposition. Many consider it a sign of giving in to western influences to have their hair cut.[55][56] Early American settlers saw long-haired, native men as rebelling against their civilized society. Mountain men and trappers who adopted the customs were also considered amoral, and often identified by their long hair.[57] Since the cultural movements of the Sixties and Seventies, however, Native Americans have felt less pressure to have short hair, as different movements have defended their cultural rights.[58] For example, several states have loosened prison regulations, allowing Native Americans to wear long hair during incarceration, along with other cultural allowances.[59] There has been resistance to these changes, however, as long hair is sometimes used to hide drugs, as well as to identify with a gang.[60]
Africa[edit]




Somali woman with shoulder-length hair.


Throughout much of Africa, afro-textured hair is the most frequent hair form, except among the Afro-Asiatic (Hamito-Semitic) speaking populations in North Africa and the Horn of Africa. In the latter regions, naturally long hair is instead more common.[61]
In West African cultures, women with long hair were highly valued. Long, thick hair was seen as a sign of health, strength, and capability to bear many children. In keeping with this general theme, women who were too young for marriage would shave a portion of their heads to signal so. This tradition, however, did not extend to every West African culture, as several valued shorter hair.[62]
Asia[edit]
Historically, East Asian cultures viewed long hair as a sign of youth and aesthetic beauty. Long hair is associated with private life and sexuality. East Asian cultures see long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up.[12] Lay Buddhists have long hair, while Buddhist monks have shaved heads.[9]







Japanese woman combing her long hair. (Colour woodblock print from 1920 by Hashiguchi Goyō.)








Illustration of The Tale of Genji, painted by Tosa Mitsuoki (1617–1691).








Chinese orthodox Christian man from 1874








Nosu girls in China 1922.








A hindoo "fakir" or Sadhu with long hair. Lithograph 1844 by Emily Eden after Lowes Cato Dickinson.





China[edit]
In ancient China and Korea, hair was regarded as a precious legacy from parents. Most people would never cut their hair after they became adults, and cutting off one's hair was a penalty for minor crimes. Both men and women would coil up their hair and many hair-coiling styles were developed.
Beginning in 1619, the ethnic Manchu Qing dynasty forced all men in China to adopt the queue: a long braid down the back with the hair near the forehead completely shaved. Hair length and style became a life-or-death matter in 1645 as the Manchu told them either their hair or their head would be cut. By 1651, the population of China had been reduced from 51 million to just 20 million, as a whole generation resisted the order for the sake of Confucian ideals against shaving or harming their hair.
Nearly every Han rebel group began by shearing this pigtail (most especially in the case of the Taiping, who were known in Chinese as the "Longhairs"), but the queue on penalty of death lasted until 1911, when the Chinese people cut their queues in unison at a time of rebellion. Americans at first judged Chinese immigrant laborers to be poor workers because their long hair brought an association with women.[63]
Islamic and Christian missionaries among the Chinese were strong advocates of shorter male hair for their converts.[64] Around the Destruction of Four Olds period in 1964, almost anything seen as part of Traditional Chinese culture would lead to problems with the Communist Red Guards. Items that attracted dangerous attention if caught in the public included jewelry and long male hair.[65] These things were regarded as symbols of bourgeois lifestyle, that represented wealth. People had to avoid them or suffer serious consequences such as tortures and beatings by the guards.[65] More recently, long hair was ridiculed in China from October 1983 to December 1983, as part of the short and unsuccessful Anti-Spiritual Pollution Campaign.[66]
Also, in Chinese ancient and modern poetry, long hair is a common symbol used by poets, for example Li Bai and Li Shangyin, to express their depression and sadness.
Southeast Asia[edit]
In Southeast Asia and Indonesia, male long hair was valued in until the seventeenth century, when the area adopted outside influences including Islam and Christianity. Invading cultures enforced shorter hairstyles on men as a sign of servitude, as well. They were also confused at the short hairstyles among women in certain areas, such as Thailand, and struggled to explain why women in the area had such short hair. They came up with several mythical stories, one of which involved a king who found a long hair in his rice and, in a rage, demanded that all women keep their hair short.[64]
In rural areas in certain Asian countries, for example India, girls still usually let their hair grow long, and knee-length hair is not unusual.[67]
Japan[edit]
In the medieval Japan, heian gentleman were not very interested in a woman's physical beauty and rarely had an opportunity to see it. The only physical attribute of interest was a woman's hair, which had to be thick and longer than she was tall. The fascination with long hair was one reason why a woman's becoming a nun was regarded with such seriousness — it could never again grow to its full length. This explains why Genji refuses to let Murasaki (his de facto wife in the classical Japanese novel The Tale of Genji) take the tonsure when she is ill.[68]
Sikhism[edit]
For Sikhs, Kesh is the practice of allowing one's hair to grow naturally as a symbol of devotion to God and lack of worldliness.[11]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (August 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The Sikhs were commanded by Guru Gobind Singh at the Baisakhi Amrit Sanchar in 1699 to wear long uncut hair called Kesh at all times to signify the strength and vitality of the Sikh people. This was one of the 'five requisites of faith', collectively called Kakars that form the external visible identifiers to clearly affirm a Sikh's commitment and dedication to the order (Hukam) of the tenth master and made one a member of the Khalsa. The Khalsa is the "Saint-Soldier" of Guru Gobind Singh who stated the following: "He does not recognize anyone else except One Lord, not even the bestowal of charities, performance of merciful acts, austerities and restraint on pilgrim-stations; the perfect light of the Lord illuminates his heart, then consider him as the immaculate Khalsa." (Guru Gobind Singh in the Dasam Granth page 1350)
The Kesh or unshorn long hair is an indispensable part of the human body as created by waheguru that is the mainstay of the 'Jivan Jaach' and the Rehni that was prescribed by Guru Gobind Singh Sahib by which a Sikh is clearly and quickly identified, Kesh. The kanga, another requisite of faith is usually tucked behind the "Rishi Knot" and tied under the turban. The uncut long head hair and the beard in the case of men forms the main kakar for the Sikhs.
KESADHARI, a term defining a Sikh as one who carries on his head the full growth of his kes (hair) which he never trims or cuts for any reason. Anyone, Sikh or non-Sikh, may keep the hair unshorn, but for the Sikh kes, unshorn hair, is a requisite of faith and an inviolable vow. The Sikh Rahit Maryada published by the Shiromani Gurdwara Prabandhak Committee, statutory body for the control and management of Sikh shrines and by extension for laying down rules about Sikh beliefs and practices, issued in 1945, after long and minute deliberations among Sikh scholars and theologians, defines a Sikh thus: Every Sikh who has been admitted to the rites of amrit, i.e. who has been initiated as a Sikh, must allow his hair to grow to its full length. This also applies to those born of Sikh families but [who] have not yet received the rites of amrit of the tenth master, Guru Gobind Singh. ".
See also[edit]

Grooming
Haircut
Hair extensions
Hair stick
Lady Godiva
Long hair fetishism, a form of Trichophilia
Rapunzel

Images[edit]

Female long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Female long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)

References[edit]


^ Buss, David M. (2005). The handbook of evolutionary psychology. John Wiley and Sons. p. 309. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3. 
^ Bereczkei, T. (2007). "Hair length, facial attractiveness, personality attribution; A multiple fitness model of hairdressing". Review of Psychology. 13 (1): 35–42. 
^ Scorolli, C; Ghirlanda, S; Enquist, M; Zattoni, S; Jannini, E A (2007). "Relative prevalence of different fetishes". International Journal of Impotence Research. 19 (4): 432–7. PMID 17304204. doi:10.1038/sj.ijir.3901547. 
^ "Heels top the global fetish leader board". England. 
^ a b Watson, James (2005). Darwin: the Indelible Stamp; the Evolution of an Idea. Philadelphia: Running Press. p. 1042. ISBN 0-7624-2136-3. 
^ a b Hinsz, Verlin B.; Matz, David C.; Patience, Rebecca A. (2001). "Does women's hair signal reproductive potential?". Journal of Experimental Social Psychology. 37 (2): 166. doi:10.1006/jesp.2000.1450. 
^ Sugiyama, Lawrence S. (2005) "Physical Attractiveness in Adaptationist Perspective", Chapter 10 in Buss, David M. (ed.) The Handbook of Evolutionary Psychology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3
^ Williams, Simon Johnson; Birke, Lynda I. A.; Bendelow, Gillian (2003). Debating biology: sociological reflections on health, medicine, and society. Routledge. p. 130. ISBN 0-415-27903-8. 
^ a b c Leach, E. R. (July 1958). "Magical Hair". Journal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. 88 (2): 147–164. JSTOR 2844249. doi:10.2307/2844249. 
^ a b Judges 13–16
^ a b Fowler, Jeaneane (1997). World Religions: an Introduction for Students. Brighton: Sussex Academic Press. p. 352. ISBN 1-898723-48-6. 
^ a b c Maynard, Margaret (2004), Dress and Globalisation, Manchester: Manchester University Press, p. 104, ISBN 0-7190-6389-2 
^ a b Oxford English Dictionary
^ a b c Clarence Robbins and Marjorie Gene Robbins, "Scalp hair length. II. Estimating the percentages of adults in the USA and larger populations by hari length." Journal of cosmetic science 54.4 (2003): 367–378.
^ a b c d e Gonzalez, Anthony (2007). Cosmetology. Global Media. p. 54. ISBN 81-89940-45-7. 
^ a b Hemat, R. A. S. (2007). Andropathy. Urotext. p. 375. ISBN 1-903737-08-7. 
^ Robbins, Clarence R. (2002). Chemical and physical behavior of human hair. Springer. ISBN 0-387-95094-X. 
^ Guinness World Records: Longest hair. guinnessworldrecords.com
^ Tortora & Derrickson (2012). Principles of Anatomy & Physiology (13 ed.). John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p. 163. 
^ Maeda, T.; Yamamoto, T.; Isikawa, Y.; Itoh, N.; Arase, S. (2007). "Sanguisorba Officinalis Root Extract Has FGF-5 Inhibitory Activity and Reduces Hair Loss by Causing Prolongation of the Anagen Period". Nishi Nihon Hifuka. 69: 81. doi:10.2336/nishinihonhifu.69.81. 
^ Numbers 6:5, Numbers 6:18–19
^ KJV 1 Corinthians 11:14–16
^ Irwin, M. Eleanor (Oct 1990). "Odysseus' "Hyacinthine Hair" in 'Odyssey' 6.231". Phoenix. 44 (3): 205–218. JSTOR 1088933. doi:10.2307/1088933. 
^ a b Nicolson, Frank W. (1891). "Greek and Roman Barbers". Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 2: 41–56. JSTOR 310326. 
^ Pliny the Elder at Perseus
^ Bartman, Elizabeth (Jan 2001). "Hair and the Artifice of Roman Female Adornment". American Journal of Archaeology. 105 (1): 1–25. JSTOR 507324. 
^ Felt, Joseph (1967). Customs of New England. New York: Burt Franklin. p. 187. ISBN 0-8337-1105-9. 
^ Connolly, Sean J (2007). "Prologue". Contested island: Ireland 1460–1630. Oxford University Press. p. 7. 
^ The Brehon Laws: A Legal Handbook: Chapter VII, Laurence Ginnell (1894)
^ Bartlett, Robert (1994). "Symbolic Meanings of Hair in the Middle Ages". Transactions of the Royal Historical Society. Sixth series. 4: 43–60. JSTOR 3679214. doi:10.2307/3679214. 
^ McManus, Howard Rollins (1989). The Battle of Cloids Mountain of Virginia, 1864. University of Michigan. p. 35. 
^ Whicker, Alan. Tonight: "Beatniks in Newquay". BBC, 1960.
^ a b c Bronski, Michael (2000), The Pleasure Principle: Sex, Backlash, and the Struggle for Gay Freedom, Stonewall Inn Editions, pp. 95–96, ISBN 0-312-25287-0 
^ Gossai, Hemchand; Murrell, Nathaniel (2000), Religion, Culture, and Tradition in the Caribbean, New York: St. Martin's Press, pp. 181–190, ISBN 0-312-23242-X 
^ Lu, Hsiao-Peng (1997), Transnational Chinese Cinemas, Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press, p. 229, ISBN 0-8248-1845-8 
^ Weinstein, Deena (2000), Heavy Metal, New York: Da Capo Press, p. 129, ISBN 0-306-80970-2 
^ Byrd, pp. 25–49
^ Synnott, Anthony (September 1987). "Shame and Glory: A Sociology of Hair". The British Journal of Sociology. 38 (3): 381–413. JSTOR 590695. doi:10.2307/590695. 
^ Taylor, Paul C. (1999). "Malcolm's Conk and Danto's Colors; Or, Four Logical Petitions concerning Race, Beauty, and Aesthetics". The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism. 57 (1): 16–20. JSTOR 432060. doi:10.2307/432060. 
^ Jones, Amelia (2003). The Feminism and Visual Culture Reader. New York: Routledge. p. 343. ISBN 0415267056
^ Robbins, C; Robbins, M. G. (2003). "Scalp hair length. I. Hair length in Florida theme parks: An approximation of hair length in the United States of America". Journal of cosmetic science. 54 (1): 53–62. PMID 12644859. 
^ Massad, Joseph (2001), Colonial Effects, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 137–140, 208–210, ISBN 0-231-12322-1 
^ Heper, Metin (1998), Ismet Inonu: the Making of a Turkish Statesman, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 153, ISBN 90-04-09919-0 
^ Sahih Muslim Book 30 Number 5773: "Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 7 Book 72 Number 788: "Narrated Al-Bara': I did not see anybody in a red cloak looking more handsome than the Prophet Narrated Malik: The hair of the Prophet used to hang near his shoulders. Narrated Shu'ba: The hair of the Prophet used to hang down to the earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128 : Narrated 'Abdullah bin 'Umar: Allah's Apostle said, "I saw myself (in a dream) near the Ka'ba last night, and I saw a man with whitish red complexion, the best you may see amongst men of that complexion having long hair reaching his earlobes which was the best hair of its sort, and he had combed his hair and water was dropping from it, and he was performing the Tawaf around the Ka'ba while he was leaning on two men or on the shoulders of two men. I asked, 'Who is this man?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, son of Mary.' Then I saw another man with very curly hair, blind in the right eye which looked like a protruding out grape. I asked, 'Who is this?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, Ad-Dajjal.'"
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128
^ Joseph, Suad; Najmabadi, Afsaneh (2005), Encyclopedia of Women & Islamic Cultures: Family, Body, Sexuality and Health, Volume 3, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 35, ISBN 90-04-12819-0 
^ Rashid, Ahmed (2002), Taliban: Islam, oil and the new great game in central Asia, I B Tauris & Co Ltd, p. 219, ISBN 1-86064-830-4 
^ Raghavan, Sudarsan (2006-10-06), "Another freedom cut short: Iraq's barbers under threat", The Washington Post, archived from the original on 2006-10-06 
^ "South Asia | Profile: Abdullah Mehsud". BBC News. 2007-07-24. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ "Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud threatens US months after 'death'". The Daily Telegraph. 2010-05-03. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ Wong, Edward (2005-08-22). "Iraq's Sufis attacked as strife widens". The New York Times. 
^ Kirk, Lowell (1999). "Cherokee Myths and Legends". Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Ferris, Jeri (1991), Native American Doctor, Minneapolis: Carolrhoda Books, pp. 32–33, ISBN 0-87614-443-1 
^ Kilcup, Karen (2000), Native American Women's Writing, C. 1800–1924, Cambridge: Blackwell Publishers, pp. 314–316, ISBN 0-631-20518-7 
^ Cavallo, Dominick (1999), A Fiction of the past, New York: St. Martin's Press, p. 90, ISBN 0-312-23501-1 
^ Nagel, Joane (1997), American Indian Ethnic Renewal, Oxford Oxfordshire: Oxford University Press, p. 191, ISBN 0-19-512063-9 
^ French, Laurence (2003), Native American Justice, Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Inc, pp. 113–117, ISBN 0-8304-1575-0 
^ Fontana, Vincent (2003), Municipal Liability, Aspen Law & Business Publishers, pp. 241–242, ISBN 0-7355-1375-9 
^ Hiernaux, Jean (1975). The People of Africa. Scribners. p. 59. ISBN 0684140403. 
^ Byrd, pp. 2–5
^ Prasso, Sheridan (2005), The Asian Mystique, New York: Public Affairs Press, pp. 115–116, ISBN 1-58648-214-9 
^ a b Reid, Anthony (1988). Southeast Asia in the Age of Commerce, 1450–1680. New Haven: Yale University Press. p. 82. ISBN 0-300-04750-9. 
^ a b Law, Kam-yee (2003), The Chinese Cultural Revolution Reconsidered: beyond purge and Holocaust, Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-73835-7 
^ "Olympic crackdown on China's bad habits". BBC News. August 6, 2007. Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Sherrow, Victoria (2006) Encyclopedia of hair: a cultural history, Greenwood Publishing Group. p. 242. ISBN 0313331456
^ The Tale of Genji, a novel about courtly life in medieval Japan.


Bibliography[edit]

Byrd, Ayana; Tharps, Lori (2002). Hair Story. New York: St. Martin's Griffin. ISBN 0-312-28322-9. 







v
t
e


Human hair




List of hairstyles / facial hairstyles



Classification




by type



Lanugo
Androgenic
Terminal
Vellus





by location



Nose
Ear
Eyebrow
Eyelash
Underarm
Chest
Abdominal
Pubic
Leg













v
t
e


Human hair color



Hair color



Black
Blond
Brown (varieties: Chestnut • Auburn)
Red (varieties: Auburn • Titian)
White/Grey





Hair coloring



Blue rinse
Grecian Formula
Hair dye stripping
Hair highlighting
Henna
Hydrogen peroxide
Blue hair





Other



Disappearing blonde gene
Fischer–Saller scale
Fischer scale
Melanocortin 1 receptor













Hairstyles



Afro
Asymmetric cut
Bangs
Beehive
Big hair
Blowout
Bob cut
Bouffant
Bowl cut
Braid or Plait
Brush cut
Bun (odango)
Bunches
Burr
Businessman cut
Butch cut
Buzz cut
Caesar cut
Chignon
Chonmage
Chupryna
Comb over
Conk
Cornrows
Crew cut
Crochet braids
Cropped hair
Croydon facelift
Curtained hair
Devilock
Dido flip
Digital perm
Dreadlocks
Duck's ass
Extensions
Feathered hair
Finger wave
Flattop
Fontange
French braid
French twist
Frosted tips
Harvard clip
High and tight
Hime cut
Historical Christian hairstyles
Hi-top fade
Induction cut
Ivy League
Jewfro
Jheri curl
Kiss curl
Layered hair
Liberty spikes
Long hair
Lob cut
Marcelling
Mod cut
Mohawk
Mullet
1950s
1980s
Pageboy
Part
Payot
Pigtail
Pixie cut
Pompadour
Ponytail
Punch perm
Princeton
Professional cut
Queue
Quiff
Rattail
Razor cut
Regular haircut
Regular taper cut
Ringlets
Shag
Shape-Up
Short back and sides
Short brush cut
Short hair
Spiky hair
Standard haircut
Surfer hair
Taper cut
Tonsure
Updo
Undercut
Waves
Wings





Facial hair



Beard
Chin curtain
Chinstrap
Designer stubble
Goatee
Moustache

Fu Manchu
handlebar
horseshoe
pencil
toothbrush
walrus


Neckbeard
Shenandoah
Sideburns
Soul patch
Van Dyke





Hair loss




Cosmetic



Removal

waxing
threading
plucking
chemical
electric
laser
IPL


Shaving

head
leg
cream
brush
soap


Razor

electric
safety
straight







other



Alopecia

areata
totalis
universalis


Male-pattern hair loss
Glabrousness
Hypertrichosis
Management
Trichophilia
Trichotillomania
Pogonophobia








Haircare Products



Brush
Clay
Clipper
Comb
Conditioner
Dryer
Gel
Hot comb
Iron
Mousse
Pomade
Relaxer
Rollers
Shampoo
Spray
Wax





Haircare Techniques



Backcombing
Crimping
Curly Girl Method
Perm
Shampoo and set
Straightening





Documentaries



My Nappy Roots: A Journey Through Black Hair-itage (2008)
Good Hair (2009)





Related Topics



Afro-textured hair
Bearded lady
Barber (pole)
Eponymous hairstyle
Good hair (phrase)
Hairdresser
Hair fetishism (pubic)
Hair follicle
Hair growth
Hypertrichosis
Trichotillomania










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Long_hair&oldid=791632801"					
Categories: HairstylesPejorative terms for peopleHeavy metal fashionHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from December 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014Articles with unsourced statements from June 2015Articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from June 2017Articles needing additional references from August 2014All articles needing additional referencesGood articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةBrezhonegDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisGalegoItalianoLietuvių日本語Simple EnglishไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 14:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Vyjayanthimala - Wikipedia






















 






Vyjayanthimala

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the garland in Hindu mythology, see Vaijayanti.


Vyjayanthimala Bali



Vyjayanthimala at Esha Deol's wedding at ISKCON temple in Bangalore in 2012



Born
Vyjayanthimala Raman
(1933-08-13) 13 August 1933 (age 83)[1]
Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India
(now in Tamil Nadu, India)


Residence
Chennai, Tamil Nadu, India


Other names
Vaijayanthimala, Vyjayanti Mala, Vyjantimala, Vaijayantimala Bali


Occupation
Actress, Indian classical dancer, Carnatic singer, golfer, politician


Years active
1949–1968


Spouse(s)
Chamanlal Bali (m. 1968–86)(his death)


Children
Suchindra Bali (born 1976)


Parent(s)
M. D. Raman (Father) (deceased)
Vasundhara Devi (Mother) (deceased)


Awards
Padmashri, Kalaimamani,
Sangeet Natak Akademi Award
(See more)


Signature





Vyjayanthimala Bali (born 13 August 1933),[1] also known by the mononym Vyjayanthimala, is an Indian film actress, Bharathanatyam dancer, Carnatic singer, dance choreographer and parliamentarian. She was referred to as the first female superstar of Hindi cinema.[2] She made her debut in the Tamil language film Vazhkai in 1949 and in the Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950. She later became one of the most prominent actresses of South Indian cinema and in the golden era of Bollywood and was known as one of the iconic leading actress of all time.[3][4][5]
Vyjayanthimala was one of the biggest Bollywood stars with a career lasting almost two decades.[6][7][3] She was the first south Indian actress to become a national star and "paved a way" for other south Indian actresses to foray into Bollywood.[8][9] Vyjayanthimala is an accomplished dancer and was one of those who introduced semi-classical dance to Bollywood.[10][11] Her subsequent dance numbers in her films had earned her the title of "twinkle toes".[12][13]
Vyjayanthimala made her screen debut at the age of 16 through the Tamil film Vazhkai (1949) and Telugu film Jeevitham in 1950 and acted in Bollywood movies Bahar and Ladki. Following the success of Nagin, Vyjayanthimala established herself as one of Bollywood's leading actresses while making in-roads in successful Tamil and Telugu films.[10][14] After successfully establishing herself as a commercial actress, Vyjayanthimala appeared in Devdas playing Chandramukhi, the hooker with a heart of gold, in 1955. In her first dramatic role, she received her first Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress at the 4th Filmfare Awards where she refused to accept the award citing that hers was not a supporting role, being the first person to refuse a Filmfare Award. Following that, Vyjayanthimala appeared in series of blockbuster films such as New Delhi, Naya Daur and Aasha. She reached the pinnacle of her success in 1958, when two of her films — Sadhna and Madhumati — became huge critical and commercial hits. She was nominated for two Filmfare Award for Best Actress Award for Sadhna and Madhumati and won the award for the former.
At this point, Vyjayanthimala made comeback to the Tamil films, where she tasted commercial success with Vanjikottai Valiban, Irumbu Thirai, Baghdad Thirudan and Then Nilavu. In 1961, the release of Dilip Kumar's Ganga Jumna saw her playing a rustic village belle Dhanno who speaks Bhojpuri dialect. Critics applauded her performance with some labeled it as her best till date. She won her second Filmfare Award for Best Actress for her role in Ganga Jumna. Beginning from 1962, most of her films performed either averagely or poorly at the box office. However, in 1964, with the success of Sangam her career hits the peak again. She reinvented herself playing a modern Indian girl appearing in revealing costumes and one-piece swimsuit.[15] She went to receive her third Best Actress Award at the 12th Filmfare Awards for her role as Radha in Sangam. She later achieve critical acclaim for her performance in the historical drama Amrapali, which was based on the life of Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali. The film received universal acclaim, but it was a huge box office failure, which left Vyjayanthimala, who had a huge expectation on the film, disenchanted to the point where she decided to quit films.[16] In the end of her career Vyjayanthimala was mostly seen in commercially successful films such as Suraj, Jewel Thief and Prince with few critically acclaimed films such as Hatey Bazarey and Sunghursh. Most of them were released after Vyjayanthimala had left the film industry.
Besides films, Vyjayanthimala's main concentration was in Bharata Natyam a form of Indian classical dance. After quitting movies Vyjayanthimala Bali continued with her dance career. In addition, she was conferred with the Sangeet Natak Akademi Award, the highest Indian recognition given to practising artists.[17] The award was presented to Vyjayanthimala in 1982 for her contribution in Bharata Natyam field. Moreover, Vyjayanthimala is an avid golfer and is one of the oldest in Chennai.[18] She has also served as chairperson of 48th National Film Awards.[19]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Acting career

2.1 Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)
2.2 1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films
2.3 1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films
2.4 1959–60: Return to Tamil films
2.5 1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi
2.6 1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim
2.7 1967–70: Later Career
2.8 Films refused


3 Political career
4 Personal life

4.1 Relationships
4.2 Religious views


5 Awards
6 Notable filmography
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]




Vyjayanthimala at the age of two






Vyjayanthimala during her trip with her family to Europe at the Italian ship Bien Camano in 1939


She was born in Triplicane near Parthasarathy Temple in Tamil family to M. D. Raman and Vasundhara Devi.[20] Her mother was a leading actress in Tamil Cinema in the 1940s where her Mangama Sabatham was the first Tamil film to be declared a "colossal" hit at the box office.[20] She used to call her mother by her name as her mother was only 16 years older.[21]
Similarly, she called her father "Anna", meaning elder brother, as her father happened to be the eldest in their family and everyone called him "Anna" which is common in a Hindu joint family.[21] She was raised primarily by her maternal grandmother, Yadugiri Devi, and M.D. Raman. She was known as "Papakutty", which means little child.[22] Her ancestors were from Mysore (now in Karnataka).[23] In 1938, her grandfather Gopalacharya, the late Mandayam Dhati, started a nursing home on Narayan Shastri Road, Mysore.[23]
At the age of seven, Vyjayanthimala was chosen to perform a classical Indian dance for Pope Pius XII while her mother was an audience in 1940 at Vatican City.[24][25] Vyjayanthi attended Sacred Heart Higher Secondary School, Presentation Convent, Church Park, Chennai.[22] She learned Bharata Natyam from Guru Vazhuvoor Ramiah Pillai and Carnatic music from Manakkal Sivaraja Iyer. She had her arangetram at the age of 13 and started performing in Tamil Nadu later.[22] Her maternal uncle is Y. G. Parthasarathy.
Acting career[edit]
Early career: Debut and breakthrough in Tamil and Telugu films, (1949–1953)[edit]




Vyjayanthimala on the cover of May 1951 edition of Telugu Swatantra Weekly magazine


When director M. V. Raman was looking for a new face to cast in AVM Productions's Vazhkai, he saw Vyjayanthimala performing Bharata Natyam in Chennai's Gokhale Hall.[26] He tried to convince her grandmother, who was apprehensive about Vyjayanthimala joining films as she felt it would come in the way of her education and dance.[22] Vyjayanthimala played a college girl named Mohana Shivashankaralingam and acted along with senior actors S. V. Sahasranamam, M. S. Draupadi, T. R. Ramachandran and K. Sankarapani. The movie was a big success and was remade in Telugu after one year as Jeevitham with a slightly different cast, namely C. H. Narayana Rao, S. Varalakshmi and C. S. R. Anjaneyulu. This film enjoyed great success upon release.[22] For the Telugu version, Vyjayanthimala did her own voice dubbing with a little assistance from her father who knew Telugu well and coached her during the filming process.[22] Vyjayanthimala also did a guest appearance in the 1950 film Vijayakumari which had actress T. R. Rajakumari in dual role.[27] She danced for the song "laalu...laalu...laalu" which was choreographed by Vedantam Raghavaiah.[27] Though the film was not a commercial success but her western-style of dance became popular and was considered as one of the major highlights of the film.[27]
The success of her Tamil film Vazhkai in South India inspired AVM Productions to remake it in Hindi as Bahar in 1951. In their first Hindi venture, they decided to cast Vyjayanthimala again in the lead role with Karan Dewan, Om Prakash and Pandari Bai (who was credited as Padmini in the film).[28] She learned Hindi at the Hindi Prachar Sabha to dub her own voice for her character in the film.[22] Upperstall.com in their review, wrote that "She does bring the film to life with her dances though, something which was new then for the North Indian audience".[29] The film became sixth highest-grossing film of 1951 with a verdict of box-office hit.[30]
After the success of her debut films in all three languages, Vyjayanthimala again acted in multilingual film which was produced by Avichi Meiyappa Chettiar of AVM Productions.[22] The first version was in Tamil as Penn where she co-starred with actor Gemini Ganesan, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi. "Kalyanam...venum" sung by J. P. Chandrababu for S. Balachandran became an instant hit.[31] The second version was in Telugu titled Sangham which was released in the same year with N. T. Rama Rao,[32] Vyjayanthimala, S. Balachandran and Anjali Devi in the lead. The Tamil and the Telugu films were big successes across South India.[33][34] The film was once again remade in Hindi as Ladki starring Bharat Bhushan, Kishore Kumar while Vyjayanthimala along with Anjali Devi reprised her role from the original film. Her performance was described by Upperstall.com as, "Vyjayanthimala's dances are the film's saving grace although it is unintentionally funny now to see how deliberate and obviously tacky the sequences are which lead into her dances[...]Ladki too makes no real demands on 'feminist' tomboy Vyjayanthimala histrionically".[35] The movie became second highest-grossing film of 1953.[36]
1954–1956: Breakthrough and critical acclaim in Hindi films[edit]
In 1954, Vyjayanthimala acted in magnum opus film Nagin with Pradeep Kumar. The film got favourable responses from the audience and became the highest-grossing movie of 1954 where it was labelled as blockbuster.[37] Her performance as the Nagi tribe's chief, Mala got her favourable reviews from the critics, where in 1955 a critic from Filmfare magazine had said that "Vyjayanthimala in the title role puts over a commendable performance besides looking ravishingly beautiful as the belle of the hills. Her dancing, too, is very graceful, specially in those eye-filling colour sequences and delightful ballets towards the finish" while in The Hindu review Vijay Lokapally similarly praised her portrayal "The ethereal Vyjayanthimala, barely 18, illuminates the screen with her stunning beauty, moving around daintily from one song to the other[...]The close-up shots of Vyjayanthimala highlight her ability to convey so much with so little effort[...]Nagin was a precursor to her rise in Hindi cinema as an iconic actor, who combined her talents, performing and dancing, to rule the screen on her terms[...]biggest recall values of Nagin are Vyjayanthimala".[38][39] Post Nagin Vyjayanthimala had established herself as one of the leading actresses in Bollywood because of the film's nationwide success.[39][40] Hemant Kumar's music and her dance on the song, Man Dole, Mera tan dole, rendered by Lata Mangeshkar was one of the highlights of the film.[39] In the same year she acted in Miss Mala with Kishore Kumar whichwas a box office success. Vyjayanthimala debuted in Kannada cinema through a film called Asha Nirasha which was produced by G. D. Venkatram.[41] The film had Lata Mangeshkar, Asha Bhosle and Mohammed Rafi as the playback singers,[41] but the movie was unreleased[42] though the producer's son Srikant Venkatram claimed that the film was released and flopped miserably at box office which made the film obscure.[41]
In 1955, Vyjayanthimala acted in 5 films in Bollywood. The first one was by director Abdur Rashid Kardar's Yasmin alongside actor Suresh which won the Filmfare Best Cinematographer for Dwarka Divecha. Besides that, she also starred in three other films namely Pehli Jhalak with Kishore Kumar, Sitara with Pradeep Kumar and Jashan with Karan Dewan. Eventually all her four films released in 1955 failed at box office.
The same year, Bimal Roy cast her as Chandramukhi opposite Dilip Kumar in the critically acclaimed Devdas which was the adaptation of the novel with same title by Sharat Chandra Chatterji. The industry initially was not in favour of this choice when they heard about Vyjayanthimala being cast in Bimal Roy's film, the response being: "Why don't you take comedian Kishore Kumar as Devdas?".[10] Initially Nargis was selected for Chandramukhi's role, but she refused to accept the role. The role was later offered to Bina Rai and Suraiya but they too turned it down as they wanted to essay the lead role of Paro, which was earlier offered to Meena Kumari.[43] Subsequently, the film unit suffered with financial crisis and at this point Vyjayanthimala offered to do the role of Chandramukhi where she said to Bimal Roy, "I am ready if you think I can do it".[43] On the other hand, Nabendu Ghosh, the script writer of Devdas, said that, "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala [as Chandramukhi], but we had no option – no one wanted to play Chandramukhi, and we were committed to our distributors[...]She was, of course, a very good actress, but she was too young for Chandramukhi, as envisioned by Saratbabu".[43] On her performance, Rediff wrote, "Vyjayanthimala imbues Chandramukhi with true sympathy. Who better than Chandramukhi would know the pain of a hopeless love?[...]Vyjayanthimala, a star after the blockbuster Nagin, still had to establish her acting credentials when Roy went against the tide and cast her in the role of Chandramukhi".[44] While Upperstall.com describes her performance as, "Vyjayantimala's Chandramukhi is embellished with her graceful dance style that evolves with the evolution in her character within the film from a popular dancing woman to a woman, who, in love with Devdas, has unconsciously mutated to reflect the mainstream woman. For Vyjayantimala, the character marked a turning point from glamour to pure histrionics, offering her scope to explore her potential as a dramatic actress without taking away from her, the most outstanding gift she brought to cinema – her dance".[45] Subsequently, she won Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress but refused to accept it, stating that her role was a leading one and in equal importance to the role played by Suchitra Sen and not supporting.[45] In 2006, a poll conducted by Rediff ranked her role of Chandramukhi as one of the best Tawaif character in Bollywood.[46] Subsequently, the same role was listed in The Times of India's "10 Celluloid Hookers You Loved" at number six by Nikhat Kazmi.[47] Though the film was critically successful but it did not garner much support at the box office and ended up as 10th highest-grossing movie of 1955 with an average verdict .[48]
After being recognised as a capable actress with Devdas, Vyjayanthimala acted in successful movies in 1956, namely Taj, Patrani and Anjaan: Somewhere in Dehli - all three films with Pradeep Kumar as the hero and Kismet Ka Khel with Sunil Dutt. In the same year, she also acted in swashbuckler film Devta which was a remake of a hugely successful Tamil film Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam.[49] Surprisingly though, she accepted a supporting role as a vamp which was originally done by Lalitha in the Tamil version. However, according to Upperstall.com, her role was very crucial in the film and her portrayal as the Naag Rani accompanied by her dance is the main attraction of the film.[50] Also starring in the movie, reprising their lead roles from the original, were Gemini Ganesan and Anjali Devi.[49] Meanwhile, she was signed by Sohrab Modi for his film Rajhath opposite Pradeep Kumar. However, due to her schedule problem she was replaced by Madhubala.[51] Vyjayanthimala then acted with Kishore Kumar again in the comedy film New Delhi which became the fifth highest-grossing film of 1956 a box-office hit.[52] The film showcases a love that sprouts between a Punjabi boy, played Kishore Kumar, and Tamil girl, played by Vyjayanthimala. Her performance was applauded by fans and critics alike; a review on Upperstall.com regarding her performance in this movie states that, "Vyjayanthimala proves to be the perfect foil for Kishore Kumar[...]has always had the mandatory dance sequence in practically every film of hers evoking 'classical art' associations. She excels in the two main dances in New Delhi — the solo Bharatnatayam Aliruppu number and the Bhangra folk dance in her Punjabi avtaar and she is absolutely brilliant in the Bhangra folk dance[...]in her second avtar. Even Vyjayanthimala played a Punjabi girl and most successfully too".[53] Subsequently, she did a Tamil film called Marma Veeran along with Sriram, Rajasulochana, M. N. Rajam, J. P. Chandrababu and Chittor V. Nagaiah. The film had some of the South Indian established actors such as N. T. Rama Rao, Sivaji Ganesan and Gemini Ganesan in guest appearance.
1957–58: Success and stardom in Hindi Films[edit]
In 1957, director B. R. Chopra planned to make Naya Daur with Ashok Kumar in the lead. However, the actor refused to accept this role and it later went to Dilip Kumar.[54] For the female lead, the first choice of the director was the star-actress of those days, Madhubala. But, as fate would have it, after 15 days of initial shooting at Mumbai, the director wanted the unit to travel to Bhopal for an extended outdoor shooting. However, Ataullah Khan, the father of Madhubala, objected to this and the role went to Vyjayanthimala. Chopra later sued Madhubala for the cash advance she received from him for the film, saying that she accepted the sum and now had no intention of completing it.[55] Vyjyanthimala had previously acted with Dilip Kumar in Devdas and the duo shared an easy chemistry on-screen. The new film, Naya Daur, had a theme of "man vs. machine" and Vyjanthi's portrayal of a village belle Rajni received positive reviews from critics. A review from Rediff says that, "Vyjayanthimala too is not your average petulant gaon ki gori. She ably projects a hands-on worker who comes up with ideas on how to ford a stream and risks her life to save the bridge[...]wonderful scene between two stars whose chemistry is undeniable"[56] while reviewer Taran Adarsh from Bollywood Hungama mentions that, "Commendable performances come in from Vyjayantimala [natural][...]The relationships [Dilip Kumar-Vyjayantimala] are so human and believable".[57] At the end of its theatrical run, the film had collected around ₹ 54,000,000, thus becoming the second highest-grossing film of 1957,[58] second only to the critically acclaimed Mother India which became the highest grossing Bollywood film ever at the time.[59] Following that, Vyjayanthimala almost signed for the lead role in Filmistan's Tumsa Nahin Dekha opposite Dev Anand in 1957, but due to the producer Sashadhar Mukherjee's promise to actor Shammi Kapoor, he replaced Dev Anand with Shammi Kapoor.[60] However the director, Nasir Hussain was in a quandary as he had already read the script to Dev Anand and Vyjayanthimala but Mukerji prevailed and he also replaced Vyjayanthimala with Ameeta, who was the protégée of Filmistan Studios owner Tolaram Jalan.[60] Vyjayanthimala's next release was Kathputli in which she co-starred with actor Balraj Sahni for the first time.[61] This film was about a young girl named Pushpa who, on account of being a good dancer and singer, assists puppeteer Shivraj in his puppet show. This film was director Amiya Chakravarty's last film.[62] He died during the filming of Kathputli and the remaining project was completed by director Nitin Bose.[62] Kathputli remains as one of the memorable film of Vyjayanthimala which has an offbeat theme with a Pygmalion touch.[62] Vyjayanthimala then acted in Ek Jhalak with Rajendra Kumar and Pradeep Kumar which was produced by the latter with his home production company Deep & Pradeep Productions.[63] She returned to the screen again with Kishore Kumar in the 1957 partially colour-made film Aasha[64] which became a hit at the box office.[65] The story revolves around the central character Kishore, played by Kishore Kumar, who, despite being a Zamindaar, believes in helping the needy. Vyjayanthimala, as Nirmala, plays the lover of Kishore. The story suddenly goes from being light-hearted and humorous to a court-drama when Kishore is falsely accused for murder. The rest of the movie sees both the protagonists trying to prove Kishore's innocence. The movie is best known for its song Eena Meena Dekha sung by Kishore Kumar and Asha Bhosle, in two different versions[64] Aasha also introduced actress Asha Parekh, to the silver screen, in a song alongside Vyjayanthimala, whom Parekh described as her matinee idol.[66]
The following year proved to be very successful for Vyjayanthimala where she signed opposite Dilip Kumar in Bimal Roy's Madhumati in the title role. Originally supposed to essay four roles, the director finally scaled it down to three, Madhumati, Madhavi and Radha.[67] The film was launched in front of the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival Theatre in Czechoslovakia.[68] During the filming at the hills of Nainital, Vyjayanthimala was required to dance with barefoot where she tripped on a stone and fell while hurting herself badly causing damage to her fibre tissues in the sole of her foot.[69] Roy who was terrified and in a quandary over the incident as the shooting could not be stopped insisted on her wearing sandals which made it difficult for her during running sequences.[70] Even after the completion of Madhumati, she still encountered the pain from the injury which always reminded her of Madhumati's shooting experience.[69] Written by Ritwik Ghatak, the film is about Devendra, played by Dilip Kumar, who takes shelter during a storm in an abandoned house. Here he discovers a painting of the owner of the house Raja Ugranarayan painted by him in his previous life when was Anand, also played by Dilip Kumar, and worked as a foreman on a plantation of Raja Ugranarayan. Devendra had been in love with Madhumati, played by Vyjayanthimala. She had committed suicide while trying to save herself from Ugranarayan’s advances. Madhumati’s ghost finally takes revenge on Ugranarayan.[71] The film was well received by critics and audience where it became highest grossing Bollywood film of 1958[72] and was labelled as blockbuster at box office and ended up as fifth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjusted inflation net gross to about ₹586.4 million.[73] Her performance as Madhavi, Radha and the ghost Madhumati earned her accoladates from critics. Shahid Khan from Planetbollywood.com said "Vyjayantimala has never been one of my most favourite actresses but this is one of the few performances where I am completely bowled over by her. Her expressions while playing both the main characters are perfect. With Madhumati, she brings the wonder, surprise and innocence needed in the person. With Madhavi, she brings the poise, the curiosity and pity for the grief that Anand is going through"[74] and Karan Bali from Upperstall.com wrote that "For Vyjayanthimala, the film showcases both her acting as well as dancing abilities and the dizzying success of Madhumati took Vyjayanthimala to the highest rungs of stardom[...]to cap off an extremely successful year for her. Both, as an actress of considerable dramatic merit and as a star".[75] Madhumati came to be known as the first film which dealt with the theme of reincarnation and had a gothic noir feel to it.[76] The film later inspired films such as Milan (1967), The Reincarnation of Peter Proud (1975), Mehbooba (1976), Kudrat (1980), Karz (1980), Karan Arjun (1995) and particularly Om Shanti Om (2007) which had also lifted the film's climax which led to Rinki Bhattacharya, the late Roy's daughter accusing the film of plagiarism and threatening legal action against its producers.[77][78]
The same month she had another release, B. R. Chopra's Sadhna alongside Sunil Dutt. Vyjayanthimala was the second choice for the role of Champabai, the prostitute, after actress Nimmi who hesitated to play the role of a prostitute which arguably led to her career decline.[79] The Filmfare award winning story by Mukhram Sharma revolves around Rajini, enacted by Vyjayanthimala, a prostitute's love affair with a professor, played by Sunil Dutt.[80] Chopra who previously directed Vyjayanthimala in Naya Daur, had adapted the theme on the rehabilitation of prostitutes which was then a controversial topic in India.[81] Along with the film her performance received universal acclaim, as told by Vijay Lokapally from The Hindu, "Among the great movies made on the subject of helpless women versus society, Sadhna holds its own for its realistic portrayal and treatment of a subject, so aesthetically documented by Chopra and Vyjayanthimala" and praised the latter "gorgeous when she entertains the clients at her kotha[...]stunningly restrained when she assumes the character of a prospective wife".[82] Similarly, the Rediff's critic Dinesh Raheja has commented that "But finally, the show belongs to Vyjayanthimala. Fetchingly frivolous in the first half, she is suitably serious in the second. She makes her need for acceptance palpable; her eyes emit twin lasers of anger and condemnation at those that exploit women".[83] Sadhna also performed well at the box office where it became fifth highest-grossing film of 1958 with trade pundits declaring the film a box-office hit.[84] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala received two Filmfare nominations in Best actress category for Madhumati and Sadhna, where she won her first ever Filmfare trophy for the latter after refusing to accept the Best Supporting Actress Award trophy for Devdas (1955) earlier. Her next release was Amar Deep where she was paired against Dev Anand for the first time.[85] A production of Sivaji Ganesan's Sivaji Productions, the film was a remake of 1956 Tamil film Amara Deepam which had Ganesan himself in the lead.[86][86] Along with Padmini who reprised her role from the original,[87] Vyjayanthimala plays the role of Aruna which was originally performed by actress Savitri in Tamil.[88] Her other releases of 1958 Sitaroan Ke Aage and Piya Milan became average success.
In 2011, in conjunction with actor Dev Anand's death, Vyjayanthimala recollected her memories during the filming in Madras where she remembers the actor calling her "Papa", the Tamil termed that was used by her family and friends, and he would search for her throughout the sets while yelling "where is Papa, where is my heroine".[89] According to Subhash Chheda, when Amar Deep was released, the long-awaited airing of Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand was compared to the Madhubala and Dev Anand pair, where the public verdicted that ""If Madhubala brooks no equality, Vyjayanthimala admits no superiority".[67] Unfortunately, the film failed to turn Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand team into a hit pair.[67] The same year Vyjayanthimala was booked by M. G. Ramachandran for his second directorial venture Ponniyin Selvan.[90] One of the first screen adaptation of Kalki Krishnamurthy's Ponniyin Selvan the film had a huge ensemble cast consisting of Gemini Ganesan, Padmini, Savitri, Saroja Devi, M. N. Rajam and Nagesh along with Ramachandran and Vyjayanthimala.[91] In the film, she was given the role of Kundavai, the elder sister of Raja Raja Chola I, played by Ganesan and the wife of Vallavaraiyan Vandiyadevan, played by Ramachandran.[91] However, in the mid of 1958 the film was shelved for unknown reasons.[90] The same year she did another Tamil film Gemini Pictures's Magnum opus Vanjikottai Valiban along with Gemini Ganesan and Padmini.[92] Written by Gemini Story Department which was headed by Kothamangalam Subbu, the Black-and-white epic film was produced and directed by S. S. Vasan.[92] She played the role of Princess Mandakini, the beautiful princess of Ratna Island Kingdom. As a stubborn princess, she always wanted to achieve her ambition in any deed which led to her ultimate death and formed the climax. The film had a great theatrical run where the film completed 100 days run at cinemas and was labelled as blockbuster at box office.[93][94] The film is still remembered for the dance of Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the "Kannum Kannum Kalanthu" song which was choreographed by Hiralal and was well received by critics and audience alike wherein the popularity of the song surpassed the popularity garnered by the film.[92] The song is still regarded as one of the best dance sequences in Indian cinema.[95] Vanjikottai Valiban was followed by its Hindi version titled Raj Tilak. Screenplay of the film was by Ramanand Sagar. The film was directed by S. S. Vasan with Ganesan, Vyjayanthimala and Padmini in the lead.[96] Within a week, the film sank at box office and was unable to achieve the same box office success made by the Tamil version.[67] By the end of the year, The Indian Express named Vyjayanthimala as the most successful female star of 1958.[67] Similarly, Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at the top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress of 1958".[40]
1959–60: Return to Tamil films[edit]
In 1959, Vyjayanthimala reunited with Dilip Kumar for the fourth time in bilingual Paigham. Produced and directed by S. S. Vasan, the film featured the lead actors along with Raaj Kumar, B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Motilal.[97] Besides them, Vyjayanthimala's real-life mother Vasunthara Devi also acted in a small role where she played the role of mother to her own daughter who died in vain.[98] Upon release Paigham became second highest-grossing film of 1959 with a verdict of a box-office hit.[99] The same year she did a Tamil film, Athisaya Penn where she co-starred with Telugu actor Akkineni Nageswara Rao for the first time. Athisaya Penn was a remake of Aasha which again was directed by M. V. Raman. She acted opposite Pradeep Kumar in romantic film Jawani Ki Hawa in 1959.
In 1960, Vyjayanthimala mostly concentrated on Tamil films to keep in touch with the industry.[22] Her first release in 1960 was S. S. Vasan's Irumbu Thirai, the Tamil version of Paigham.[100] She starred opposite Sivaji Ganesan for the second time after the latter's cameo appearance in Marma Veeran (1956).[101] Along with Vyjayanthimala, all the female cast including B. Saroja Devi, Pandari Bai and Vasunthara Devi reprised their role from the original with S. V. Ranga Rao in Motilal's role and K. A. Thangavelu in Raaj Kumar's character.[97] The film was followed by Raja Bakthi again with Sivaji Ganesan. Raja Bakthi had huge ensemble cast featuring P. Bhanumathi, Padmini, T. S. Balaiah and E. V. Saroja. Her subsequent release was D. Yoganand's magnum opus Parthiban Kanavu. Co-starring Gemini Ganesan for the third time and B. Saroja Devi for the second time, the film was based on Kalki Krishnamurthy's 1942 novel with the same name.[90] Apart from Tamil, the film was produced in Telugu and Sinhala languages.[102] Upon release the film met with positive response from the critics and was awarded the National Film Award for Best Feature Film in Tamil at the 8th National Film Awards.[103] However the film did not fare well at box office but Vyjayanthimala's performance was appreciated by critics.[104] She also acted opposite M. G. Ramachandran for the first time in Baghdad Thirudan.[105] Meanwhile, she did a Hindi film titled College Girl opposite Shammi Kapoor which fared average at box office and was declared as eighteenth highest-grossing film of the year.[106]
1961–63: Reigns supreme in Hindi[edit]
Following successful re-entry in Tamil cinema, Vyjayanthimala then signed Dilip Kumar's home production film Gunga Jumna. Having inspired by 1934 Manhattan Melodrama, the film was one of the first Bollywood films to deal with the theme based on two brothers on the opposite sides of law.[107] Directed by Nitin Bose, she co-starred Kumar for the fifth time after Devdas, Naya Daur, Madhumati, Paigham. In this dacoit drama, she enacted the role of Dhanno, a washerwoman who falls for childhood friend Gunga, played by Kumar and eventually killed during a gun fight. To prepare herself for that role, Vyjayanthimala had to learn the Bhojpuri, a Hindi language dialect spoken by people in East India region. She was assisted by Kumar who chose the shade of saree that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene. Upon release the film opened to widespread critical acclaim from the critics. Her performance earned her rave reviews. Dinesh Raheja from Rediff said that "Ganga Jamuna deployed several crowd-pleasing elements[...]most of all, an enchanting relationship between Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala[...] Their characterisation ran so deep, which helped Dilip Kumar and Vyjayanthimala give magnetic performances. Dilip is of course a thespian but Vyjayanthimala is a revelation" while K. K. Rai from Stardust applauded her performance by adding "Vyjayanthimala played the village woman with such simplicity and grace; you’d forget she was one of the most glamorous stars of her time. She also spoke the Bhojpuri dialect like a native".[108][109] Critics praised Vyjayanthimala for her ability to master the Bhojpuri dialect despite her South Indian upbringing. Subsequently, the film enjoyed huge success at box office across India. At the end of its theatrical run, the film grossed around ₹ 70,000,000 with net gross of ₹35,000,000 and a verdict of a blockbuster.[110] The film was the Highest-grossing film of 1961 and was third highest grossing Hindi film of the decade behind Mughal-e-Azam and Sangam, another Kumar and Vyjayanthimala starer respectively.[111] The film was ranked second by Boxofficeindia.co.in behind Mughal-e-Azam in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which features all-time highest grossing Bollywood films by using the relative price of gold in different years to arrive at a hypothetical current value of box-office collections of past films with its adjustment to inflation rate. ₹7.36 billion (US$110 million).[112] For her performance Vyjayanthimala was awarded with the Filmfare Award for Best Actress trophy at the 9th Filmfare Awards.[113] In addition to that, she also won her first ever Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards in the Best Actress category.[114] In the same year, she starred in C. V. Sridhar's Nazrana. Remake of highly successful 1959 Tamil film Kalyana Parisu, again directed by Sridhar, she acted alongside Raj Kapoor for the first time. She played the role of Vasanthi wherein she replaced actress B. Saroja Devi who did not reprise her role from Kadhal Parisu and its Telugu remake Pelli Kanuka.[115] The triangular love story received average run at the cinemas and ended as twelfth highest-grossing film of that year.[110] The same year she did another film with Sridhar. Being the first Tamil film to be shot in Jammu and Kashmir, she acted alongside Gemini Ganesan after a long gap in Then Nilavu.[116] The film and the soundtrack was widely appreciated by the audience where it was a huge success.[117][118] The film was followed by J. Om Prakash's Aas Ka Panchhi with Rajendra Kumar.[119] For her portrayal Vyjayanthimala got some negative feedback from the critics, The Hindu review said that "Even the otherwise powerhouse of talent, Vyjayantimala, with many a sterling performance under her belt, barely passes muster, despite the usual dance and song sequence to showcase her formidable prowess as an accomplished dancer thrown in".[120] Despite some mixed reviews, the film was labelled as hit at box office and was declared as the fourth highest-grossing film of 1961 where it had a silver jubilee run at the theatres.[110][121]
Her career then struggled again with some box office duds in the following year. In 1962 she co-starred Manoj Kumar in Dr. Vidya which performed average at box office.[122] Dr. Vidya was followed by two more box office disappointments, Rungoli with Kishore Kumar and Jhoola with Sunil Dutt.
1963 saw a steady decline in offers for her Tamil film career as Saroja Devi, Savitri, Bhanumati and Padmini were getting thebest roles. She co-starred with Sivaji Ganesan in Historical fiction Chittoor Rani Padmini. Written by C. V. Sridhar and directed by Chitrapu Narayana Rao, the film proved to be a box office failure, however her performance was critically acclaimed.The same year Bimal Roy who earlier worked with her in Devdas and Madhumati offered her the lead role in Bandini opposite Ashok Kumar and Dharmendra.[123] However, Vyjayanthimala could not accept the role due to her busy schedule.[124] The Boxofficeindia.com ranked Vyjayanthimala at Top spot in their list of "Top Three Successful Box Office Actress" of 1962 and 1963 respectively despite her box office failures.[40]
1964–66: Commercial successes and critical acclaim[edit]
Following two years sabbatical, Vyjayanthimala re-attained her success in Bollywood through Raj Kapoor's first technicolor film Sangam. Termed as Kapoor's magnum opus, the film was produced at lavish budget by his production company R. K. Films. Earlier in the 1940s, Kapoor planned to launch Sangam in the title of Gharonda with Dilip Kumar and Nargis and himself in the lead, however the film was delayed for several times until 1962.[125] Following Kumar and Dev Anand's refusal to be a part of the film, Kapoor then fixed Rajendra Kumar and himself as the male leads.[126] Sangam was the first Indian film shot in Europe and outside of Asia. It was the longest running film in India when it was released at 238 minutes.[127] The film also created a record by being the first film to have two cinema intervals.[128] Cinematography by Radhu Kamarkar, the European filming locations include Venice, Paris, Switzerland and London while the Indian locations include Ooty and Kashmir Valley.[129] Upon release the film was well received by critics and was considered as Bollywood's greatest love triangle.[130] Vyjayanthimala's performance too was praised by critics. Dinesh Raheja of Rediff said that "to put it simply, radiant[...]the maturity with which she tackles her character, the insouciance as well as the agony" and call it as "one of commercial cinema's most unforgettable performances".[131] Similarly, the film was commercially successful throughout India and other country as well. On its overall theatrical run, Boxofficeindia.com reported that the film had grossed ₹8,00,00,000 and netted around ₹40,000,000 with its adjusted to inflation nett gross is about ₹843,900,000 (US$13 million).[132] Subsequently, the film was labelled as blockbuster where it was ranked as highest-grossing film of 1964 and second highest-grossing film of the decade.[133] The film was ranked at fourth by Boxofficeindia.co.in in their list of "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years" which feature all-time highest grossing Bollywood film with its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹7,173,154,362 (US$110 million).[112] Sangam also had great box office run outside of India where it was well received in countries such as China, Malaysia and Russia.[134][135] For her role Radha, who caught between her husband and her former lover, Vyjayanthimala was awarded with Filmfare Best Actress trophy. She then co-starred Dilip Kumar for the sixth time in Ram Mukherjee's Leader. The film was comeback film for Kumar whose last film was Gunga Jumna also with Vyjayanthimala.[136] Like most of Vyjayanthimala and Kumar's film, their screen chemistry receives praises from the critics, where Deepak Mahan from The Hindu said "What made the film even more enjoyable was the equally spirited response of doe-eyed Vyjayantimala, oozing oodles of impish charm in every frame. The pair carried the film on their shoulders, giving abundant joy and mirth to audiences with their outstanding histrionics. Their interactions make the film worth going miles to watch and it is certain that without their resolute shoulders".[137] However the film Leader did not fare well at the box office where it was labelled as below average.[132] During the making of Leader, Rediff describe Vyjayanthimala as "recalcitrant" which annoyed Kumar.[138] The film was followed by Gemini Film's Zindagi directed by Ramanand Sagar. A female centric film, it features Vyjayanthimala alongside Rajendra Kumar, Raaj Kumar and Prithviraj Kapoor.[139] Zindagi becomes success at box office where it celebrated silver jubilee theatrical run and was fourth highest-grossing film of that year with verdict hit.[132][140] Soon she signed for Anjali Pictures' Phoolon Ki Sej with Ashok Kumar and Manoj Kumar and this became her third consecutive hit of the year. Her last release in 1964 was Ishaara, in which she co-starred actor Joy Mukherjee for the first time and her performance ensured film was box office success.[141]
In 1965, Vyjayanthimala starred in two box office wise disappointing films Naya Kanoon with Ashok Kumar and Bharat Bhushan, Nam Iruvar with T. R. Mahalingam but both the's films are considered as masterpieces by critics. Naam Iruvar became her last Tamil film.
In 1966, Vyjayanthimala starred in Do Dilon Ki Dastaan which failed at the box office. After some box office flops, Vyjayanthimala soon signed alongside Rajendra Kumar in the swashbuckler ruritanian romance Suraj. Directed by T. Prakash Rao, the film had Mumtaz, Bharathi Vishnuvardhan and Neetu Singh. Suraj was huge box office success and was one of the popular costume drama in Bollywood.[142] Suraj was the last successful film of Rajendra Kumar and Shankar Jaikishan who introduced singer Sharda through this film.[143][144] According to Boxofficeindia.com, the film grossed around ₹50,000,000 with nett gross of ₹25,000,000 and becomes second highest-grossing film of 1966 with verdict super hit at box office.[145] The film was also thirteenth highest-grossing film of the decade with its adjust to inflation nett gross is about ₹511,800,000 (US$7.9 million).[133] While Ibosnetwork.com reported that the film ₹40,000,000 and its adjust to inflation gross is about ₹504,260,000 (US$7.8 million).[146] Following Suraj, Vyjayanthimala starred in the historical film Amrapali. Based on life of the Nagarvadhu (royal courtesan) of Vaishali, Amrapali, she played the title role along with Sunil Dutt who enacted the role of King Ajatashatru. Upon release the film was opened to widespread critical acclaim and was India's official submission for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 39th Academy Awards. The film was huge colossal flop which left Vyjayanthimala heartbroken where she decided to quit the industry, though director Baldev Raj Chopra felt that she could have easily continued for another decade in lead roles.[10]
1967–70: Later Career[edit]




Vyjayanthimala in 2013 Stardust Awards


After Amrapali which was the biggest flop in her career and some personal issues with co-stars, Vyjayanthimala lost interest in films. In 1967, she was signed in Tapi Chanakya's Ram Aur Shyam which was a remake of 1964 Telugu film Ramudu Bheemudu. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh time who previously had made some memorable films with her. However, due to some misunderstanding between Kumar and Vyjayanthimala, Vyjayanthimala was replaced by Waheeda Rehman. The same year she starred in Vijay Anand's Jewel Thief after Saira Banu backed out of the project due to her marriage with Dilip Kumar.[147] The crime thriller reunited Vyjayanthimala after a decade with her co-star Dev Anand after Amar Deep. Jewel Thief also had Ashok Kumar as the main antagonist with four more female leads Tanuja, Helen, Anju Mahendru and Faryal. For the first time she worked under Dev Anand's production house, the Navketan Films after being rejected by Tad Danielewski for the lead role in 1965 Hindi film Guide.[148] The success of Jewel Thief made Vyjayanthimala and Dev Anand a hit pair.[85] Three decades later, Vyjayanthimala was approached by Dev Anand for a role in the sequel of Jewel Thief, Return of Jewel Thief (1996), but she refused to act in the film as she did not planned to make a comeback.[149] Subsequently, Vyjayanthimala's dance number in "Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main" sung by Lata Mangeshkar becomes huge hit where it was considered as one of the best dance number in Indian cinema while being influential for the rises of other dance numbers such as "Chamma Chamma" and "Sheila Ki Jawani" from China Gate and Tees Maar Khan respectively.[150][151] The same year she did the magnum opus Chhoti Si Mulaqat produced by Bengali actor Uttam Kumar. Remake of 1954 Bengali film Agni Pariksha which had Uttam Kumar who reprises his role in the Hindi version and Suchitra Sen in the lead. Unlike the original version, Chhoti Si Mulaqat failed to create any box office record and was declared as box office disaster. Her last release in the year is Hatey Bazarey with Ashok Kumar. Inspired by Banaphool's novel with the same, the film was directed by acclaimed director Tapan Sinha where Vyjayanthimala made her Bengali cinema debut through the film.[152] She played the role of widowed young women - Chhipli - who falls for a civil surgeon Doctor Anandi Mukheerjee. Upon release the film received unanimously positive reviews where it was awarded with the Best Feature Film Award at the 15th National Film Awards while Vyjayanthimala's performance also appreciated by critics alike.[153] A review from Upperstall had mentioned that, "Vyjayantimala, in her debut in Bengali films is extremely convincing as the independent and vivacious tribal widow".[154] Similarly her singing in the song "Shyam Tor Tore Tamal Tolay Boshe Thaki" along with singer Hemanta Mukherjee received her praises where it was described as "pleasant surprise" in the same review.[154] Hatey Bazarey was also received well commercially and was one of the successful Bengali film of the 1960s.[154]
In 1968, Vyjayanthimala appeared in three big budget film with high-profile actors such as Dilip Kumar, Dev Anand and Rajendra Kumar. Her first release in the year was Sunghursh, directed by Mere Mehboob (1963) fame Harnam Singh Rawail. She co-starred Dilip Kumar for the seventh and last time in her career with Balraj Sahni and Sanjeev Kumar in key roles. Originally offered to actress Sadhana, the role later went to Vyjayanthimala as the former suffers with her thyroid problem.[155] Reportedly she did not exchange a word with Kumar while filming following their relationship broke up.[156] Vyjayanthimala's enactment of a courtesan Laila-e-Aasma, she received positive feedback from the critics. Anuj Kumar form The Hindu said that "Vyjayanthimala is graceful as ever. In a film dominated by men, Rawail made sure she had a substantial role. Her dances and Naushad’s lilting tunes come as a welcome break to the sinewy tone imparted by Abrar Alvi and Gulzar’s dialogues".[157] The role fetched her Best Hindi Actress Award at 25th Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards.[158] Sunghursh was followed by Saathi directed by C. V. Sridhar. Remake of highly acclaimed Tamil film of 1961, Palum Pazhamum, the film had Rajendra Kumar and Simi Garewal replacing Sivaji Ganesan and Sowcar Janaki respectively from the Tamil version with Vyjyanthimala enacting the role originally portrayed by B. Saroja Devi.[159] The same year she co-starred with Dev Anand for the third time and last time in T. Prakash Rao's Duniya.[160] Duniya, Saathi and Sunghursh was named as tenth, eleventh and twelfth highest-grossing film of 1968 respectively, with the first two was labelled as average while the latter only managed to do above average business at box office.[161] On the other hand, Duniya is considered as a hit film by some critics and often included in the hit film list of Dev Anand.[160]
All her films released from 1969, Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince and Ganwaar, became huge box office success. Ganwaar was her last Hindi film.
Films refused[edit]
Post her retirement in films, Vyjayanthimala was offered with many roles by big banners opposite leading actors of that time. But she refused all those offers as she does not want to make a comeback. In 1968, she was signed opposite Raj Kapoor in Mahesh Kaul's Sapno Ka Saudagar, she refused the role which went to the debutante Hema Malini, who become one of the biggest actress in Bollywood later.[162] However, in 1975, Vyjayanthimala was almost signed in Gulzar's Aandhi with Sanjeev Kumar but she backed out from the project as the role resemble Indira Gandhi's personal life.[163][164] Perhaps the most famous role that Vyjayanthimala ever turned down was the 1975 crime-drama film Deewar. Inspired by 1961 film Ganga Jumna, a Vyjayanthimala starer, the film was directed by Yash Chopra and features Amitabh Bachchan and Shashi Kapoor in the lead roles. She turned down the role of a mother for the lead actors which later went to Nirupa Roy who attained popularity through success of the film and later cast in similar roles.[165] Following that, she refused the multi-starrer 1981 blockbuster film Kranti opposite Dilip Kumar with Manoj Kumar, Shashi Kapoor, Hema Malini, Shatrughan Sinha, Parveen Babi, Sarika as the ensemble cast which was directed and produced by Manoj Kumar himself.[10] Apart from Hindi films, she refused the 1989 Tamil film Mappillai starring Rajinikanth. As said by Rajinikanth who played the lead role, "actor Vyjayanthimala was first offered the role of mother-in-law in Maapilai which was a pivotal role, but she refused the film even though the producer of the film Chiranjeevi come forward to give her huge salary, she said that she does not want to play the role of antagonist opposite me and will never agree to be part of fighting scene against me".[166] Following many films refused by Vyjayanthimala, Dinesh Raheja from Rediff commented that "good money and pivotal roles notwithstanding[...]did not seem alluring enough".[10]
Political career[edit]
Vyjayanthimala's political career was initiated in 1984 when she contested in 1984 Tamil Nadu general election for the South Chennai constituency as the nominee of the Indian National Congress opposite Era Sezhiyan, the leader of Janata Party and seasoned parliamentarian.[167] During the campaign, Sezhiyan took provoking quotes such as "Send me to the Lok Sabha. Send her to R.R. Sabha (an organisation promoting fine arts)"[167] to defeat Vyjayanthimala, ironically she won the election with margin of about 48,000 votes where she gained 313,848 with percentage of 51.92%.[167] Subsequently, she debuted in the Lok Sabha, the directly elected lower house of the Parliament of India by the end of January 1985 with Amitabh Bachchan.[168]
In 1989, Vyjayanthimala again had to face the 1989 Tamil Nadu general election, this time she was opposed by Aladi Aruna of the Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam.[167] She again beat her opposition by nearly 12584  votes.[167] Later in 1993, she was nominated to the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India for a six-year term.[21] In 1999, she has resigned from the primary membership of the Indian National Congress party.[169] In her letter to the party's president Sonia Gandhi, she included the reason for her resignation where she said that, "painfully watching the party drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi. The party has lost touch with its grassroots and one can see day in and day out that sincere party workers are being steadily ignored", she adds more, "increasingly difficult to justify ourselves to the public and my conscience does not allow me to stay in the party any longer".[169][170] Later she joined the Bharatiya Janata Party on 6 September 1999.[171][172]
Personal life[edit]
Relationships[edit]
In her hey-days, Vyjayanthimala was the subject of many controversies,[173] particularly for her relationship with her co-stars. In the early 1960s, Vyjayanthimala was linked by magazines with Dilip Kumar, who has acted with her the most compared to any other actress which resulted in great on-screen chemistry between them.[174] While working for his home production Gunga Jumna (1961), it is said that Kumar handpicked the shade of sari that Vyjayanthimala would wear in every scene.[138] In addition to that, film historians Bunny Reuben and Sanjit Narwekar have confirmed the Kumar & Vyjayanthimala's affair where they had said that Vyjayanthimala was Kumar's third love after Kamini Kaushal and Madhubala.[175]
In the early 1960s, actor Raj Kapoor had commenced the filming of Sangam with Vyjayanthimala playing the female lead along with Rajendra Kumar and Kapoor himself as male lead. The filming took four years to finish. During this time Vyjayanthimala is said to have been romantically involved with Kapoor and almost married him.[176][176] Initially, she was vexed with him and kept him at a distance. However Kapoor did not give up over her attitude.[177] This incident had made Kapoor's wife Krishna move out of her husband’s house with their children. They checked into Natraj Hotel in Mumbai and stayed there for four and a half months as Krishna was disgusted with the affair.[178] However Vyjayanthimala in her autobiography mentioned that it was the publicity stunt by newspapers in North India to link her with Raj Kapoor and Dilip Kumar and that she was never in any relationship with her co-stars.
Vyjayanthimala married Chamanlal Bali in 1968. After marriage, she gave up her acting career and moved to Chennai.However between 1968 and 1970, she shot for those films which she had signed before her marriage, like Pyar Hi Pyar, Prince, Ganwaar. They have a son, Suchindra Bali. In 2007, she published her autobiography, titled Bonding, with Jyoti Sabarwal as co-writer.[179]
Religious views[edit]
Vyjayanthimala is a Vaishnavite and a vegetarian.[21][180] She grew up listening to holy chants and devotional songs.[1] She is a devotee of Aandaal, one of the 12 Alvar saints of South India.[21] She used to invoke Aandaal before any public performance to gain her blessing.[21]
Awards[edit]
Main article: List of awards and nominations received by Vyjayanthimala
Notable filmography[edit]
Further information: Vyjayanthimala filmography


Year
Film
Role
Language
Notes and Awards


1949
Vazhkai
Mohana Sivashankaralingam
Tamil



1950
Jeevitham
Mohini Sivashankaralingeswara Prasad
Telugu



1951
Bahar
Lata
Hindi



1954
Sangham
Radha
Telugu



1954
Nagin
Mala
Hindi



1955
Devdas
Chandramukhi
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress


1956
New Delhi
Janaki Subramaniam
Hindi



1957
Naya Daur
Rajni
Hindi



Kathputli
Pushpa
Hindi



Aasha
Nirmala
Hindi



1958
Sadhna
Champabai
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Vanjikottai Valiban
Mandakini
Tamil



Madhumati
Madhumati / Madhavi / Radha
Hindi
Nominated—Filmfare Award for Best Actress


1959
Paigham
Manju
Hindi



1960
Parthiban Kanavu
Kundhavi
Tamil



Irumbu Thirai
Manju
Tamil



Baghdad Thirudan
Zarina
Tamil



1961
Then Nilavu
Shanthi
Tamil



Gunga Jumna
Dhanno
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress
BFJA Award for Best Actress


1964
Sangam
Radha
Hindi
Filmfare Award for Best Actress


Leader
Princess Sunita
Hindi



1966
Amrapali
Amrapali
Hindi



Suraj
Princess Anuradha Singh
Hindi



1967
Hatey Bazarey
Chhipli
Bengali



Jewel Thief
Shalini Singh / Shalu
Hindi



1968
Sunghursh
Munni / Laila-E-Aasmaan
Hindi
BFJA Award for Best Actress


Saathi
Shanti / Sharada
Hindi



1969
Prince
Princess Amrita
Hindi



See also[edit]


Bollywood portal



List of Indian film actresses
List of Tamil film families
List of Indian women in dance
List of actors who have played multiple roles in the same film
List of item numbers in Indian cinema

References[edit]


^ a b c Kumar, Divya (25 February 2009). "All the city is a stage". The Hindu. Retrieved 17 June 2011. 
^ India TV News Desk (13 August 2015). "How Vyjayanthimala became the first female superstar of Bollywood!". India TV. Retrieved 5 April 2017. 
^ a b Piyush Roy (19 March 2011). "Starduats interview: Madhuri Dixit: A Life In Beauty". Mumbai: Stardust. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala, Nutan, Meena Kumari on a high". Filmnirvana.com. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (25 October 2009). "Bollywood, here come the south stars!". The Times of India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "Bollywood Divas: Sizzler of Sixties". Hindustan Times. 2004. Retrieved 1 September 2011. 
^ Prashant Singh (25 April 2009). "Return of southern spice girls". India Today. Mumbai. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ Dibyojyoti Baksi (Indo-Asian News Service) (21 September 2011). "Camera does wonders today: Vyjayanthimala (Interview)". Mumbai: Sify. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ TheThirdMan. "Vyjayanthimala". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ a b c d e f Dinesh Raheja (6 May 2002). "Bollywood's Dancing Queen". Rediff. Retrieved 2 January 2011. 
^ Priyanka Sharma (5 January 2011). "Salsa, Latino edging out Indian classical dances in Bollywood?". Sify. Retrieved 16 August 2011. 
^ Jasmine Singh (13 July 2008). "Twinkle toes". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 20 August 2011. 
^ R. K. (9 May 2008). "A legend in her lifetime". The Hindu. Hyderabad, India. Retrieved 3 January 2012. 
^ "The Beauty Queens of Yesteryears". Behindwoods. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ http://tiger.ndtv.com/gallerydetails.aspx?Page=12&ID=207
^ Sukanya Verma (4 March 2004). "What if Amrapali were remade today?". Rediff. Retrieved 6 October 2013. 
^ "Gursharan gets 'Akademi Ratna'". United News of India, Press Trust of India. 1 March 2007. Archived from the original on 4 March 2007. Retrieved 27 August 2011. 
^ "Perfect strokes". Deccan Chronicle. Chennai. 8 September 2011. Retrieved 10 September 2011. 
^ "Jury Members for the 48th National film Awards (Feature Films)". Press Information Bureau (PIB), India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (23 November 2007). "Blast from the past: Mangamma Sapatham". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 26 February 2011. 
^ a b c d e f R. C. Rajamani (23 November 2007). "Dance is futile without devotion". The Statesman. Chennai, India. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Sudha Umashanker (19 April 2001). "Bali uncensored". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b Professor S. K. Ananda Thirtha (2000). "When I was acting, I was not married, When I was married, I was not acting". Mysore, Karnataka: Ourkarnataka.com. Retrieved 4 December 2011. 
^ "Sruti Foundation awards presented". The Hindu. Chennai, Tamil Nadu. 22 August 2010. Retrieved 20 April 2011. 
^ http://www.info2india.com/bollywood/celebrity/vyjayanthimala.html
^ Anjana Rajan (20 January 2007). "A golden innings". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (5 November 2009). "Blast from the past: Vijayakumari (1950)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (14 February 2003). "Actress who glowed with inner beauty". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Bahar". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1951". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ Randor Guy (5 October 2011). "A voice that mesmerised". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ S. R. Ashok Kumar ki (26 February 2006). "Finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Anjali Devi Sathabhishekam function". Indiaglitz.com. 27 February 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Commemorative postage stamp on Gemini Ganesan". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 26 February 2006. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Ladki". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1953". Box Office India. Retrieved 6 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1954". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ "Nagin (1954)". Filmfare via Cineplot.com. 20 November 2010. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ a b c Vijay Lokapally (7 May 2010). "Blast From The Past: Nagin (1954)". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c "Top Actress". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 March 2011. 
^ a b c Janaki Vishwanathan (30 May 2010). "The Kaapi Diaries". Mumbai: MiD DAY. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ S. Shyam Prasad (7 February 2010). "South Masala: For the record". Bangalore Mirror. Retrieved 26 June 2011. 
^ a b c Lata Khubchandani (5 July 2002). "I did not approve of Vyjayanthimala as Chandramukhi". Rediff. Retrieved 11 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 February 2002). "An eternal love story: Devdas". Rediff. Retrieved 12 May 2011. 
^ a b "Devdas". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (30 October 2006). "Bollywood's top tawaifs". Rediff. Retrieved 30 September 2011. 
^ Nikhat Kazmi (16 January 2006). "Tart with a heart". The Times of India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1955". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 December 2009). "Blast from the past: Kanavaney Kankanda Deivam". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 27 March 2011. 
^ Karan Bali (21 December 2009). "Devta". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 18 October 2011. 
^ Sherry Nagpal (8 July 2012). "Jabeen Jalil – Interview". Cineplot.com. Retrieved 10 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1956". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2011. 
^ The Third Man. "New Delhi". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 5 May 2011. 
^ "Naya Daur". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Prithwish Ganguly (3 November 2009). "Revisiting Naya Daur’s purana memories". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (31 August 2002). "Naya Daur: A utopian ideal". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (3 August 2007). "Naya Daur (1957)". Bollywood Hungama. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 2 May 2011. 
^ Bose, Derek (2006). Everybody wants a hit: 10 mantras of success in Bollywood cinema. Jaico Publishing House. p. 1. ISBN 978-81-7992-558-4. Retrieved 23 February 2011. 
^ a b Deepa Karmalkar (23 October 2009). "The Talent Mine". The Indian Express. Retrieved 3 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (20 September 2002). "The immense talent of Balraj Shani". Rediff. Retrieved 8 May 2011. 
^ a b c Ranjan Das Gupta (9 August 2011). "My first break Vyjayanthimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 19 November 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (2 June 2003). "Ever the royal: Pradeep Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 30 June 2011. 
^ a b "1957: Year that was". The Indian Express. 27 February 1998. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ "Box Office 1957". Box Office India. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (10 June 2002). "Asha Parekh: Bollywood glamorous good girl". Rediff. Retrieved 10 June 2011. 
^ a b c d e Subhash Chheda (24 April 1998). "1958: Year that was". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ Gowri Ramnarayan (19 September 2003). "From pages of the past". The Hindu. Retrieved 4 January 2012. 
^ a b Roshmila Bhattacharya (10 April 2008). "'I never imagined I’d look so lovely'". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Harneet Singh (2 October 2011). "A Class Apart". The Indian Express. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ M. L. Dhawan (11 May 2008). "The ghost story". The Tribune. Retrieved 15 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1950-1959 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Shahid Khan. "Madhumati Review". Planetbollywood.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Madhumati review". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Mishra, Vijay (2002), Bollywood cinema: temples of desire, Routledge, pp. 49–57, ISBN 0-415-93014-6 
^ Dinesh Raheja (21 May 2002). "The mysticism of Madhumati". Rediff. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Hetal Vyas (7 August 2008). "Ashanti nags Om Shanti Om". Mumbai Mirror. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (13 February 2003). "Petite powerhouse Nimmi". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R. Chopra — master of socially relevant filmmaking". Daily News and Analysis. Indo-Asian News Service. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "B.R.Chopra made socially relevant films". The Hindu. Press Trust of India. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 20 January 2011. 
^ Vijay Lokapally (13 December 2008). "Blast From The Past: Sadhna 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 16 January 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (29 June 2002). "Sadhana: a reformist tale". Rediff. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1958". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Dev Anand was stylish and well-read: Vyjayanthimala". Hindustan Times. Indo-Asian News Service. 6 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b "Rajini launches Chandramukhi's Music". Rediff. 7 March 2005. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Arup Chanda (25 September 2006). "Padmini brought grace and drama to celluloid". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Savithri profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Waheeda recalls the warmth of his affable personality". The Hindu. 4 December 2011. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ a b c A. Srivathsan (19 October 2011). "Age hardly withers charm of Ponniyin Selvan". The Hindu. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b "Ponniyin Selvan Movie Attempts – is it a curse or lack of purse : MGR – Gemini Ganeshan – Vyjayanthimala Bali". 600024.com. 31 May 2011. Retrieved 21 January 2012. 
^ a b c Randor Guy (26 March 2011). "Vanjikottai Vaaliban 1958". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subha J Rao (1 February 2011). "Memories of Madras — Shades of a bygone era". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ "Mega star, mega film, mega hype". The Hindu. 15 June 2007. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (9 September 2006). "Beauty, charm, charisma". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 January 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (14 December 2005). "Ramanand Sagar: An Obituary". Sify. Retrieved 25 January 2012. 
^ a b Randor Guy (21 February 2003). "Remembering Pandari Bai". The Indian Express. Retrieved 25 November 2011. 
^ K. Pradeep (2 November 2011). "Dance and Vyjayantimala". The Hindu. Retrieved 26 January 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1959". Box Office India. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (23 May 2003). "With a finger on people's pulse". The Hindu. Retrieved 27 January 2012. 
^ SRA (12 October 2001). "Stamp to honour Sivaji". The Hindu. Chennai, India. Retrieved 28 January 2012. 
^ "Popular director Yoganand passes away". Oneindia.in. 26 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Director Yoganand is no more". Indiaglitz.com. 28 November 2006. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Randor Guy (29 May 2009). "Paarthibhan Kanavu 1960". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Anjana Rajan (15 January 2007). "Screen, stage and beyond". The Hindu. Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1960". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 February 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahan (4 March 2010). "Gunga Jamuna (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (7 May 2002). "The Tragic Irony of Ganga Jumna". Rediff. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ Gaurav Malani (17 April 2008). "Stardust Classic: Ganga Jumna (1961)". Stardust. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1961". Box Office India. Retrieved 23 September 2012. 
^ "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ a b Nitin Tej Ahuja; Vajir Singh; Saurabh Sinha (3 November 2011). "Top 50 Film of Last 50 Years". Boxofficeindia.co.in. Retrieved 9 March 2012. 
^ "The Winners - 1960". The Times of India. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Sri (27 April 2009). "Chit Chat with Jamuna". Telugucinema.com. Retrieved 11 March 2012. 
^ "Tamil film director Sridhar passes away". The Indian Express. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 20 October 2008. 
^ V. Balasubramaniam (16 June 2006). "In a class of his own". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "C.V Sridhar, veteran director passes away!". Sify. 20 October 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (12 February 2008). "Jubilee Hero, Rajendra Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ A. P. S. Malhotra (30 September 2011). "Aas Ka Panchhi (1961)". The Hindu. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (16 July 1999). "Melodrama was his forte". The Tribune. Retrieved 10 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1962". Box Office India. Retrieved 17 March 2012. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Jasmine Singh (12 November 2011). "Hoton pe aisi baat...". The Tribune. Chandigarh. Retrieved 12 November 2011. 
^ Surendra Miglani (28 May 2006). "Sangam revisited". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 November 2008). "Blast of the Past : Sangam 1964". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Raja Sen (19 August 2006). "The 10 longest films in Hindi cinema". Rediff. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Ranjita Biswas (31 October 2003). "Bollywood embraces foreign backdrops". Asia Times. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar. "Happily ever after". Deccan Herald. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (16 May 2002). "The throbbing intensity of Sangam". Rediff. Retrieved 18 March 2012. 
^ a b c "Box Office 1964". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ a b "Top Earners 1960-1969 (Figures in Ind Rs)". Box Office India. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Rana Siddique Zaman (27 August 2009). "China in Bollywood". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Wani Muthiah (29 February 2008). "Don't underrate women in politics". The Hindu. Retrieved 20 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (27 May 2002). "Tragedy King Dilip Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (24 June 2010). "Leader (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ a b Raju Bharatan (2 July 2008). "Dilip Kumar and his women". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Deepak Mahaan (25 December 2011). "Blast From The Past: Zindagi (1964)". The Hindu. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Ramanand Sagar - man behind the 'Ramayana'". Outlook. Press Trust of India. 13 December 2005. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Mumbai Mirror (10 March 2012). "Joy Mukherjee: The Joy of cinema". The Times of India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (19 November 2004). "From Mallika Sherawat to 'mallika-e-husn'". Sify. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (9 July 2002). "Bollywood's Jubilee Kumar". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Rajiv Vijayakar (12 September 2001). "Masters of melody". Rediff. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1966". Box Office India. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ "Suraj". Ibosnetwork.com. Retrieved 24 March 2012. 
^ Farhana Farook (27 August 2008). "A legend retold". Daily News and Analysis. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Devinder Bir Kaur (7 March 2004). "Goldie: Guide for new filmmakers". The Tribune. Retrieved 17 April 2012. 
^ Vyjayanthimala Bali (5 December 2011). "A man full of energy". Hindustan Times. Retrieved 18 April 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (2 April 2002). "What I've done in Company can't be defined". Mumbai, India: Rediff. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K Jha (15 August 2010). "Katrina craves to be raunchier than Malaika". Mumbai, India: Mid Day. Retrieved 22 July 2012. 
^ "The Master at His Best". The Indian Express. 16 January 2009. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Boorback. "Tapan Sinha Profile". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b c Karan Bali. "Hatey Bazarey". Upperstall.com. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Dinesh Raheja (11 February 2002). "Sadhana's Song". Rediff. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Subhash K. Jha (2 January 2004). "Will a Hindu-Muslim love story work?". Sify. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ Anuj Kumar (15 March 2009). "Blast From The Past: Sunghursh (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ "25th Annual BFJA Awards". BFJA. Archived from the original on 24 February 2008. Retrieved 24 July 2012. 
^ Vijay Lokappally (4 November 2011). "Saathi (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 23 July 2012. 
^ a b Suresh Kohli (17 February 2012). "Duniya (1968)". The Hindu. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ "Box Office 1968". Box Office India. Retrieved 25 July 2012. 
^ Karan Bali. "Mahesh Kaul Biography". Upperstall. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Nonika Singh (27 November 2011). "From Naagin to nritya". The Tribune. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Down Memory Lane". The Indian Express. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ Jitendra Kothari (15 October 2004). "Nirupa Roy: Eternal Mother". Rediff. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala Refuses Rajini's Maapilai" (in Tamil). Oneindia.in. 24 April 2010. Retrieved 20 May 2013. 
^ a b c d e T. Ramakrishnan; R.K. Radhakrishnan; Raktima Bose (9 May 2009). "Actor’s South Chennai link". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ Vandita Mishra (23 August 2010). "Gas leak outrage: Cutting through the fog". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ a b United News of India (28 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Indian Express. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ United News of India (27 August 1999). "Vyjayanthimala quits Congress". The Tribune. New Delhi. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "National Events in 1999". The Hindu. Retrieved 14 May 2011. 
^ "Independent India". Sify. Retrieved 15 May 2011. 
^ Coomi Kapoor (8 October 2007). "Personalised fiction, anyone?". The Star. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bharati Dubey (3 December 2009). "Love in the time of flops". The Times of India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Suresh Kohli (8 January 2004). "Celebrating The Tragedy King". The Hindu. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ a b Tavishi Paitandy Rastogi (14 September 2007). "Vyjayanthimala's autobiography leaves Kapoor clan fuming". Hindustan Times. New Delhi, India. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ Bunny Reuben (2 June 1998). "Vignettes from the life of the showman: The Reign of Raj". Rediff. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ United News of India (13 September 2007). "Bunny Reuben's daughter speaks out in favour of Rishi Kapoor". Mumbai, India: Oneindia.in. Retrieved 30 January 2012. 
^ "On life and the arts". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 13 September 2007. 
^ "Vyjayanthimala". Cineplot.com. 20 May 2010. Retrieved 1 October 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Vyjayanthimala.



Vyjayanthimala on IMDb







v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Actress



1954-1960



Meena Kumari (1954)
Meena Kumari (1955)
Kamini Kaushal (1956)
Nutan (1957)
Nargis (1958)
Vyjayanthimala (1959)
Nutan (1960)





1961-1980



Bina Rai (1961)
Vyjayanthimala (1962)
Meena Kumari (1963)
Nutan (1964)
Vyjayanthimala (1965)
Meena Kumari (1966)
Waheeda Rehman (1967)
Nutan (1968)
Waheeda Rehman (1969)
Sharmila Tagore (1970)
Mumtaz (1971)
Asha Parekh (1972)
Hema Malini (1973)
Dimple Kapadia & Jaya Bachchan (1974)
Jaya Bachchan (1975)
Lakshmi (1976)
Raakhee Gulzar (1977)
Shabana Azmi (1978)
Nutan (1979)
Jaya Bachchan (1980)





1981-2000



Rekha (1981)
Smita Patil (1982)
Padmini Kolhapure (1983)
Shabana Azmi (1984)
Shabana Azmi (1985)
Dimple Kapadia (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Rekha (1989)
Sridevi (1990)
Madhuri Dixit (1991)
Sridevi (1992)
Madhuri Dixit (1993)
Juhi Chawla (1994)
Madhuri Dixit (1995)
Kajol (1996)
Karisma Kapoor (1997)
Madhuri Dixit (1998)
Kajol (1999)
Aishwarya Rai (2000)





2001-present



Karisma Kapoor (2001)
Kajol (2002)
Aishwarya Rai (2003)
Preity Zinta (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Rani Mukerji (2006)
Kajol (2007)
Kareena Kapoor (2008)
Priyanka Chopra (2009)
Vidya Balan (2010)
Kajol (2011)
Vidya Balan (2012)
Vidya Balan (2013)
Deepika Padukone (2014)
Kangana Ranaut (2015)
Deepika Padukone (2016)
Alia Bhatt (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress



1955–1975



Usha Kiran (1955)
Nirupa Roy (1956)
Vyjayanthimala (1957)
Shyama (1958)
Nalini Jaywant (1959)
Lalita Pawar (1960)
Nanda (1961)
Nirupa Roy (1962)
Shashikala (1963)
Shashikala (1964)
Nirupa Roy (1965)
Padmini (1966)
Simi Garewal (1967)
Jamuna Ramanarao (1968)
Simi Garewal (1969)
Tanuja Samarth (1970)
Chaand Usmani (1971)
Farida Jalal (1972)
Zeenat Aman (1973)
Raakhee (1974)
Durga Khote (1975)





1976–2000



Nadira (1976)
Kajri (1977)
Asha Sachdev (1978)
Reena Roy (1979)
Helen (1980)
Padmini Kolhapure (1981)
Supriya Pathak (1982)
Supriya Pathak (1983)
Rohini Hattangadi (1984)
Aruna Irani (1985)
Nutan (1986)
Not awarded (1987)
Not awarded (1988)
Sonu Walia (1989)
Raakhee (1990)
Rohini Hattangadi (1991)
Farida Jalal (1992)
Aruna Irani (1993)
Amrita Singh (1994)
Dimple Kapadia (1995)
Farida Jalal (1996)
Rekha (1997)
Karisma Kapoor (1998)
Rani Mukerji (1999)
Sushmita Sen (2000)





2000–present



Jaya Bachchan (2001)
Jaya Bachchan (2002)
Madhuri Dixit (2003)
Jaya Bachchan (2004)
Rani Mukerji (2005)
Ayesha Kapur (2006)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2007)
Konkona Sen Sharma (2008)
Kangana Ranaut (2009)
Kalki Koechlin (2010)
Kareena Kapoor (2011)
Rani Mukerji (2012)
Anushka Sharma (2013)
Supriya Pathak (2014)
Tabu (2015)
Priyanka Chopra (2016)
Shabana Azmi (2017)












v
t
e


Filmfare Award for Lifetime Achievement






Amitabh Bachchan (1991)
Dev Anand (1992)
Dilip Kumar (1993)
Lata Mangeshkar (1994)
Shammi Kapoor & Waheeda Rehman (1995)
Ashok Kumar, Sunil Dutt & Vyjayanthimala (1996)
Dharmendra, Mumtaz & Pran (1997)
Sharmila Tagore (1998)
Manoj Kumar & Helen (1999)
Vinod Khanna & Hema Malini (2000)
Feroz Khan & Asha Bhosle (2001)
Gulzar & Asha Parekh (2002)
Jeetendra (2003)
Sulochana Latkar, Nirupa Roy & B.R. Chopra (2004)
Rajesh Khanna (2005)
Shabana Azmi (2006)
Javed Akhtar & Jaya Bachchan (2007)
Rishi Kapoor (2008)
Bhanu Athaiya & Om Puri (2009)
Shashi Kapoor & Khayyam (2010)
Manna Dey (2011)
Pyarelal & Aruna Irani (2012)
Yash Chopra (2013)
Tanuja (2014)
Kamini Kaushal (2015)
Moushumi Chatterjee (2016)









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 18821648
LCCN: n89291733
GND: 136990118










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Vyjayanthimala&oldid=791185558"					
Categories: 20th-century Indian actressesIndian film actressesActresses in Hindi cinema1936 birthsLiving peoplePoliticians from ChennaiRecipients of the Sangeet Natak Akademi AwardIndian actor-politicians8th Lok Sabha members9th Lok Sabha membersPerformers of Indian classical danceBharatanatyam exponentsBharatiya Janata Party politiciansFemale Carnatic singersBengal Film Journalists' Association Award winnersIndian National Congress politicians from Tamil NaduIndian women choreographersIndian choreographersIndian classical choreographersIndian film choreographersIndian female film singersBollywood playback singersWomen in Tamil Nadu politicsTamil Nadu politiciansIndian dance teachersActresses in Bengali cinemaNominated members of the Rajya Sabha6th Lok Sabha members7th Lok Sabha membersLok Sabha members from Tamil NaduActresses from Tamil NaduRecipients of the Padma Shri in artsDancers from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian dancersWomen artists from Tamil NaduIndian women educatorsTeachers of Indian classical dance20th-century Indian women artistsEducators from Tamil Nadu20th-century Indian women politicians20th-century Indian educatorsHidden categories: CS1 Tamil-language sources (ta)EngvarB from September 2013Use dmy dates from September 2013Biography with signatureArticles with hCardsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


বাংলাभोजपुरीDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Հայերենहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमैथिलीമലയാളംमराठीनेपालीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀРусскийSuomiதமிழ்తెలుగుاردو 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 17:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Long hair - Wikipedia






















 







Long hair

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Hair length)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about human head hair. For other uses, see Longhair (disambiguation).




A man with shoulder length hair, 1599






A woman with waist length hair


Long hair is a hairstyle where the head hair is allowed to grow to considerable length. Exactly what constitutes long hair can change from culture to culture, or even within cultures. For example, a woman with chin-length hair in some cultures may be said to have short hair, while a man with the same length of hair in some of the same cultures would be said to have long hair.
Males having short, cut hair are in many cultures viewed as being under society's control, such as while in the military or prison or as punishment for a crime. Although recently in The United States it has become more socially acceptable and more common for men to have hair reaching all the way down to their upper back. Long, thick hair has been a sign of wealth, power or prominence throughout time and history.[citation needed]
Long lustrous female hair is generally rated attractive by both men and women across cultures.[1][2] The prevalence of trichophilia (hair partialism or fetishism) is 7% in the population, and very long hair is a common subject of devotion in this group.[3][4]



Contents


1 Biological significance
2 Psychological significance
3 Cultural meaning
4 Transferred meaning
5 Hair lengths

5.1 Maximum hair length


6 Cultural history

6.1 In Jewish and Christian scriptures
6.2 Western culture

6.2.1 Ancient Greece and Rome
6.2.2 Middle Ages
6.2.3 Recent trends among women
6.2.4 Recent trends among men
6.2.5 African Americans
6.2.6 Contemporary North America


6.3 Middle East

6.3.1 Judaism
6.3.2 Islam


6.4 Native Americans
6.5 Africa
6.6 Asia

6.6.1 China
6.6.2 Southeast Asia
6.6.3 Japan
6.6.4 Sikhism




7 See also
8 Images
9 References
10 Bibliography



Biological significance[edit]




A woman with mid-back level hair


Humans, horses, and orangutans are among the few species that may grow their head hair very long. Humans are believed to have lost their fur 2.5–3 million years ago as hominids when transitioning from a forest habitat to the open savanna, as an effect of natural selection, since this development made it possible to run fast and hunt animals close to the equator without getting overheated. An exception was however head hair, which was kept to provide thermal insulation of the scalp from the sun, to protect against ultra-violet radiation exposure, and also to provide cooling (when sweat evaporates from soaked hair).[citation needed] The ability to grow straight hair, has been observed among Homo sapiens sub-groups in less sunny regions further away from the equator. Relative to kinky Afro-textured hair, straight hair allows more UV light to pass to the scalp (which is essential for the production of vitamin D, that is important for bone development).
Scientists also view the ability to grow very long hair as a result of sexual selection, since long and healthy hair is a sign of fertility and youth.[5][need quotation to verify] An evolutionary biology explanation for this attraction is that hair length and quality can act as a cue to youth and health, signifying a woman's reproductive potential.[6] As hair grows slowly, long hair may reveal 2–3 years of a person's health status, nutrition, age and reproductive fitness. Malnutrition and deficiencies in minerals and vitamins due to starvation causes loss of hair or changes in hair color (e.g. dark hair turning reddish).[7]
Psychological significance[edit]
Anthropologists speculate that the functional significance of long head hair may be adornment, a by-product of secondary natural selection once other androgenic/somatic hair (body hair) had largely been lost. Another possibility is that long head hair is a result of Fisherian runaway sexual selection, where long lustrous hair is a visible marker for a healthy individual. For some groups or individuals, however, short hair is the selected trait.[5]
By seven to nine months, infants can tell the sexes apart based on hair length, voice pitch and faces.[8]
Cultural meaning[edit]
Ways of life often viewed as more rigid, such as soldiers and religious cultures, frequently have explicit rules regarding hair length. For example, Buddhist monks shave their heads as part of their order of worship.[9] Similarly, religious men with long hair include the Nazarites of the Hebrew Bible (Samson being a famous example)[10] and the Sikhs.[11] Subservient cultures may view male long hair negatively, and are sometimes detected by their rulers through hair length, as was the case with the Gaelic Irish under English rule and the Moors under Spanish rule in Medieval Spain.[clarification needed]
East Asian cultures have traditionally seen long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up in styles such as the ponytail, plait, or any bun.[12]
Transferred meaning[edit]
The traditional connotation of "long hair" in English meant, roughly, someone artistically knowledgeable or wise, an aesthete.[13] As a descriptive term, it has been applied to Merovingians and classical music enthusiasts, as well as hippies and aesthetes.[13]
Hair lengths[edit]







A Polish woman with armpit length hair








An american woman with mid back length hair








An Italian woman with waist length hair








A Sri Lankan woman with classic length hair








Tibetan woman with thigh-length hair








Manhattan woman with knee-length braided hair





Hair length is most often measured (in centimeters or inches) from the line of the scalp on the forehead up over the highest point of the skull to its termination, and sometimes from the crown, the latter resulting in 10 centimeter lower values in average.[14] In cosmetology, hair lengths are usually categorized according to the part of the body where the bulk of the longest hair terminates: chin level, shoulder length, lower shoulderblade/mid-back level, waist length, hip-length, classic length (extends to almost buttock-length, i.e. upper thigh-length, where the legs meet the buttocks), thigh-length, knee-length and ankle/floor length hair.[14][15]
Hair usually takes about two years to reach shoulder length,[16] and about seven years to reach waist-length/hip-length, including occasional trims (approximately 80–90 cm (32–36 inches) from forehead for most people) [15][16]
Maximum hair length[edit]




Portrait of Julie Manet by Renoir, 1894


The maximum hair length that is possible to reach is about 15 cm (6 in) for infants (below the age of 1), about 60 cm (24 in) for children, and generally 100 cm (40 in) for adults. Documentation for decrease of the maximum length with age cannot be found in the literature. Some individuals can reach excessive lengths. Lengths greater than 150 cm (59 in) are frequently observed in long hair contests.[17] Xie Qiuping had the longest documented hair in the world, measuring 5.627 m (18 ft 5.54 in) in May 2004.[18]
The maximum terminal hair length depends on the length of the anagen (period of hair growth) for the individual. Waist-length hair or longer is only possible to reach for people with long anagen. The anagen lasts between 2 and 7 years, for some individuals even longer, and follows by shorter catagen (transition) and telogen (resting) periods. At any given time, about 85% of hair strands are in anagen.[19] The fibroblast growth factor 5 (FGF5) gene affects the hair cycle in mammals including humans; blocking FGF5 in the human scalp (by applying a herbal extract that blocked FGF5) extends the hair cycle, resulting in less hair fall and increased hair growth.[20]
Cultural history[edit]
In Jewish and Christian scriptures[edit]



"She, as a veil down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned golden tresses wore
Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved,
As the vine curls her tendrils..."



– John Milton's description of Eve in Paradise Lost


In the Old Testament, the Nazirites would go for long periods of time without cutting their hair to show devotion to God.[21] Samson is one example; his strength depended upon his refraining from cutting his hair, described as worn in "seven locks".[10]
In the New Testament, Saint Paul (formerly Saul of Tarsus) wrote, "Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. But if any seem contentious, we have no such custom, neither do the churches of God."[22]
An interpretation from observing nature: The male animals such as the Lion have the longer hair than the female; thus it is not a shame for a man to have long hair.
Western culture[edit]
Ancient Greece and Rome[edit]
In ancient Greece, long male hair was a symbol of wealth and power, while a shaven head was appropriate for a slave. The ancient Greeks had several gods and heroes who wore their hair long, including Zeus, Achilles, Apollo, and Poseidon. Greek soldiers are said to have worn their hair long in battle. Such warriors considered it a sign of aristocracy and are said to have combed it openly in order to show off. Also, in order to keep enemies from getting a hold of it in battle, they were known to cut the front short, but leave it long in the back, where it was more out of reach. A widely held alternative interpretation of the conventional belief is that they kept it long, and simply tied it back in a style known as a ponytail in order to keep it out of their enemies' reach. The ponytail method allowed warriors, who often traveled to battle with a minimal amount of equipment in order to avoid excessively heavy loads over long marches, to keep their hair manageable with a small piece of string to hold their pony tail in place and a knife to cut the back to length with one simple slice. Around the sixth century, however, the Greek men shifted to shorter hairstyles, with the exception of the Spartans. Women in the culture remained with the longer style, which for them showed freedom, health, and wealth, as well as good behavior.[23] In men, it was considered a sign of false pride by this time.[24]
Pliny the Elder in his Natural History and Varro related that the Romans did not begin to cut their hair short until barbers were introduced to Italy from Sicily by P. Ticinius Mena in 299 BC.[25] Women in Roman times valued long hair, usually with a center part. Apart from in the earliest times, men's hair was usually shorter than women's, although other cultures of the time, such as Greeks in the east, considered long hair to be typical of philosophers, who were thought to be too engrossed in learning to bother with hair.[26] Strictly in the province of Rome, however, the shorter hairstyle was especially popular.[24] When Julius Caesar conquered the Gauls, who favored long hair, he ordered it to be cut short.[27]
Middle Ages[edit]
In the European middle ages, shorter hair often signified servitude and peasantry, while long hair was often attributed to freemen, as was the case with the Germanic Goths and Merovingians.
The Gaelic Irish (both men and women)[28] took great pride in their long hair—for example, a person could be heavily fined for cutting a man's hair short against his will.[29] When the Anglo-Normans and the English colonized Ireland, hair length came to signify one's allegiance. Irishmen who cut their hair short were deemed to be forsaking their Irish heritage. Likewise, English colonists who wore their hair long in the back were deemed to be forsaking their role as English subjects and giving in to the Irish life. Thus, hair length was one of the most common ways of judging a true Englishman in this period. Muslims in Christian areas were ordered to keep their hair short and parted, as their longer style was considered rebellious and barbaric.[30]




Empress Elisabeth of Austria wearing thigh-length hair in 1865. (Painting by Franz Xaver Winterhalter)


The long hair tradition was widespread among English and French men in the 11th and 12th centuries, though it was considered, mostly because of endorsement of the Roman Catholic Church, acceptable for men also to have shorter hair. The tradition was largely brought about by monarchs who rejected the shorter hairstyle, causing the people to follow. Wulfstan, a religious leader, worried that those with longer hair would fight like women, and be unable to protect England from foreign invasion. This idea can be found in later military leaders as well, such as those of the American Confederacy.[31] Knights and rulers would also sometimes cut or pull out their hair in order to show penitence and mourning, and a squire's hair was generally shorter than a knight's. Married women who let their hair flow out in public were frowned upon, as this was normally reserved for the unwed, although they were allowed to let it out in mourning, to show their distressed state. Through these centuries it was expected of Eastern Christians to wear long hair as well as long beards, which was especially expected from clergy and monks.
In England, during the English Civil Wars of 1642 to 1651, male hair length was emblematic of the disputes between Cavaliers and Roundheads (Puritans). Cavaliers wore longer hair, and were less religious-minded, thought of by the Roundheads as lecherous. The more devout Roundheads typically had somewhat shorter hair[9]
Around this time, long hair in England also came to be associated with adventurers who traveled to America and were familiar with the native culture there, short hair with less adventurous types.
Recent trends among women[edit]







The Seven Sutherland Sisters were singing and showing off their famous floor-length hair in a sideshow of Barnum & Bailey's from about 1882 to 1907.








Opera singer Mary Garden in 1908 with knee-length hair








Indonesian woman with waist-length hair









Dutch woman with thigh-length hair








Ngbandi girls with hip-length hair





Growing and wearing long hair was common among women in the Western world until World War One.[15] Long female hair never ceased in western culture, though it was rare during the 1920s and 1930s, and was frequent especially around 1970 and 1985.[citation needed]
In most current cultures, it is more typical for women to wear long hair than for men to do so. An American study shows significant correlation between hair length and age, which indicates that younger women tend to have longer hair than older women. A significant correlation was also found between women's hair length and hair quality. Moreover, hair quality was correlated with the women's perceived physical health. Consistent with principles of evolutionary psychology, these results indicate that hair length and quality can act as a cue to a woman's youth and health, signifying reproductive potential. The correlation between the woman's hair length and marital status, or number of children, was however not more than to be expected from the correlation between hair length and age.[6]
Recent trends among men[edit]




Long male hair in western youth culture became popular in the 1960s and 70s with The Beatles.






Bob Marley made rastafari culture and dreadlocks popular also outside Jamaica.


Before World War One men generally had longer hair and beards. However, short hair on men was introduced in World War One for soldiers. Slaves and defeated armies were often required to shave their heads. The trench warfare in 1914 to 1918 exposed men to flea and lice infestations, which prompted the order to cut short hair, establishing a military tradition,[15] and it expanded among civils by imitation.
Beat poets during the 1950s wore longer hairstyles. By 1960, a small "beatnik" community in Newquay, Cornwall, England (including a young Wizz Jones) had attracted the attention of their neighbors for growing their hair to a length past the shoulders, resulting in a television interview with Alan Whicker on BBC television's Tonight series.[32] The 1960s also introduced The Beatles, who started a more widespread longer hair trend. The social revolution of the 1960s led to a renaissance of unchecked hair growth,[15] and long hair, especially on men, was worn as a political or countercultural symbol or protest and as a symbol of masculinity. This cultural symbol extended to several Western countries in the Americas, Western Europe, South Africa, and Australia.[33] Specific long hairstyles such as dreadlocks have been part of counterculture movements seeking to define other alternative cultures and lifestyles since this time.[12] Longer hair in general remained popular due to the youth rebellion throughout the liberal decade of the 1960s.[33] The long hair trend grew with the spread of the hippie movement in the 1960s[33] and, in the 1970s, longer hair styles would become the norm among men and women.
In the 1970s, the popularity of Jamaica's reggae music and musician Bob Marley prompted interest in dreadlocks internationally. The anti-establishment philosophy of Rastafari, echoed in much of the reggae of the time, resonated with leaning youth of all ethnicities – especially and primarily among African Americans and other Blacks, but among counterculture whites as well.[34] Eastern Christians are encouraged[by whom?] to wear long hair with long beard. In the 1980s the view of long hair as a solitary signifier of political or counter-cultural identity was countered and parodied in films such as Rambo and many other militaristic heroes of media which challenged then-contemporary views of tradition.[35] In the 2000's longer hairstyles among men became popular among neopagans and rock enthusiasts;[36] for example, musicians in Metal bands and their fans often wear long hair. Long hair may be grown for the purpose of being donated to an organization, such as Locks of Love, for hairpieces to help those who could not have hair otherwise, such as those who are diagnosed with alopecia aerate. Today long hair has gained even more popularity. Even among mainstream men it is socially acceptable to have hair reaching around the upper back. This could in part be due to the "man bun" trend where men pull their shoulder length or longer hair back into a topknot Bun (hairstyle).
African Americans[edit]
When African slaves were freed in America, they struggled to reach the social status of whites. Many former slaves tried to conform their hairstyles as part of this struggle. Women, especially, felt pressure to make their hair long and oily, rather than keeping the shorter, tightly coiled style they had known.[37] However, during the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s, African-Americans such as Malcolm X advocated hairstyles such as afros and dreadlocks, in order to embrace their race, and to return to West African roots.[38]
Social pressures at the time were heavily influencing these Americans (women) to have long, straight hair, like white people did.[39] This resulted in the Black is beautiful movement, wherein African Americans wore long hair, that was however, untreated and unmodified. More recently, hair-extensions have become widespread. Scholars have pointed out the continued pressure on black women to have long, smooth hair. Amelia Jones points out that dolls for children, such as Barbies, add to this pressure, citing as an example a new, black Barbie with long hair. Blacks, she believes, should be able to be themselves without feeling pressured to "tame" their hair.[40]
Contemporary North America[edit]
1972, it was estimated that 24% of American women wore shoulder length hair or longer (44% of women in ages 14 to 44), meaning slightly more than 12% of men and women altogether. Similar frequency was found in 2001, when it was estimated that about 13% of the US adult population, male as well as females, has hair shoulder-length or longer, about 2.4% have hair reaching to the bottom of the shoulder blades or longer, about 0.3% have hair waist length or longer, and only about 0.017% have hair buttocks-length or longer.[41] By extrapolating the above data and the number of hair length records, the number of people with shoulder-length hair or longer in the USA is estimated to be 27 million, those with waist-length hair roughly 900,000, those with buttocks-length hair to be 40,000, with knee length hair to 2,000 and with ankle length hair to 70.[14]
Middle East[edit]
Judaism[edit]
Strict orthodox Judaism forbids men from cutting their sidelocks, but other hair may be kept as desired. Hair is not cut during a time of mourning. The Torah in Deuteronomy 14:1 prohibits removing hair in mourning for the dead.
Islam[edit]




Transjordanian Bedouin with shoulder length hair, during World War II


In the Muslim world, it seems the trend of hair styles is now favouring short over long in men. In the past, Bedouin Muslims often wore their hair in long braids, but influences from the Western world have caused a change in attitudes. Bedouins are now less likely to have long hair.[42] Islamic countries in North Africa such as Egypt view long hair in men as modernist and in one case the Egyptian police viewed it as Satanic and a sign of an infidel.[43] Spanish rulers during the Medieval Period suspected long-haired males to be Moors or Moriscos, therefore long hair was forbidden since it was believed to be a Moorish custom. However, modern North African men have adopted Western short hair.
Muslims regard the Prophet Muhammad as the best example to live by, and try to emulate him whenever possible. The Islamic Prophet Muhammad reportedly in Sahih Muslim had hair that "hung over his shoulders and earlobes".[44] Sahih Bukhari, regarded the most authentic of hadith, also supports this using a prime example of the prophet Isa (Jesus).[45] The Prophet Muhammad has also described Jesus as "having long hair reaching his ear lobes."[46] Malik's Muwatta 51.2.6 reported, Yahya related to me from Malik from Yahya ibn Said that Abu Qatada al-Ansari said to the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, "I have a lot of hair which comes down to my shoulders, shall I comb it? The Messenger of Allah. may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said, "Yes, and honour it." Sometimes Abu Qatada oiled it twice in one day because the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace, said to him. "Honour it."
With regards to women, neither Qur'an nor Sunnah explicitly state that women cannot cut their hair. Hadith does mention that women should not imitate men, and vice versa, and hence many scholars on this assumption, decree that women should let their hair grow longer than the hair of the Prophet, reaching beyond their shoulders, as hadith mentions that the Prophet had his hair between his shoulder and his earlobes. (He described Jesus's hair, which hung to his earlobes, as long.[47])
However, according to some hadiths regarding the rules of awrah, women are required to grow hair long, long enough that it would cover the breasts or as much awrah parts of the body when they're being buried, because she lacks clothes and long hair would be used as a covering instead.
Some Muslims are also opposed to men having long hair as it is also important in Islam to have clear differences (in appearance) between sexes. And generally these cultures encourage women to have long hair and men to have short hair.[48] The Taliban in Afghanistan viewed long hair for men as a western influence, and punished it by arrest and forced haircuts,[49] although this would be a direct contradiction of the sunnah of the Prophet. Similar measures have been taken by Islamists in Iraq.[50] In spite of this, several Taliban affiliated members of the Mehsud clan are recognisable by their long hair.[51][52] The Saudi Islamist fighter Amir Khattab was also notable for his long hair. Dervishes of some Sufi orders, such as the Kasnazani, often have long hair and whirl it around during rituals.[53]
Native Americans[edit]




Yakima boy with mid-back level hair. (Photo by Edward S. Curtis, 1868–1952.)


Many Native American men wore long hair before the arrival of western influences on their culture. (In Cherokee legends, for example, males said to be handsome were often described as having "long hair almost to the ground" or similar formulas.[54]). Both men and women of these cultures have frequently struggled to maintain their tradition but have faced heavy opposition. Many consider it a sign of giving in to western influences to have their hair cut.[55][56] Early American settlers saw long-haired, native men as rebelling against their civilized society. Mountain men and trappers who adopted the customs were also considered amoral, and often identified by their long hair.[57] Since the cultural movements of the Sixties and Seventies, however, Native Americans have felt less pressure to have short hair, as different movements have defended their cultural rights.[58] For example, several states have loosened prison regulations, allowing Native Americans to wear long hair during incarceration, along with other cultural allowances.[59] There has been resistance to these changes, however, as long hair is sometimes used to hide drugs, as well as to identify with a gang.[60]
Africa[edit]




Somali woman with shoulder-length hair.


Throughout much of Africa, afro-textured hair is the most frequent hair form, except among the Afro-Asiatic (Hamito-Semitic) speaking populations in North Africa and the Horn of Africa. In the latter regions, naturally long hair is instead more common.[61]
In West African cultures, women with long hair were highly valued. Long, thick hair was seen as a sign of health, strength, and capability to bear many children. In keeping with this general theme, women who were too young for marriage would shave a portion of their heads to signal so. This tradition, however, did not extend to every West African culture, as several valued shorter hair.[62]
Asia[edit]
Historically, East Asian cultures viewed long hair as a sign of youth and aesthetic beauty. Long hair is associated with private life and sexuality. East Asian cultures see long, unkempt hair in a woman as a sign of sexual intent or a recent sexual encounter, as usually their hair is tied up.[12] Lay Buddhists have long hair, while Buddhist monks have shaved heads.[9]







Japanese woman combing her long hair. (Colour woodblock print from 1920 by Hashiguchi Goyō.)








Illustration of The Tale of Genji, painted by Tosa Mitsuoki (1617–1691).








Chinese orthodox Christian man from 1874








Nosu girls in China 1922.








A hindoo "fakir" or Sadhu with long hair. Lithograph 1844 by Emily Eden after Lowes Cato Dickinson.





China[edit]
In ancient China and Korea, hair was regarded as a precious legacy from parents. Most people would never cut their hair after they became adults, and cutting off one's hair was a penalty for minor crimes. Both men and women would coil up their hair and many hair-coiling styles were developed.
Beginning in 1619, the ethnic Manchu Qing dynasty forced all men in China to adopt the queue: a long braid down the back with the hair near the forehead completely shaved. Hair length and style became a life-or-death matter in 1645 as the Manchu told them either their hair or their head would be cut. By 1651, the population of China had been reduced from 51 million to just 20 million, as a whole generation resisted the order for the sake of Confucian ideals against shaving or harming their hair.
Nearly every Han rebel group began by shearing this pigtail (most especially in the case of the Taiping, who were known in Chinese as the "Longhairs"), but the queue on penalty of death lasted until 1911, when the Chinese people cut their queues in unison at a time of rebellion. Americans at first judged Chinese immigrant laborers to be poor workers because their long hair brought an association with women.[63]
Islamic and Christian missionaries among the Chinese were strong advocates of shorter male hair for their converts.[64] Around the Destruction of Four Olds period in 1964, almost anything seen as part of Traditional Chinese culture would lead to problems with the Communist Red Guards. Items that attracted dangerous attention if caught in the public included jewelry and long male hair.[65] These things were regarded as symbols of bourgeois lifestyle, that represented wealth. People had to avoid them or suffer serious consequences such as tortures and beatings by the guards.[65] More recently, long hair was ridiculed in China from October 1983 to December 1983, as part of the short and unsuccessful Anti-Spiritual Pollution Campaign.[66]
Also, in Chinese ancient and modern poetry, long hair is a common symbol used by poets, for example Li Bai and Li Shangyin, to express their depression and sadness.
Southeast Asia[edit]
In Southeast Asia and Indonesia, male long hair was valued in until the seventeenth century, when the area adopted outside influences including Islam and Christianity. Invading cultures enforced shorter hairstyles on men as a sign of servitude, as well. They were also confused at the short hairstyles among women in certain areas, such as Thailand, and struggled to explain why women in the area had such short hair. They came up with several mythical stories, one of which involved a king who found a long hair in his rice and, in a rage, demanded that all women keep their hair short.[64]
In rural areas in certain Asian countries, for example India, girls still usually let their hair grow long, and knee-length hair is not unusual.[67]
Japan[edit]
In the medieval Japan, heian gentleman were not very interested in a woman's physical beauty and rarely had an opportunity to see it. The only physical attribute of interest was a woman's hair, which had to be thick and longer than she was tall. The fascination with long hair was one reason why a woman's becoming a nun was regarded with such seriousness — it could never again grow to its full length. This explains why Genji refuses to let Murasaki (his de facto wife in the classical Japanese novel The Tale of Genji) take the tonsure when she is ill.[68]
Sikhism[edit]
For Sikhs, Kesh is the practice of allowing one's hair to grow naturally as a symbol of devotion to God and lack of worldliness.[11]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (August 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The Sikhs were commanded by Guru Gobind Singh at the Baisakhi Amrit Sanchar in 1699 to wear long uncut hair called Kesh at all times to signify the strength and vitality of the Sikh people. This was one of the 'five requisites of faith', collectively called Kakars that form the external visible identifiers to clearly affirm a Sikh's commitment and dedication to the order (Hukam) of the tenth master and made one a member of the Khalsa. The Khalsa is the "Saint-Soldier" of Guru Gobind Singh who stated the following: "He does not recognize anyone else except One Lord, not even the bestowal of charities, performance of merciful acts, austerities and restraint on pilgrim-stations; the perfect light of the Lord illuminates his heart, then consider him as the immaculate Khalsa." (Guru Gobind Singh in the Dasam Granth page 1350)
The Kesh or unshorn long hair is an indispensable part of the human body as created by waheguru that is the mainstay of the 'Jivan Jaach' and the Rehni that was prescribed by Guru Gobind Singh Sahib by which a Sikh is clearly and quickly identified, Kesh. The kanga, another requisite of faith is usually tucked behind the "Rishi Knot" and tied under the turban. The uncut long head hair and the beard in the case of men forms the main kakar for the Sikhs.
KESADHARI, a term defining a Sikh as one who carries on his head the full growth of his kes (hair) which he never trims or cuts for any reason. Anyone, Sikh or non-Sikh, may keep the hair unshorn, but for the Sikh kes, unshorn hair, is a requisite of faith and an inviolable vow. The Sikh Rahit Maryada published by the Shiromani Gurdwara Prabandhak Committee, statutory body for the control and management of Sikh shrines and by extension for laying down rules about Sikh beliefs and practices, issued in 1945, after long and minute deliberations among Sikh scholars and theologians, defines a Sikh thus: Every Sikh who has been admitted to the rites of amrit, i.e. who has been initiated as a Sikh, must allow his hair to grow to its full length. This also applies to those born of Sikh families but [who] have not yet received the rites of amrit of the tenth master, Guru Gobind Singh. ".
See also[edit]

Grooming
Haircut
Hair extensions
Hair stick
Lady Godiva
Long hair fetishism, a form of Trichophilia
Rapunzel

Images[edit]

Female long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Female long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair in art (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)
Male long hair photos (Gallery at Wikimedia commons)

References[edit]


^ Buss, David M. (2005). The handbook of evolutionary psychology. John Wiley and Sons. p. 309. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3. 
^ Bereczkei, T. (2007). "Hair length, facial attractiveness, personality attribution; A multiple fitness model of hairdressing". Review of Psychology. 13 (1): 35–42. 
^ Scorolli, C; Ghirlanda, S; Enquist, M; Zattoni, S; Jannini, E A (2007). "Relative prevalence of different fetishes". International Journal of Impotence Research. 19 (4): 432–7. PMID 17304204. doi:10.1038/sj.ijir.3901547. 
^ "Heels top the global fetish leader board". England. 
^ a b Watson, James (2005). Darwin: the Indelible Stamp; the Evolution of an Idea. Philadelphia: Running Press. p. 1042. ISBN 0-7624-2136-3. 
^ a b Hinsz, Verlin B.; Matz, David C.; Patience, Rebecca A. (2001). "Does women's hair signal reproductive potential?". Journal of Experimental Social Psychology. 37 (2): 166. doi:10.1006/jesp.2000.1450. 
^ Sugiyama, Lawrence S. (2005) "Physical Attractiveness in Adaptationist Perspective", Chapter 10 in Buss, David M. (ed.) The Handbook of Evolutionary Psychology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. ISBN 978-0-471-26403-3
^ Williams, Simon Johnson; Birke, Lynda I. A.; Bendelow, Gillian (2003). Debating biology: sociological reflections on health, medicine, and society. Routledge. p. 130. ISBN 0-415-27903-8. 
^ a b c Leach, E. R. (July 1958). "Magical Hair". Journal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. 88 (2): 147–164. JSTOR 2844249. doi:10.2307/2844249. 
^ a b Judges 13–16
^ a b Fowler, Jeaneane (1997). World Religions: an Introduction for Students. Brighton: Sussex Academic Press. p. 352. ISBN 1-898723-48-6. 
^ a b c Maynard, Margaret (2004), Dress and Globalisation, Manchester: Manchester University Press, p. 104, ISBN 0-7190-6389-2 
^ a b Oxford English Dictionary
^ a b c Clarence Robbins and Marjorie Gene Robbins, "Scalp hair length. II. Estimating the percentages of adults in the USA and larger populations by hari length." Journal of cosmetic science 54.4 (2003): 367–378.
^ a b c d e Gonzalez, Anthony (2007). Cosmetology. Global Media. p. 54. ISBN 81-89940-45-7. 
^ a b Hemat, R. A. S. (2007). Andropathy. Urotext. p. 375. ISBN 1-903737-08-7. 
^ Robbins, Clarence R. (2002). Chemical and physical behavior of human hair. Springer. ISBN 0-387-95094-X. 
^ Guinness World Records: Longest hair. guinnessworldrecords.com
^ Tortora & Derrickson (2012). Principles of Anatomy & Physiology (13 ed.). John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p. 163. 
^ Maeda, T.; Yamamoto, T.; Isikawa, Y.; Itoh, N.; Arase, S. (2007). "Sanguisorba Officinalis Root Extract Has FGF-5 Inhibitory Activity and Reduces Hair Loss by Causing Prolongation of the Anagen Period". Nishi Nihon Hifuka. 69: 81. doi:10.2336/nishinihonhifu.69.81. 
^ Numbers 6:5, Numbers 6:18–19
^ KJV 1 Corinthians 11:14–16
^ Irwin, M. Eleanor (Oct 1990). "Odysseus' "Hyacinthine Hair" in 'Odyssey' 6.231". Phoenix. 44 (3): 205–218. JSTOR 1088933. doi:10.2307/1088933. 
^ a b Nicolson, Frank W. (1891). "Greek and Roman Barbers". Harvard Studies in Classical Philology. 2: 41–56. JSTOR 310326. 
^ Pliny the Elder at Perseus
^ Bartman, Elizabeth (Jan 2001). "Hair and the Artifice of Roman Female Adornment". American Journal of Archaeology. 105 (1): 1–25. JSTOR 507324. 
^ Felt, Joseph (1967). Customs of New England. New York: Burt Franklin. p. 187. ISBN 0-8337-1105-9. 
^ Connolly, Sean J (2007). "Prologue". Contested island: Ireland 1460–1630. Oxford University Press. p. 7. 
^ The Brehon Laws: A Legal Handbook: Chapter VII, Laurence Ginnell (1894)
^ Bartlett, Robert (1994). "Symbolic Meanings of Hair in the Middle Ages". Transactions of the Royal Historical Society. Sixth series. 4: 43–60. JSTOR 3679214. doi:10.2307/3679214. 
^ McManus, Howard Rollins (1989). The Battle of Cloids Mountain of Virginia, 1864. University of Michigan. p. 35. 
^ Whicker, Alan. Tonight: "Beatniks in Newquay". BBC, 1960.
^ a b c Bronski, Michael (2000), The Pleasure Principle: Sex, Backlash, and the Struggle for Gay Freedom, Stonewall Inn Editions, pp. 95–96, ISBN 0-312-25287-0 
^ Gossai, Hemchand; Murrell, Nathaniel (2000), Religion, Culture, and Tradition in the Caribbean, New York: St. Martin's Press, pp. 181–190, ISBN 0-312-23242-X 
^ Lu, Hsiao-Peng (1997), Transnational Chinese Cinemas, Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press, p. 229, ISBN 0-8248-1845-8 
^ Weinstein, Deena (2000), Heavy Metal, New York: Da Capo Press, p. 129, ISBN 0-306-80970-2 
^ Byrd, pp. 25–49
^ Synnott, Anthony (September 1987). "Shame and Glory: A Sociology of Hair". The British Journal of Sociology. 38 (3): 381–413. JSTOR 590695. doi:10.2307/590695. 
^ Taylor, Paul C. (1999). "Malcolm's Conk and Danto's Colors; Or, Four Logical Petitions concerning Race, Beauty, and Aesthetics". The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism. 57 (1): 16–20. JSTOR 432060. doi:10.2307/432060. 
^ Jones, Amelia (2003). The Feminism and Visual Culture Reader. New York: Routledge. p. 343. ISBN 0415267056
^ Robbins, C; Robbins, M. G. (2003). "Scalp hair length. I. Hair length in Florida theme parks: An approximation of hair length in the United States of America". Journal of cosmetic science. 54 (1): 53–62. PMID 12644859. 
^ Massad, Joseph (2001), Colonial Effects, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 137–140, 208–210, ISBN 0-231-12322-1 
^ Heper, Metin (1998), Ismet Inonu: the Making of a Turkish Statesman, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 153, ISBN 90-04-09919-0 
^ Sahih Muslim Book 30 Number 5773: "Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 7 Book 72 Number 788: "Narrated Al-Bara': I did not see anybody in a red cloak looking more handsome than the Prophet Narrated Malik: The hair of the Prophet used to hang near his shoulders. Narrated Shu'ba: The hair of the Prophet used to hang down to the earlobes."
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128 : Narrated 'Abdullah bin 'Umar: Allah's Apostle said, "I saw myself (in a dream) near the Ka'ba last night, and I saw a man with whitish red complexion, the best you may see amongst men of that complexion having long hair reaching his earlobes which was the best hair of its sort, and he had combed his hair and water was dropping from it, and he was performing the Tawaf around the Ka'ba while he was leaning on two men or on the shoulders of two men. I asked, 'Who is this man?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, son of Mary.' Then I saw another man with very curly hair, blind in the right eye which looked like a protruding out grape. I asked, 'Who is this?' Somebody replied, '(He is) Messiah, Ad-Dajjal.'"
^ Sahih Al-Bukhari Volume 9 Book 87 Number 128
^ Joseph, Suad; Najmabadi, Afsaneh (2005), Encyclopedia of Women & Islamic Cultures: Family, Body, Sexuality and Health, Volume 3, Boston: Brill Academic Publishers, p. 35, ISBN 90-04-12819-0 
^ Rashid, Ahmed (2002), Taliban: Islam, oil and the new great game in central Asia, I B Tauris & Co Ltd, p. 219, ISBN 1-86064-830-4 
^ Raghavan, Sudarsan (2006-10-06), "Another freedom cut short: Iraq's barbers under threat", The Washington Post, archived from the original on 2006-10-06 
^ "South Asia | Profile: Abdullah Mehsud". BBC News. 2007-07-24. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ "Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud threatens US months after 'death'". The Daily Telegraph. 2010-05-03. Retrieved 2013-10-27. 
^ Wong, Edward (2005-08-22). "Iraq's Sufis attacked as strife widens". The New York Times. 
^ Kirk, Lowell (1999). "Cherokee Myths and Legends". Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Ferris, Jeri (1991), Native American Doctor, Minneapolis: Carolrhoda Books, pp. 32–33, ISBN 0-87614-443-1 
^ Kilcup, Karen (2000), Native American Women's Writing, C. 1800–1924, Cambridge: Blackwell Publishers, pp. 314–316, ISBN 0-631-20518-7 
^ Cavallo, Dominick (1999), A Fiction of the past, New York: St. Martin's Press, p. 90, ISBN 0-312-23501-1 
^ Nagel, Joane (1997), American Indian Ethnic Renewal, Oxford Oxfordshire: Oxford University Press, p. 191, ISBN 0-19-512063-9 
^ French, Laurence (2003), Native American Justice, Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Inc, pp. 113–117, ISBN 0-8304-1575-0 
^ Fontana, Vincent (2003), Municipal Liability, Aspen Law & Business Publishers, pp. 241–242, ISBN 0-7355-1375-9 
^ Hiernaux, Jean (1975). The People of Africa. Scribners. p. 59. ISBN 0684140403. 
^ Byrd, pp. 2–5
^ Prasso, Sheridan (2005), The Asian Mystique, New York: Public Affairs Press, pp. 115–116, ISBN 1-58648-214-9 
^ a b Reid, Anthony (1988). Southeast Asia in the Age of Commerce, 1450–1680. New Haven: Yale University Press. p. 82. ISBN 0-300-04750-9. 
^ a b Law, Kam-yee (2003), The Chinese Cultural Revolution Reconsidered: beyond purge and Holocaust, Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-73835-7 
^ "Olympic crackdown on China's bad habits". BBC News. August 6, 2007. Retrieved 2007-09-09. 
^ Sherrow, Victoria (2006) Encyclopedia of hair: a cultural history, Greenwood Publishing Group. p. 242. ISBN 0313331456
^ The Tale of Genji, a novel about courtly life in medieval Japan.


Bibliography[edit]

Byrd, Ayana; Tharps, Lori (2002). Hair Story. New York: St. Martin's Griffin. ISBN 0-312-28322-9. 







v
t
e


Human hair




List of hairstyles / facial hairstyles



Classification




by type



Lanugo
Androgenic
Terminal
Vellus





by location



Nose
Ear
Eyebrow
Eyelash
Underarm
Chest
Abdominal
Pubic
Leg













v
t
e


Human hair color



Hair color



Black
Blond
Brown (varieties: Chestnut • Auburn)
Red (varieties: Auburn • Titian)
White/Grey





Hair coloring



Blue rinse
Grecian Formula
Hair dye stripping
Hair highlighting
Henna
Hydrogen peroxide
Blue hair





Other



Disappearing blonde gene
Fischer–Saller scale
Fischer scale
Melanocortin 1 receptor













Hairstyles



Afro
Asymmetric cut
Bangs
Beehive
Big hair
Blowout
Bob cut
Bouffant
Bowl cut
Braid or Plait
Brush cut
Bun (odango)
Bunches
Burr
Businessman cut
Butch cut
Buzz cut
Caesar cut
Chignon
Chonmage
Chupryna
Comb over
Conk
Cornrows
Crew cut
Crochet braids
Cropped hair
Croydon facelift
Curtained hair
Devilock
Dido flip
Digital perm
Dreadlocks
Duck's ass
Extensions
Feathered hair
Finger wave
Flattop
Fontange
French braid
French twist
Frosted tips
Harvard clip
High and tight
Hime cut
Historical Christian hairstyles
Hi-top fade
Induction cut
Ivy League
Jewfro
Jheri curl
Kiss curl
Layered hair
Liberty spikes
Long hair
Lob cut
Marcelling
Mod cut
Mohawk
Mullet
1950s
1980s
Pageboy
Part
Payot
Pigtail
Pixie cut
Pompadour
Ponytail
Punch perm
Princeton
Professional cut
Queue
Quiff
Rattail
Razor cut
Regular haircut
Regular taper cut
Ringlets
Shag
Shape-Up
Short back and sides
Short brush cut
Short hair
Spiky hair
Standard haircut
Surfer hair
Taper cut
Tonsure
Updo
Undercut
Waves
Wings





Facial hair



Beard
Chin curtain
Chinstrap
Designer stubble
Goatee
Moustache

Fu Manchu
handlebar
horseshoe
pencil
toothbrush
walrus


Neckbeard
Shenandoah
Sideburns
Soul patch
Van Dyke





Hair loss




Cosmetic



Removal

waxing
threading
plucking
chemical
electric
laser
IPL


Shaving

head
leg
cream
brush
soap


Razor

electric
safety
straight







other



Alopecia

areata
totalis
universalis


Male-pattern hair loss
Glabrousness
Hypertrichosis
Management
Trichophilia
Trichotillomania
Pogonophobia








Haircare Products



Brush
Clay
Clipper
Comb
Conditioner
Dryer
Gel
Hot comb
Iron
Mousse
Pomade
Relaxer
Rollers
Shampoo
Spray
Wax





Haircare Techniques



Backcombing
Crimping
Curly Girl Method
Perm
Shampoo and set
Straightening





Documentaries



My Nappy Roots: A Journey Through Black Hair-itage (2008)
Good Hair (2009)





Related Topics



Afro-textured hair
Bearded lady
Barber (pole)
Eponymous hairstyle
Good hair (phrase)
Hairdresser
Hair fetishism (pubic)
Hair follicle
Hair growth
Hypertrichosis
Trichotillomania










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Long_hair&oldid=791632801"					
Categories: HairstylesPejorative terms for peopleHeavy metal fashionHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from December 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014Articles with unsourced statements from June 2015Articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from June 2017Articles needing additional references from August 2014All articles needing additional referencesGood articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةBrezhonegDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisGalegoItalianoLietuvių日本語Simple EnglishไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 14:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 
















Vyjayanthimala - Biography - IMDb













































































 










 
IMDb




More





All
Titles
TV Episodes
Names
Companies
Keywords
Characters
Quotes
Bios
Plots










Movies,
                TV
                & Showtimes




MOVIES

In Theaters
Showtimes & Tickets
Latest Trailers
Coming Soon
Release Calendar
Top Rated Movies
Top Rated Indian Movies
Most Popular Movies

CHARTS & TRENDS

Box Office
Oscar Winners
Most Popular by Genre



TV & VIDEO

IMDb TV
On Tonight
Top Rated TV Shows
Most Popular TV Shows
Watch Now on Amazon
DVD & Blu-Ray

SPECIAL FEATURES

Amazon Originals
Streaming
Comic-Con
IMDb Picks
Superheroes







Celebs,
                Events
                & Photos




CELEBS

Born Today
Celebrity News
Most Popular Celebs

PHOTOS

Latest Stills
Latest Posters
Photos We Love



EVENTS

Awards Central
Oscars
Golden Globes
Sundance
Cannes
Comic-Con
Emmy Awards
Venice Film Festival
Toronto Film Festival
Festival Central
Tribeca
All Events







News &
Community





LATEST HEADLINES


 Bryce Dallas Howard to Make Directorial Debut on ‘Sorta Like a Rock Star’ (Exclusive)

1 hours ago


 Box Office: ‘Atomic Blonde’ Explodes With $1.5 Million, Topping ‘Emoji Movie,’ on Thursday

5 hours ago


 Priyanka Chopra Developing Comedy Series About Bollywood Star at ABC (Exclusive)

4 hours ago





NEWS

Top News
Movie News
TV News
Celebrity News
Indie News

COMMUNITY

Contributor Zone
Polls







Watchlist




            YOUR WATCHLIST
    













 
 


 



The leading information resource for the entertainment industry
Find industry contacts & talent representation
Manage your photos, credits, & more
Showcase yourself on IMDb & Amazon
Go to IMDbPro


|

Help


 

 

 










Sign in with Facebook
Other Sign in options










 








 








Edit


 
 

Vyjayanthimala 


Biography




Showing all 25 items

Jump to:
Overview (2) |
Mini Bio (1) |
Spouse (1) |
Trivia (18) |
Personal Quotes (3)  


Overview (2)

Date of Birth

13 August
1933, Triplicane, Madras Presidency, British India 

Height

5' 3" (1.6 m)    


Mini Bio (1)


          Vyjayanthimala was born to actress and dancer Vasundhara Devi in a Tamil-speaking family in Chennai, India, on August 13, 1936.At the age of 4, she got the rare chance of performing a dance before the Pope. Then at the age of 15, while in her final year at school, she was signed-up by family friend, M.V. Raman, for a role in a Tamil film 'Vazhkai'. This movie was successful at the box office and was re-made in Hindi during 1951 and released as 'Bahaar'.Since her entry into films from 1949, this actress, who is also proficient in Bharat Natyam, has appeared in approximately 62 movies, the majority of them in the Hindi language. Her career spanned from 1949 through to 1989. She has received a total of five awards for her performances in 'Devdas', 'Sadhna', 'Ganga Jamuna', and 'Sangam', as well as a lifetime achievement award during 1995.Her dance numbers, such as 'Hothon Pe Aisi Baat Main Dabake Chali Aai...', 'Man Doley Mera Tan Doley...'; 'Chad Gaiyo Paapi Bichua...'; 'Main Ka Karu Ram Mujhey Buddha Mil Gaya' continue to be popular even today. She made waves when she appeared in a fire red swimsuit in 'Sangam'. She also paved the way for other South Indian actresses, like Hema Malini, Rekha, Sridevi, etc. to make a transition to Bollywood. Her career was managed by her grandmother, Yadugiri Devi.She married Raj Kapoor's personal physician, Dr. Chamanlal Bali after he divorced his first wife and re-located to Chennai, where she gave birth to a son, actor Suchindra Bali.After quitting films, Vyjantimala took up shrimp farming, opened up a dance academy, even took an active interest in politics, and with the backing of Indira Gandhi's Congress Party was elected Member of Parliament during the 1980s. She chose to quit politics due to principled differences during 1999.After the passing of her husband, she now resides in Chennai, with her son, who is an aspiring actor in his own right, and has removed herself completely from Bollywood, in particular, and movies in general, though she could have easily continued on for another decade.One of her hits 'Naya Daur', originally in Black & White, has now been colorized, and re-released.In 2007, she published her autobiography titled "Bonding," where she revealed that she didn't have an affair with Raj Kapoor, her leading man and director from "Sangam" (1964).In 2011, her son Suchindra and daughter-in-law Nandini presented her with a grandchild named Swara.

- IMDb Mini Biography By: 
          
            rAjOo
          



Spouse (1)


               Chamanlal Bali          

(1968            - 
1986) (his death) (1 child)          



Trivia (18)

      Vyjayanthimala won the Best Actress Filmfare Award three times, for her roles in _Sadhana (1958)_, Gunga Jumna (1961), and Sangam (1964). She also helped pave the way for more agile and beauteous South Indian actresses, from Hema Malini to Aishwarya Rai Bachchan, to conquer the Hindi film industry.


      Was known as one of Bollywood's finest dancers of her time. Vyjayanthimala, trained in Bharatanatyam dance, performed some super-hit song and dance numbers in Hindi films, and her influence on films has been far-reaching: with her, semi-classical dance became an integral part of almost every Hindi film heroine's credentials.


      Was launched by M.V. Raman, a family friend, in AVM's Tamil film, Vazhkai (1949). The film was such a huge hit that it continued its success when remade in Hindi as Bahar (1951), also starring Vyjayanthimala.


      Once refused the Best Supporting Actress Filmfare Award, as she felt that her role as 'Chandramukhi' in Devdas (1955) was not a supporting one; the strong-headed actress felt she was as much the heroine of the film as Suchitra Sen, who played 'Paro'.


      Formed a popular on-screen pair with both the intense Dilip Kumar in films like Devdas, and the jocular Kishore Kumar in hits like New Delhi (1956) and Aasha (1957).


      Fell in love with Raj Kapoor's personal physician, Dr. Bali, who treated her for pneumonia after she fell into the lake while shooting for a film. The two grew close and later married and had a child, Suchindra Bali. Vyjayanthimala subsequently decided to leave films while still at the top, and immersed herself in raising her son.


      Joined politics for a while, and was close to Indira Gandhi. Vyjayanthimala was elected twice to the Lok Sabha (Indian Parliament's House of the People) and was a nominated member of the Rajya Sabha (Indian Parliament's Council of States). She resigned in 1999, however, as she thought the party was drifting from its avowed principles after the death of Rajiv Gandhi.


      Honored with the Sangeet Natak Akademi award by the National Academy of Music, Dance and Drama, and the Filmfare Lifetime Achievement award for her distinguished contribution to Indian cinema.


      An excellent golf player, Vyjayanthimala was introduced to the game by her husband. She has even played in the National Golf Championship (15 Handicap).


      Turned down the mother's role in _Deewaar, which later went to Nirupa Roy.


      Vyjanthimala was highest paid actress in Hindi Cinema from 1962-65 with Sadhana and 2nd highest paid Hindi actress from 1966-67 with Mala Sinha,Nanda,Waheeda and 3rd Highest paid Hindi actress from 1955-1961.


      Vajayntimala, was 5 years old when she was chosen to perform in front of the Pope as a part of some cultural celebrations.


      Currently lives in Chennai, and rarely comes to Mumbai. [2003]


      She has distanced herself from Bollywood, and Mumbai in general. Continues to play an active role in politics [2004]


      Son Suchindra Bali aka Pravin Bali is actor.


      Her fan is Asha Parekh, and they shared a dance number and a comedy scene in the hit film Aasha (1957). Two years later, Asha became a heroine with the hit film Dil Deke Dekho (1959), but still she continued to be in awe of Vyjayantimala, even sneaking on to the Amrapali (1966) set to watch her. She played a Vyjayantimala fan in the film Jawan Muhabat (1971). In real life, the two stars would occasionally have lunch together. In 2016, almost 60 years since they first worked together, Vyjayantimala remembered Asha as "a very nice girl".


      Son Suchindra wife 's name is Nandini. They had a daughter named Swara in October 2011.


      Has three step children from her husband Dr.Chaman Bali's first marriage. He was previously married to Rubi Bali. The three step children are Ratan Bali (Born1956), Rajan Bali (Born 1958), Raman Bali ( Born 1960).


Personal Quotes (3)

      Art has now become less spiritual because of the attempts to modernize it. I don't believe in fusion. East is East and West is West. I plan to continue dancing and doing social service.


      I believe in the purity of art. I think you have to be pure at heart to depict divinity.


      I am basically an emotional person. Otherwise, I wouldn't be an artiste. I always speak from my heart and that's the way I like to be.







See also


Other Works
| 

Publicity Listings
| 

Official Sites
| 

Contact Info






Getting Started
|
Contributor Zone »
Contribute to This Page




Edit page



Add resume









 


ad feedback





Vyjayanthimala 
Personal Details



Biography




Other Works




Publicity Listings




Official Sites




Contact Info (IMDbPro)





Filmography



by Year




by Job




by Ratings




by Votes




by Genre




by Keyword



Did You Know?



Personal Quotes




Trivia 




Trademark



Photo & Video



Photo Gallery




Trailers and Videos



Opinion



Awards



Related Items



Credited With




NewsDesk




External Sites



Professional Services



Promote yourself with a resume




Add or change photos




Get more at IMDbPro





Explore More
Show Less




Share this page:















Create a list »
                
User Lists
Related lists from IMDb users


 


Best Bollywood Actresses



            a list of 32 people
            created 16 Sep 2011
        
 



 


Bollywood's Most Cutest Actress



            a list of 24 people
            created 08 Jul 2012
        
 



 


Bollywood's Golden Pair



            a list of 40 people
            created 08 Jul 2012
        
 



 


Bollywood's Best Actresses



            a list of 21 people
            created 18 Jan 2015
        
 



 


Tamil Iconic Actors and Actress World will never see again



            a list of 48 people
            created 3 months ago
        
 


See all related lists »
                







 






 









 





 






IMDb Everywhere

 

 

 


Find showtimes, watch trailers, browse photos, track your Watchlist and rate your favorite movies and TV shows on your phone or tablet!
IMDb Mobile site




      Follow IMDb on
      
 

 

 









Home
Top Rated Movies
Box Office
TV
Coming Soon
Site Index
Search
In Theaters




Contact Us
 Register

News

Press Room
Advertising
Jobs




IMDbPro
 Box Office Mojo

 Withoutabox


Conditions of Use
Privacy Policy
 Interest-Based Ads










Copyright © 1990-2017
                IMDb.com, Inc.


                An Amazon.com company.
            




                Amazon Affiliates
            





Amazon Video
Watch Movies &TV Online






Prime Video
Unlimited Streamingof Movies & TV






Amazon Germany
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon Italy
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon France
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon India
Buy Movie andTV Show DVDs






DPReview
DigitalPhotography






Audible
DownloadAudio Books








































Vyjayanthimala on IMDb: Movies, TV, Celebs, and more... - Photo Gallery - IMDb













































































 










 
IMDb




More





All
Titles
TV Episodes
Names
Companies
Keywords
Characters
Quotes
Bios
Plots










Movies,
                TV
                & Showtimes




MOVIES

In Theaters
Showtimes & Tickets
Latest Trailers
Coming Soon
Release Calendar
Top Rated Movies
Top Rated Indian Movies
Most Popular Movies

CHARTS & TRENDS

Box Office
Oscar Winners
Most Popular by Genre



TV & VIDEO

IMDb TV
On Tonight
Top Rated TV Shows
Most Popular TV Shows
Watch Now on Amazon
DVD & Blu-Ray

SPECIAL FEATURES

Amazon Originals
Streaming
Comic-Con
IMDb Picks
Superheroes







Celebs,
                Events
                & Photos




CELEBS

Born Today
Celebrity News
Most Popular Celebs

PHOTOS

Latest Stills
Latest Posters
Photos We Love



EVENTS

Awards Central
Oscars
Golden Globes
Sundance
Cannes
Comic-Con
Emmy Awards
Venice Film Festival
Toronto Film Festival
Festival Central
Tribeca
All Events







News &
Community





LATEST HEADLINES


 Bryce Dallas Howard to Make Directorial Debut on ‘Sorta Like a Rock Star’ (Exclusive)

1 hours ago


 Box Office: ‘Atomic Blonde’ Explodes With $1.5 Million, Topping ‘Emoji Movie,’ on Thursday

5 hours ago


 Priyanka Chopra Developing Comedy Series About Bollywood Star at ABC (Exclusive)

4 hours ago





NEWS

Top News
Movie News
TV News
Celebrity News
Indie News

COMMUNITY

Contributor Zone
Polls







Watchlist




            YOUR WATCHLIST
    













 
 


 



The leading information resource for the entertainment industry
Find industry contacts & talent representation
Manage your photos, credits, & more
Showcase yourself on IMDb & Amazon
Go to IMDbPro


|

Help


 

 

 










Sign in with Facebook
Other Sign in options










 








 











 
 

Vyjayanthimala 


Photo Gallery


6 photos



 

6 photos





Biography


Vyjayanthimala was born to actress and dancer Vasundhara Devi in a Tamil-speaking family in Chennai, India, on August 13, 1936. At the age of 4, she got the rare chance of performing a dance before the Pope. Then at the age of 15, while in her final year at school, she was signed-up by family friend, M.V. Raman, for a role in a Tamil film 'Vazhkai'...            
See full bio »
            
 

 Biography
 |
Trailers &amp Videos 







 


ad feedback





Refine All Photos By

Type

Product (2) Publicity (2) Event (1) Still Frame (1)  


Title

Madhumati
              (1) 
Sangam
              (1) 




Vyjayanthimala 
Photo & Video



Photo Gallery




Trailers and Videos





Filmography



by Year




by Job




by Ratings




by Votes




by Genre




by Keyword



Personal Details



Biography




Other Works




Publicity Listings




Official Sites




Contact Info (IMDbPro)



Did You Know?



Personal Quotes




Trivia 




Trademark



Opinion



Awards



Related Items



Credited With




NewsDesk




External Sites



Professional Services



Promote yourself with a resume




Add or change photos




Get more at IMDbPro





Explore More
Show Less




Share this page:














 






 









 





 






IMDb Everywhere

 

 

 


Find showtimes, watch trailers, browse photos, track your Watchlist and rate your favorite movies and TV shows on your phone or tablet!
IMDb Mobile site




      Follow IMDb on
      
 

 

 









Home
Top Rated Movies
Box Office
TV
Coming Soon
Site Index
Search
In Theaters




Contact Us
 Register

News

Press Room
Advertising
Jobs




IMDbPro
 Box Office Mojo

 Withoutabox


Conditions of Use
Privacy Policy
 Interest-Based Ads










Copyright © 1990-2017
                IMDb.com, Inc.


                An Amazon.com company.
            




                Amazon Affiliates
            





Amazon Video
Watch Movies &TV Online






Prime Video
Unlimited Streamingof Movies & TV






Amazon Germany
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon Italy
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon France
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon India
Buy Movie andTV Show DVDs






DPReview
DigitalPhotography






Audible
DownloadAudio Books








































Singh Vijayanthimala - Electronic Arts Insider Transactions | TipRanks   





Go ProLogin / Sign Up Follow✓Get Real Time TransactionsInsider DetailsSingh VijayanthimalaElectronic Arts (EA)SVP, Chief HR Officer Not RankedSingh Vijayanthimala's PerformanceSingh Vijayanthimala has not reported any informative transactions and therefore cannot be ranked.How are Insiders Ranked? Singh Vijayanthimala's Trading Historybased on Form 4 Follow✓Get Real Time TransactionsCompany NameInsider PositionHolding ValueLast TransactionLast Transaction  AmountLast Transaction DateEAElectronic ArtsSVP, Chief HR Officer-Singh Vijayanthimala has not reported any informative transactions for EA, therefore, performance cannot be measured.See All Insider Trading from Today >You May Also LikeMeet our Smart Portfolio. See what top analysts say about your stocks.Get a breakdown of the different strategies based on detected insider trading activity.Find the best performing Analyst in each sector. Follow them so you never miss a recommendation.Related LinksHow can I benefit from Insider Trading? >See the Top 25 Corporate Insiders >Go to Hot Stocks by Insiders >Find which stocks Insiders traded today >Become a TipRanks MemberGet the best Investing Tips & Hacks straight to your emailFree MembershipSubmitInsider Trading Daily NewsletterProfessional day-trading strategy based on predictive insider transactionsAnnual Return: +85.42%Learn More >Powered by
























